Last login: Tue Mar  2 19:58:27 on ttys000

The default interactive shell is now zsh.
To update your account to use zsh, please run `chsh -s /bin/zsh`.
For more details, please visit https://support.apple.com/kb/HT208050.
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:~ mayingrui$ cd /Users/mayingrui/Desktop/FYP/Dataset/script 
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Are you disappointed by the show’s untimely demise, or were you prepared for the worst?”
“Our Cable TV Renewal Scorecard has been updated with The Royals‘ cancellation.”
“...with no scripted programming currently on the air, though the cable net did hand a pilot order to the dramedy Juicy Stories in March.”
“Coupled with The Arrangement‘s cancellation in May, The Royals‘ axing leaves E!”
“More than 20 members of the show’s cast and crew, including Park, released a statement in November accusing Schwahn of misconduct.”
“Many fans suspected that The Royals wasn’t long for this world when creator/showrunner Mark Schwahn was investigated — and eventually fired — over allegations of sexual harassment.”
“Helena also kicked her latest boy toy out of her bed… but that’s nothing to celebrate.”
“...their baby, and Cyrus at last reuniting with Violet.”
“The Royals‘ fourth (and final) season ended with Robert marrying Willow, Eleanor and Jasper getting pre-engaged, Liam and Kathryn discussing the future of (gasp!)”
“The Royals also starred William Moseley as Prince Liam, Alexandra Park as Princess Eleanor, Max as Prince King Robert, Tom Austen as Jasper and Jake Maskall as Cyrus.”


"Are you disappointed at the premature death of the play, or are you prepared for the worst?"
"Our cable renewal scorecard is updated with the cancellation of the royal family."
“…… Although the cable network issued a trial order in March to "the story of the dramedeto juice", there is no script program yet
"Coupled with the cancellation of the May agreement, the Royal axing left e!"
"More than 20 cast members, including Park Geun hye, issued a statement in November accusing Schwann of misconduct."
"Many fans suspect that when creator / actor mark schwahn was investigated for sexual harassment charges and eventually dismissed, the royal family did not stay in the world long."
"Helena also kicked her latest boy toy out of bed But it's nothing to celebrate. "
"Their child, Cyrus, is finally reunited with violet."
"The fourth (and final) season of the royal family is over. Robert is married to willow. Eleanor and Jasper are engaged. Liam and Catherine discuss the future (gasp!)"
"The royal family also plays William Mosley as Prince Liam, Alexandra Parker as Princess Eleanor, Max as Prince Robert, Tom Austin as jasper, and Jack maskar as Cyrus."



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Take a look for yourself when you click on for beautiful snapshots of the house.Watch the three-night season premiere of Celebrity Big Brother starting on Wednesday, Feb. 7 at 8/7c CBS and CBS All Access...”
“"Our Houseguests and viewers alike will be transported into the glamour of a Hollywood Hills home that embraces iconic Los Angeles and celebrity themes in every room.”
“"We wanted to elevate the sophistication of the house design for the first-ever Celebrity Edition of Big Brother," said Allison Grodner, Executive Producer of Celebrity Big Brother.”
“We're talking rich jewel tones, dark woods, polished gold finishes, and a floor-to-ceiling panorama image of the Los Angeles skyline as seen from the Hollywood Hills.”
“...seen done before The Celebrity Big Brother house will center around luxury and sophistication...”
“...premiere beginning on Wednesday Feb 7 at 8 7c on CBS and CBS All Access but the house which will have the 11 famous Houseguests living in the lap of luxury will also offer some elements BB fans have never...”
“All the interior details of the Celebrity Big Brother house have just been revealed and guys it s going to be a season of firsts in this swanky pad Not only is this season kicking off with a three night...”


"When you click to see house, watch the three night Premiere of big brother celebrity will be held on February 7 (Wednesday) at 8 / 7C CBS and CBS all access..."
"Our lodgers and viewers will be brought into the glamour home of Hollywood villa, each room featuring iconic Los Angeles and celebrity themes."
Allison Grodner, executive producer of celebrity big brother, said: "we want to improve the advanced nature of housing design for the first celebrity edition" big brother ".
"We're talking about rich gemstone tones, dark wood, polished gold finishes, and a panoramic view of the Los Angeles skyline from Hollywood Hills."
"Before celebrity big brother's house, what we saw was all around luxury and complexity..."
“… The premiere starts on Wednesday, February 7 at 8 7C on CBS and all CBS channels, but the house will have 11 famous guests living in the luxury circle and will also offer some elements of BB fans never... "
"All the internal details of the celebrity big brother's house have just been revealed. Guys, this season will be the first season of this luxury apartment. Not only this season will start shooting with three nights..."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Also Read Tom Brady LeBron James Lead 2018 ESPYS Nominations Top names miss TV spots Though they re arguably the best athletes in the world Tom Brady LeBron James and Roger Federer won categories that weren t deemed important enough to be featured on TV possibly because they weren t...”
“Not this year.”
“And it sparked the first big cheer of the evening.”
“The night’s first political joke from Patrick – “I haven’t seen a Russian this pleased with Washington since … at least two days ago” – was tied to the Stanley Cup Finals but we all know who it was really about.”
“There weren’t many Trump supporters in the crowd, however.”
“Alex Ovechkin or Putin?”
“Oops.”
“Few Fergie fans either …The “real national anthem controversy” this year wasn’t about NFL players kneeling, Patrick said, as a picture of Fergie butchering the anthem at the NBA All-Star game appeared on the big screen.”
“At least Odell Beckham Jr. found her joke about his hair being “questionable” funny.”
“Danica’s jab at Cleveland soon sparked a groan from much of the audience — we guess there are some Browns and Cavaliers fans in the house after all.”


"While reading the espys nomination in 2018 led by Tom Brady LeBron James, although they can be said to be the best athletes in the world, they missed the TV show. The awards won by Tom Brady LeBron James and Roger Federer are considered not important enough to appear on TV, probably because they didn't..."
"Not this year."
"It sparked the first cheers of the night."
"Patrick's first political joke of the night -" at least two days ago, I haven't seen a Russian so happy with Washington "- had something to do with the Stanley Cup final, but we all know who it was about."
"However, there are not many people in the crowd who support trump."
"Alex ovichkin or Putin?"
"Oh, dear."
"Fergie has few fans This year's "real national anthem controversy" is not about NFL players kneeling down, Patrick said, when a picture of Fergie slaughtering the National Anthem in the NBA all star game appeared on the big screen
"At least Xiaobei thinks her joke about his hair" suspicious "is funny."
"Danica's jab in Cleveland soon caused the audience to groan - we guess there are some brown and Cavaliers fans at home after all."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hopefully I can feel that again and see everybody dancing and everybody moving.””
“That’s all I wanted to bring with this album.”
“Cardi B decided to show just how much Bruno Mars means to her by offering up her kidney — if he should ever need one, that is.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After their ’90s inspired performance of their collaboration “Finesse” at the 2018 Grammy Awards, the 25-year-old rapper thanked Mars for reinventing the song with her.”
““I want to thank you Soo much !”
“I don’t even know how !” she captioned a shot of the performance on Instagram.”
“Maybe one day you ll need a kidney I got you The Bodak Yellow singer added Congrats on your Wins tonight you deserve I T You sing dance play instrument produce your videos S you probably know how to build a house You ARE AMAZING and you gave me rythm...”
“...sic Be sure to check out PEOPLE s full Grammys coverage to get the latest news on music s big night...”
“Originally featured on Mars’ 24K Magic album, the song — co-written and produced by the Stereotypes — has a new jack-swing inspired beat and plenty of drums in the version with Cardi B.”


"I hope I can feel it again and see everyone dancing and everyone moving."
"That's what I want this album to bring."
"Katie B decided to present her kidney to show what Bruno Mars meant to her - if he needed it, that's it."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 25-year-old rapper sang their 1990's song finesse at the 2018 Grammy Awards, and then thanks Mars for re creating the song with her
"Thank you very much!"
"I don't know how to do it! "She subtitled a performance on instagram."
"Maybe one day you'll need a kidney. I gave it to you, bodak yellow singer. Congratulations on your victory tonight. You deserve it. You sing, dance, play musical instruments, make your videos. You may know how to build a house. You're amazing. You gave me a chorus..."
“… Be sure to check out people's full coverage of Grammy for the latest news about music... "
"This song first appeared in Mars' 24K magic album, which was co created and produced by clich é s, new rhythm inspired by Jack swain and lots of drums in caddy B version."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While North and Saint captured some scrapbook-worthy memories, there was no sign of their 11-week-old daughter, Chicago West.”
“The 4-year-old also got to pose with a hippopotamus.”
“The Kardashian-Wests even got up close and personal with the animals as North got to feed an elephant a piece of lettuce before posing for the cutest photo op.”
“Kanye and Kim Kardashian took their little ones on a trip to the famous San Diego Zoo on Thursday and Kim made sure to document all the adorable moments on her Instagram.”
“As much as he admits to hating smiling, Kanye West couldn't hold back his huge grin while spending koala-ty time with his family at the zoo.”


"Although North and the saints have captured some memorable scrapbooks, their 11 week old daughter, Chicago West, shows no sign at all."
"Four year olds have to pose with hippos."
"The Kardashian West couple even had close contact with these animals, because North fed the elephant a piece of lettuce before putting out the most lovely pictures."
"Kanye and Kim Kardashian took their children to the famous San Diego Zoo on Thursday, and Kim made sure to record all the lovely moments on instagram."
Although Kanye West admitted that he hated smiling, he could not help grinning and spent a leisurely time with his family in the zoo



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There's nothing that will ever come between them.'”
“They will always love each other.”
“Lovato is 'awake and stable' as she continues to spend time in an LA hospital after she was revived with Narcan.”
“According to TMZ, the Confidence singer had been taking meth and heroin before she was found unconscious in her Los Angeles home.”
“The shoot was done long before she learned of Demi's issues.”
“The Revival singer has been with Puma since September 2017Her first campaign was for Phenom.”
“Earlier in July, the Wolves singer starred in Puma‘s Ampt XT campaign.”
“Another angle: The shoes drop in selected sneaker boutiques, Puma.com and Puma stores worldwide on August 2.”
“We already have some really cool projects in the works.'”
“I am hoping that we can create something special together.”


"There will be no gap between them."
"They will love each other forever."
"Lovato is' awake and stable 'as she continues to spend time in Los Angeles hospital after she wakes up with nacan."
According to TMZ, the confident singer had been taking ice and heroin until she was found unconscious at her home in Los Angeles
"Filming was done long before she knew about Demi's problem."
"The Renaissance singer has joined puma since September 2017, and her first campaign was for phenom."
In early July, wolves singers played the leading role in puma's Ampt XT event
"Another angle: shoes are launched in selected sports shoes boutiques. Puma has stores all over the world on August 2."
"We've got some really cool projects going on."
"I hope we can create something special together."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
““After a few days of battling severe indigestion and discomfort while eating, we agreed it was best for him to seek treatment,” Catalano told ABC.”
“Simmons been out of a public eye for a number of years.”
“His absence spurred the podcast Missing Richard Simmons.”
“Earlier this month, however, Simmons signed a merchandising deal after the podcast brought his story back into the public eye.”
“Simmons is expected to make a full recovery, according to Catalano.”
“Get The Brief.”
“Sign up to receive the top stories you need to know right now.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"After several days of struggling with severe indigestion and eating discomfort, we agreed that he had better seek treatment," katarano told ABC
"Simmons has been out of public view for years."
"His absence prompted podcast to miss Richard Simmons."
"However, earlier this month, after podcasts brought Simmons' story back into public view, Simmons signed a sales agreement."
"According to katarano, Simmons is expected to be fully recovered."
"Get the briefing."
"Sign up now to receive the top stories you need to know."
Please enter a valid email address



**Something goes wrong**
“Reporting by Sophie Schillaci and Tracie De La Rosa.”
“NEWS: Jury Rules in Favor of Taylor Swift in Alleged Groping LawsuitSee more on the case below.”
““That dollar is a single dollar and it is of immeasurable value,” Baldridge told press.”
“In addition to finding that Swift's mother, Andrea Swift, and her radio promotions director, Frank Bell, did not intentionally interfere with Mueller's contract, the jury also ruled that Swift be awarded the symbolic dollar.”
“Swift countersued Mueller for $1, accusing him of assault and battery.”
“Mueller, who has denied the claims, filed a $3 million suit against the singer in September 2015, claiming she cost him his job and future career opportunities.”
““It takes wonderful people like Taylor to stand up and draw these lines,” he said.”
“Outside the courthouse, Baldridge told reporters that he was “delighted” with the jury’s decision.”
“Therefore, I will be making donations in the near future to multiple organizations that help sexual assault victims defend themselves."”
““My hope is to help those whose voices should also be heard.”


"Sophie skilach and Tracy delarosa report."
"News: the jury rules are in favor of Taylor Swift's alleged provocation. Here's the case."
"This dollar is a single dollar, and its value is immeasurable," Baudrillard told reporters
"In addition to finding that Swift's mother, Andrea swift, and her radio director, Frank bell, did not intentionally interfere with mill's contract, the jury also ruled that Swift was awarded a symbolic dollar."
Swift countered mill for $1, accusing him of beating others
"Muller denied that and filed a $3 million lawsuit against the singer in September 2015, claiming that she had deprived him of his job and future career opportunities."
"A good person like Taylor can stand up and draw these lines," he said
Outside the court, Baudrillard told reporters he was "happy" with the jury's decision
"Therefore, I will contribute in the near future to a number of organizations that help victims of sexual assault defend themselves."
"I want to help those whose voices should also be heard."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Instead, Kim gave her one of her mother’s dresses to wear which she wore throughout the whole dinner.”
“AdvertisementKim said she realized it wouldn’t be a good idea for her husband to come up.”
“Lawrence said she remembers getting wasted and naked before demanding Kim to “dress her.” Kim claims Jen wanted West to “style” her and ended up getting completely naked.”
“During Kim’s appearance on Jimmy Kimmel Live where Lawrence guest-hosted, the Kardashian sister, and the actress revealed they both got drunk during the dinner.”
“J-Law had words of praise for the reality star’s presence which she claimed was “grounded,” “smart,” “normal,” and “funny.” She said they were all “absolutely lovely” to her.”
“...had dinner with the entire family...”
“Lawrence joked it would probably be a one sided friendship jenniferlawrence A post shared by Jennifer Lawrence jenniferlawrencepx on Feb 23 2018 at 1 35pm PST Lawrence said she wanted to gather as much information as possible before interviewing Kim on Jimmy s show and so she sat down and...”
“During a speaking event at The Wing, Lawrence said she “doesn’t know” if the reality star would consider her an ally.”
“Reportedly, before their appearance together on Jimmy Kimmel Live back in November of 2017, Jen hung out at the Kardashian family home with Kris Jenner and the rest of the clan.”
“The 27-year-old actress claims she has been a fan of the reality series, Keeping Up With The Kardashians, for a long time.”


"Instead, Kim gave her a skirt of her mother's for the whole dinner party."
"The ad says she realized that her husband's coming up was not a good idea."
Lawrence said she remembers being wasted and naked before asking Kim to "dress her.". Kim said that Jennifer wanted West to "shape" her but ended up naked
"When Jim Kimmel appeared at the scene of Lawrence guest hosted Jimmy Kimmel, Kardashian's sister and actress revealed that they were both drunk at dinner."
"J-law is full of praise for the appearance of this reality TV star. She said these words are 'grounded', 'smart', 'normal' and 'interesting'. She said these words were "absolutely lovely" to her
“… Dinner with the family... "
"Lawrence joked that it could be a one-sided friendship. On February 23, 2018, at 1:35 p.m. PST, Jennifer Lawrence posted a post shared by Jennifer Lawrence Jennifer Lawrence Parker. Lawrence said that she wanted to collect as much information as possible before Jimmy's program interviewed Kim, so she sat down... "
Lawrence said she "didn't know" whether the reality star would see her as an ally
"It's reported that before they showed up at the Jimmy Kimmel scene together in November 2017, Jennifer and Chris Jenner and other members of the tribe were hanging out at Kardashian's house."
"The 27 year old actress claims she has been a fan of reality TV series for a long time and has been in touch with the kardashians."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Harry and Meghan s highly anticipated wedding on May 19”
“With an eye on the future, and an already unflinching sense of duty, she made a commitment,” he told the delegates.”
“Harry, 33, said in a major speech on Monday that he is “grateful” Meghan, 36, will be at his side to help young peoples’ voices to be heard as he begins a new role as the Commonwealth Youth Ambassador.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Making his first address since being appointed to the position by his grandmother Queen Elizabeth Harry said I am incredibly grateful that the woman I am about to marry Meghan will be joining me in this work of which she too is hugely excited to take part in As he...”
“...plans his first year in the job he told delegates at the opening of the 11th Commonwealth Youth Forum in London I know that serving as an ambassador to young people I am going to have to try to keep up with you Image zoom Credit SIMON DAWSON AFP Getty...”
“Harry and Meghan will undertake tours to Commonwealth countries and convene meetings in the U K to discuss how best we can make Commonwealth platforms work for you and to ensure maximum impact he said...”
“Both here in the U K and as I travel my job will be to listen to you Friends of the prince have told PEOPLE that he and Meghan see the Commonwealth as a perfect place for their international philanthropic activities which match a lot of the charity work Meghan...”
“...had done before she joined the royal fold...”
“They are set to take part in some Commonwealth events later this week.”


"Harry and Megan's wedding on May 19 is highly anticipated"
"She is committed to the future with an unshakable sense of responsibility," he told the delegates
Harry, 33, said in an important speech Monday that he was "grateful" to Megan, 36, for being heard to help young people around him as he embarked on a new role as Commonwealth youth ambassador
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Since he was appointed to this position by his grandmother Queen Elizabeth and queen Harry, he said for the first time," I am very grateful that the woman who is going to marry Megan will join me. She is also very excited to participate in this work because he... "
“…… Planning his first year of work, he told delegates at the opening ceremony of the 11th Commonwealth Youth Forum in London, "I know that as a youth ambassador, I will have to try to keep up with you."
"Harry and Megan will visit Commonwealth countries and hold a meeting in the UK to discuss how to make the Commonwealth platform work for you and ensure maximum impact," he said
"Whether in England or when I travel, my job is to listen to you. The prince's friends tell people that he and Megan think the Commonwealth is the perfect place for their international charity activities, which match many of Megan's charity work..."
“… Before she joined the royal family
"They are going to take part in some Commonwealth events later this week."



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Jessica Alba Shares Cute Pic of Baby Hayes SleepingJessica Alba Reveals How She Makes 'Us Time' With Husband Cash WarrenGigi Hadid Color Coordinates With Mom Yolanda and Sister Bella on Her Golden BirthdayRelated Gallery...”
“I say it every year, but I’ll never get used to how quickly time flies," he wrote.”
“The Honest Co. co-founder turned 37 on Saturday, and she celebrated with lots of love from her family.”
“Alba shared a trio of snaps to her Instagram Story on her big day.”
“The first was a look at her breakfast in bed, which included a syrup-covered waffle, omelet and strips of bacon.”
“The yummy spread was framed by birthday presents covered in pink-and-black patterned wrapping paper and tied together with black bows and topped with two cards, which one of her kids appears to be reaching for.”
“Jessica Alba/InstagramThe Sin City star had to work on her birthday, but she still got to spend time with her kids!”
“Alba shares three children with husband Cash Warren -- daughters Honor, 9, and Haven, 6, and a 3-month-old son, Hayes -- and she was joined by her younger two as she got her hair and makeup done for the event.”
“"When mama works on her bday -kiddos came to give me some lovin," the proud mom captioned the sweet Boomerang.”
“Jessica Alba/InstagramAlba was clearly feeling joyous, as she shared a video of the massive amount of flowers she received, captioned, "Overwhelmed with the love thank you so much!"”


"Embedded code restart" content: Jessica Alba shares a lovely picture of baby Hayes sleeping. Jessica Alba shows how she created "American time" with her husband, KASH wallenge Hadid, and coordinated with her mother, Yolanda, and sister, Bella, in the gallery related to her golden birthday... "
"I say that every year, but I'll never get used to time passing so fast," he wrote
"The honest co-founder turned 37 last Saturday and celebrated with the love of her family."
"Alba shared three snapshots of the instagram story on her big day."
"First, watch her breakfast in bed, including molasses, waffles, omelets and bacon sticks."
"This delicious card is framed with a birthday present wrapped in pink and black paper. It's tied with a black bow. There are two cards on it. One of her children seems to be reaching for it."
"Jessica Alba / instagram, the star of sin city, has to work on her birthday, but she still wants to be with the children!"
Alba and her husband, KASH Warren, have three children. They are 9-year-old daughter honor and 6-year-old Haiwen, and a 3-month-old son Hayes. Their two youngest daughters also took part in the event, making her hair and make-up
"When mom works on her birthday, the children come to give me some love," the proud mom headline with a sweet boomerang
"Jessica Alba / instagram alba is obviously very happy because she shared a video of her receiving a lot of flowers with the title:" overwhelmed by love, thank you so much! "



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Thrilled to be on board and working with such a top-notch team.””
“It’s a brilliant show and we have a tough act to follow but what a gift to be playing the fascinating and greatly loved Queen Mother.”
“I’m very aware it’s a formidably talented family to be joining, but reliably informed I have the ears for the part and will fit right in.”Bailey added, “Wonderful to be joining The Crown.”
“Seasons 3 and 4 will follow some of the most turbulent events in the Prince of Wales’s life and our national story and I’m excited to be bringing to life the man in the midst of it all.”
“O’Connor, said, “I am thrilled to be joining The Firm for the next instalment of The Crown.”
“It comes as production on season three is in full swing ahead of a 2019 launch.”
“O’Connor, who also starred in Florence Foster Jenkins, replaces Julian Baring, while Bailey replaces Victoria Hamilton.”
“Josh O’Connor (God’s Own Country) and Marion Bailey (Allied) have joined the cast of the Left Bank Pictures-produced drama for season three.”
“The Crown has found its Prince Charles and Queen Mother.”


"I'm very happy to join such a first-class team."
"It's a wonderful performance, we have a tough action, but playing charming, deeply loved queen mother is how a gift."
"I know it's a very talented family to join the crown, but I have every reason to believe that I will be in it soon." Bailey added, "it's nice to be in the crown."
"The third and fourth seasons will tell about some of the most turbulent events in the life of the prince of Wales and the story of our country, and I am very happy to revive this man in these events."
"O'Connor," he said, "I'm happy to join the company and prepare for the next crown issue."
"It's at a time when production for the third quarter is in full swing before it goes on sale in 2019."
"O'Connor, who is also starring foster Jenkins in Florence, replaces Julian Balin, while Bailey replaces Victoria Hamilton."
"Josh O'Connor (God's country) and Marion Bailey (Allied forces) joined the left bank film company's production for season three."
"The royal family has found Prince Charles and the queen mother."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'She feels great.'”
“'She wanted to get back to a healthy place,' a source added.”
“News reports Bieber was aware of Gomez's decision to seek treatment and fully supported her decision.”
“E!”
“Selena reportedly sought professional help in New York City, months after she unfollowed her mother, Mandy Teefey, on Instagram following rumours the pair had argued over her rekindled romance with Justin.”
“'It was all about wellness and her health.'”
“'She had a difficult year, especially towards the end, and she decided she wanted to spend some time focusing on herself,' a source told the news outlet.”
“News has confirmed the 25-year-old recently completed a two-week treatment programme for depression and anxiety.”
“...separated in recent weeks...”


"She feels great."
"She wants to go back to a healthy place," one source added
"The news reports that Bieber is aware of Gomez's decision to seek treatment and fully supports her decision."
“E！”
"Serena is reported to be seeking professional help in New York City after releasing her mother, Mandy teefey, on instagram a few months ago, after rumors that they had quarreled over her renewed relationship with Justin."
"It's all about health and her health."
"She had a difficult year, especially towards the end, and she decided to spend some time focusing on herself," one source told the news media
"It has been confirmed that the 25-year-old recently completed a two-week treatment plan for depression and anxiety."
“… I've been separated in recent weeks... "



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“Heathers premieres on Paramount Network on Wednesday, March 7, at 10 p.m.”
“Just wait!”
“Paramount Network released the a NSFW trailer for the adaptation of the 1988 cult comedy on Thursday, January 18, and the claws are really coming out.”
“The NSFW video provides the first glance at Shannen Doherty’s return – and yes, she’s still wearing the red bow.”
“She’s also carrying a gun!”
““Whatever you do, make sure it matters,” the actress says.”
“Series creator Jason Micallef has kept very quiet about what role Doherty will be taking on in the dark reboot, but did confirm she’ll be in three episodes.”
““She is in the very first scene of the very first episode.”
“That’s all I got for you,” he told reporters at the 2018 Television Critics Association’s Winter Press Tour on Monday, January 15.”


"Wait a minute."
Heather will premiere on paramount TV at 10 p.m. on Wednesday, March 7
"Wait!"
"Paramount network released a trailer adapted by nsfw for the 1988 cult comedy on January 18 (Thursday), and the talons really came out."
"The nsfw video first saw the return of Shannen Doherty - yes, she's still wearing a red bow."
"She still has a gun!"
"Whatever you do, make sure it's important," the actress said
"Jason michallef, the creator of the show, has been silent about what role Doherty will play in the dark, but she did confirm that Doherty will play in three episodes."
"She's in the first act of episode one."
"That's all I give you," he told reporters on Monday, January 15, at the 2018 TV Review Association winter reporter tour



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Wilkinson joins Jai Rodriguez for the show, which will be held until January 2018.”
“She tweeted, “Sooooo sorry guys gotta cancel both shows tonight.”
“The former Playboy Playmate tweeted she was “super sick” and was forced to cancel her two performances of “Sex Tips for Straight Women From a Gay Guy” Sunday night at the Paris Las Vegas Hotel and Casino.”
“"Super sick.”
“Going to have to cancel the late show tonight.”
“My heart couldn’t cancel both.”
“Sorry late show,” Wilkinson said.”
“The 32-year-old, who is married to Hank Baskett and has two children, said two hours later she had to cancel the second show because she was headed to the emergency room.”
“Going to ER.”
“...she said.”


"Wilkinson will perform with Jay Rodriguez and the performance will last until January 2018."
"I'm sorry, both programs are going to be cancelled tonight," she tweeted
The former Playboy tweeted that she was "very ill" and was forced to cancel two "homosexual sex tips for heterosexual women" performances at Las Vegas hotels and casinos in Paris on Sunday night
"Super pervert."
"Tonight's show is off."
"My heart can't offset both."
"Sorry for being late for the show," Wilkinson said
The 32 year old married Hank Basquet and had two children. Two hours later, she said she had to cancel her second show because she was going to the emergency room
"Go to the emergency room."
“…… She said



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This suggests she’s due in mid-late April – and we can not wait to find out the baby’s name!”
“Then last month, Khloe hinted at her due date with a photo celebrating “officially 6 months”.”
“She’s finding pregnancy sex pretty confronting and awkward – and she’s keen to talk about it.”
“Quel surprise!”
““For me it’s been interesting”Khloe’s pregnant with her first baby, with partner Tristan Thompson, and it’s fair to say that she’s already pretty closely acquainted with the pregnancy journey, thanks to her family.”
“Sister Kourtney has three kids, Kim also has three (carrying two of them herself) and her sister Kylie has a newborn.”
“Tristan’s already navigated pregnancy, albeit in a separated way, too.”
“He’s dad to one-year-old Prince with former partner Jordan Craig.”
“Khloe said she’d heard things about sexuality during pregnancy, and is now having her own evolving experience.”
““I have always heard that women are extra horny when they’re pregnant,” Khloe posted on her blog, “but for me it’s been interesting.”“Uncomfortable and limiting”Khloe says she’s feeling considerably less nimble in the sack, but is attempting to adapt to her new dimensions.”


"It means she'll be born in mid to late April - we can't wait to know the child's name!"
Last month, Chloe hinted at her due date with a picture celebrating "six months officially."
"She found it challenging and embarrassing to have sex after pregnancy - she wanted to talk about it."
"Surprise me!"
"It's fun for me," says Khloe, who is pregnant with her first child and is with her partner Tristan Thompson. She is already familiar with the process of pregnancy, thanks to her family
"Sister Courtney has three children, Kim has three children (with two of her own) and her sister Kelly has a new baby."
"Tristan is pregnant, though separate."
"He and his former partner, Jordan Craig, are the father of the one year old prince."
"Khloe said she heard about sex during her pregnancy and now has her own evolutionary experience."
"I've always heard that women are particularly sexy when they're pregnant," Khloe said on her blog, "but it's fun for me." "Uncomfortable and limited," says Khloe, who feels less flexible in her sleeping bag, but is trying to adapt to her new life



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In January, Baldwin called criticism of Allen over longstanding sexual abuse allegations “unfair and sad.” The actor also referred to the long list of former collaborators who have since denounced the director and pledged to never work with him again.”
“Toback denied the allegations to the L.A. Times, claiming it would be “biologically impossible” for him to do what he was accused of because he has had diabetes and a heart condition for 22 years.”
“In the wake of the report, numerous famous actresses also spoke out about their alleged interactions with Toback, including Selma Blair, Rachel McAdams, and Julianne Moore.”
“The paper later reported that more than 300 women have come forward with similar allegations.”
“Toback, 73, was initially accused of sexual misconduct by 38 women in the Los Angeles Times story.”
“Allen was not charged, though a Connecticut prosecutor said there was probable cause for a criminal case.”
“The allegation, which he denies, first surfaced in 1992, when Dylan was 7, during a bitter custody battle between Allen and his ex-partner Mia Farrow.”
“He has been repeatedly accused in the past of child molestation by his daughter Dylan Farrow.”
“Up movement has gained momentum...”
“If they re convicted of a crime well then you re sad and that s tragic but they ve got to go through that process Image zoom Credit Monica Schipper WireImage Rob Kim Getty Jimi Celeste Patrick McMullan Getty Allen 82 has come under fire recently as the Time s...”


In January, Baldwin called the criticism of Allen's long-term sexual abuse charges "unfair and deplorable.". The actor also mentioned a long list of former collaborators who later denounced the director and promised not to work with him again
Tobak denied the charges to the Los Angeles Times, claiming that he was "biologically impossible" to do what he was accused of because he had diabetes and heart disease for 22 years
After the report was published, many famous actresses also publicly expressed their association with Tobac, including Selma Blair, Rachel McAdams and Julian Moore
"The newspaper later reported that more than 300 women had made similar charges."
"Tobak, 73, was initially accused of sexual misconduct by 38 women in a Los Angeles Times report."
Although a Connecticut prosecutor said there might be a reason for the criminal case, Allen was not charged
The charge, which he denies, first appeared in 1992, when Dylan was seven years old, in a fierce custody battle between Allen and his former partner Mia Farrow
"He has been accused of child molestation by his daughter Dylan Farrow many times in the past."
"The momentum of upward movement is strong..."
"If they are found guilty again, then you will feel sad, it's a tragedy, but they have to go through the process of image zooming credit card Monica shipper WireImage Robert kinggetty Jimmy Celeste Patrick McMullen Getty Allen 82 recently attacked time s..." "



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See if she’s right by tuning in to ABC, Thursdays at 10 p.m. for the remaining four episodes of the series and watch the retrospective video above.”
“They don’t call it Shondaland for nothing, after all.”
““The only human that’s guaranteed a happy ending is Shonda Rhimes,” says Pope.”
““I think Olivia’s one true love is Fitz.”But in the end, it’s likely there’ll only be one truly happy person in the Scandal universe.”
““No, absolutely not,” Goldwyn declares.”
“According to Scott Foley, Jake “would like to be back on the island with Olivia,” but not if Fitz (Tony Goldwyn) has anything to say about it.”
“Those tears might not be reserved for off-camera moments, as ultimately someone will be walking away brokenhearted.”
““I think for our last day on set there will be lots of waterproof mascara,” says Bellamy Young (Mellie Grant).”
“As for the last day of shooting?”
““After seven years of being together, we are very, very, very, very tight,” adds Katie Lowes (Quinn Perkins) as the video flashes back to on-set moments celebrating landmarks and behind-the-scenes footage from the final episodes.”


"See if she's right, listen to ABC at 10 p.m. on Thursday, watch the remaining four episodes, and then watch the review video above."
"After all, they don't call it shandalan for nothing."
"The only person who can guarantee a happy ending is seanda Reims," Pope said
"I think Olivia's only true love is Fitz." But in the end, there is probably only one truly happy person in the scandal world
"No, absolutely not," Godwin said
According to Scott Foley, Jack "would love to go back to the island with Olivia," but not if Fitz (Tony Goldwin) has anything to say about it
"Those tears may not stay out of the camera, because eventually someone will leave heartbroken."
"I think we will have a lot of waterproof mascara on the last day of the studio," said Bellamy Yang (Mealey Grant).
"As for the last day of shooting?"
"After seven years together, we're very, very, very close," Katie Lois (Quinn Perkins) added, adding that the video flashed back to the scene celebrating the landmark moment and the scenes of the last few episodes



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m a lucky woman ❤ Happy Anniversary Baby.”While Kidman got sentimental, Urban opted for a silly candid shot.”
“Still feels like it was yesterday,” the actress captioned the footage.”
““Remembering 12 years ago today at a church in Manly, Australia.”
“...kissing and laughing on their wedding day...”
“We call it the road trip We sleep in bunk beds and we get to see and fall in love with different parts of America Image zoom Nicole Kidman and Keith Urban Credit Steve Granitz WireImage While celebrating their most recent anniversary Kidman shared a short video of the pair...”
““We go out on the tour regularly,” she says.”
“For more about Nicole, check out this week’s issue of PEOPLE, on newsstands FridayImage zoom Keith Urban and Nicole Kidman | Credit: Evan The Oscar winner also speaks warmly about spending time with her husband during the country singer’s many tours.”
“The couple shares daughters Sunday Rose, 9, and Faith Margaret, 7.”
“It’s just between the two of you.”Kidman and Urban, 50, who tied the knot in 2006, celebrated their 12th anniversary last week.”
““Nobody else has that.”


"I'm a lucky woman ❤  When Kidman became sentimental, urban chose a stupid, candid shot
"It still feels like yesterday," the actress added a caption to the camera
"Think of today, 12 years ago, in a church in Manley, Australia."
“… Kissing and laughing at their wedding... "
"We call it a road trip, we sleep in bunk beds, we see and fall in love with pictures of different parts of the United States zooming Nicole Kidman and Keith city credit Steve granitz WireImage, while celebrating their recent anniversary, Kidman shared a short video of the two..."
"We travel a lot," she said
"To learn more about Nicole, read this week's People magazine, Friday at the newsstand. Picture: zoom Keith Urban and Nicole Kidman | source: Oscar winner Evan also talks enthusiastically about spending time with her husband on the country singer's many tours. "
"The couple have two daughters, 9-year-old Sunday Ross and 7-year-old faith Margaret."
"It's just between the two of you." Kidman and urban, 50, married in 2006 and celebrated their 12th anniversary last week
"No one else."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After he served time in prison for felony gun charges, Meeks was signed to a modeling agency, attending fashion week and making friends with industry A-listers.”
“Much love Jeremy & Chloe.”Baby Jayden is the first child for Green, 27.”
“The famed “hot felon” has welcomed a son with girlfriend Chloe Green, they announced on Instagram Thursday alongside a picture of their little one’s tiny hands.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We are pleased to announce the birth of our beautiful baby boy Jayden Meeks-Green,” both Meeks, 34, and Topshop heiress Green captioned the sweet image.”
““Born May 29th 2018.”
“Mommy and Baby both doing well,” they continued.”
““We kindly ask to respect our privacy please.”
“Meeks shares 8-year-old son Jeremy Jr. with ex Melissa Meeks, whom he was married to for eight years and separated from in July.”
““When I think about it sometimes I still get emotional, especially looking at old pictures.”Image zoom Chloe Green and Jeremy Meeks | Credit: Shanice King/246paps / MEGAMeeks first gained fame back in 2014 when his mugshot went viral.”


"After serving a prison sentence for a felony with a gun, Mikes was signed up to a modeling agency to attend fashion week and make friends with A-list stars in the industry."
"I love Jeremy and Chloe very much." Baby Jaden is green's first child, 27
They announced on instagram on Thursday that the well-known "spice girl" and girlfriend Chloe green have ushered in a son, along with a picture of their little hands
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Both micks, 34, and Topshop heiress green inscribed the sweet picture: "we are happy to announce the birth of our beautiful baby boy, Jaden micks green."
"Born on May 29, 2018."
"Mom and baby are fine," they continued
"Please respect our privacy."
"Mikes and former Melissa Mikes share an 8-year-old son, Jeremy Jr., who was married to Melissa Mikes for 8 years and separated in July."
"When I think about it, sometimes I'm still emotional, especially looking at old photos." Image zooming: Chloe green and Jeremy Meeks | image source: shanice King / 246 PAPS / megameeks first became famous in 2014, when his photos went viral on the Internet



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Shop Boy Brow now at glossier.com.”
“It's a creamy, conditioning pomade (inspired by old-fashioned mustache wax) that, when brushed on with a tiny little precision-minded spoolie, fluffs up brow hairs and keeps them there all day with flexible hold—no crunchy gel vibes.”
“Well, friends, the day has arrived.”
“Today, we're very proud to introduce you to the latest Glossier product: Boy Brow!”
“As Annie said roughly a month ago, there's no such thing as the Perfect Brow.”
“We're in the midst of a revolution—a revolution that states that the best brows are the brows you were born with.”
“Reference points include Cara Delevingne (obviously), backstage beauty of the last, oh, three years, and all these boys, hence the name.”
“The look is fluffy, full, and untouched.”
“Even if you were among the population affected by the Great Overpluck of the 1990s, you too can get back to the brow nature intended you to have.”
“You just need a product that cares as much about your brows as you do.”


"Now shop boy brows" glossier.com Website. "
"This is a creamy conditioning oil (inspired by the old Hu Xula). When it is brushed up with a small, accurate spool, it will fluff the eyebrows and keep them there all day, elastic, without crunching gel flavour."
"Well, friends, it's time."
"Today, we are very proud to introduce you to the latest glossiness product: boy eyebrows!"
"Annie said about a month ago that there are no perfect eyebrows."
"We are in the middle of a revolution - a revolution that shows that the best eyebrows are those you were born with."
"Reference points include Carla delaviny (apparently), backstage beauties of the past three years, and all these boys, so it's named."
"It looks fluffy, plump and unaffected."
"Even if you're one of the people affected by the super luck of the 1990s, you can go back to the natural brow state you want."
"You just need a product that cares about eyebrows as much as you do."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I make my own pastry, roll it out and everything.””
““I cook a mean chicken and sweetcorn pie, with Alfredo sauce.”
““I’ve got into a thing of cooking pies recently,” he revealed.”
“In fact, the model has taken on some of his Britishism, including a love of pies.”
“In LA [his own usual US base], it’s more catered to these things — you’ve got back entrances and that.”Luckily for Zayn, it seems that Gigi doesn’t mind staying in and relaxing.”
“So they’re going to get pictures, they’re going to find you.”
“But there’s no underground parking here [in London], no escape routes.”
““In New York [where Gigi is based], you can sometimes get out in the early hours of the morning for a walk.”
““I don’t think there’s anywhere I could be anonymous now,” he shared.”
“And in this interview, the “Pillowtalk” singer again discussed how he copes with the loss of anonymity.”


"I make my own cakes, roll them up or something."
"I made a chicken and sweet corn pie with Alfredo Sauce."
"I've been very interested in making pies recently," he revealed
"In fact, the model has shown some of his Anglicism, including a love of pies."
"In Los Angeles (his usual U.S. base), it's more suitable for these things - you have a back door or something." Fortunately, Gigi doesn't seem to mind staying in and relaxing
"So they'll take pictures and find you."
"But there's no underground parking here, no escape route."
"In New York, you can sometimes go for a walk early in the morning."
"I don't think there's any place now where I can be anonymous," he said
In this interview, the "pillow talk" singer once again discussed how he could cope with the loss of anonymity



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He would never leave his unlocked home without those items nor his 7 beloved dogs.””
““This is not like Chris,” she wrote.”
“As previously reported, the Mannequin star posted a message on Sunday describing her sibling as “a one of a kind brother,” and adding that the 55-year-old’s keys, cell phone and wallet were left on the table in his home and his front door was unlocked.”
“Laurel Scott told Global News that his body was located somewhere on his property on Sunday, but didn’t specify whether he was found inside or outside the house.”
“Cpl.”
“Police said the death was not considered suspicious.”
“The Royal Canadian Mounted Police told CBC News on Sunday that Christopher’s body had been found and their investigation into his disappearance had concluded.”
“...who disappeared from his home in Alberta on Tuesday January 30”
“At this time we ask for privacy but we want to thank you all on social media for your outpouring of love and support in this trying time Earlier in the day the actress who grew up in Canada had posted a message asking for assistance in locating her brother...”
““It is with great sadness that myself and my family announce the unexpected passing of our son and brother, Chris Cattrall,” the Sex and the City alum, 61, captioned an Instagram photo of herself and her brother on Sunday, February 4.”


"He will never leave his home without locks, without these things, or his beloved seven dogs."
"It's not like Chris," she wrote
"As previously reported, the mannequin star released a message on Sunday calling her brothers and sisters" amiable brothers, "adding that the 55 year old girl's keys, mobile phone and wallet were all on her desk and the front door was unlocked
Laurel Scott told global news that his body was somewhere in his home on Sunday, but did not say whether he was found inside or outside the house
“Cpl.”
"Police said the death was not considered suspicious."
"The Royal Canadian Mounted Police told CBC News on Sunday that Christopher's body had been found and that their investigation into his disappearance was over."
“… He disappeared from his home in Alberta on Tuesday, January 30. "
"At this time, we ask for privacy, but we want to thank all of you on social media for your love and support at this difficult time. Earlier in the day, the actress who grew up in Canada sent a message asking for help in finding her brother..."
"It is with great sadness that my family and I announce the accidental death of our son and brother, Chris cattellar," the 61 year old sex and the city alumni wrote an inscription for himself and his brother in an instagram photo on Sunday, February 4



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#love”Jonathan, 36, is best known for his role as Aaron Samuels in Mean Girls and Jaymes, 34, is a TV host who was once on The Amazing Race.”
“I’m the luckiest.”
“Makes me look better.”
“In one of them look dapper in their suits he wrote, “This guy looks better.”
““i Love you babe,” Jonathan captioned a Halloween post.”
“Jonathan seems to have deleted most of his posts that included Jaymes, but he has put up some new ones and he also confirms their relationship in them!”
“Even though the guys have been together for quite a while now and haven’t been shy about their relationship on Instagram, news outlets seemed to pick up the relationship this week.”
“Jonathan Bennett has confirmed something that anyone who follows his Instagram account already pretty much knew – he’s dating Jaymes Vaughan!”


Jonathan, 36, is best known for his role as Aaron Samuel in mean girl. James, 34, a TV host, once participated in this wonderful competition
"I'm the luckiest."
"Make me look better."
"One of them looks smart in a suit," he wrote. "This guy looks much better."
"I love you, baby," Jonathan wrote in his Halloween post
"Jonathan seems to have deleted most of the posts, including James, but he has published some new posts, and he has confirmed their relationship!"
"Although the two have been together for a long time, and there is no taboo about their relationship on instagram, the news media seems to be paying attention to it this week."
"Jonathan Bennett has confirmed something anyone who follows his instagram account already knows - he's dating James Vaughn!"



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The police were not there to help us.”
“Their relationship with the Ramseys completely broke down when they threatened to refuse to release JonBenét’s body for burial unless the Ramseys came in for an interview, and there were frequent leaks from the Boulder police department to the media.”
“She had been bashed over the head, strangled with a garrote fashioned out of a nylon cord and her mother’s paintbrush, and possibly sexually assaulted.”
“When he brought her upstairs, it was obvious she had been dead for some time.”
“He went down to the basement with a friend and there he saw his daughter, bound and gagged.”
“After the kidnappers failed to call at the promised time, one of the officers suggested to John that he look around the family’s large house.”
“The police arrived at the Ramsey house, along with many of the Ramseys’ friends, who wandered freely around the property.”
“She had found a two-and-a-half-page ransom note demanding $118,000 for her safe return.”
“Her daughter had been taken from their home in the middle of the night, she said.”
“The few undisputed facts are as follows: just before 6am on 26 December, Patsy called the Boulder police department from her home.”


"The police are not here to help us."
"Their relationship with the Ramsey couple was completely broken. They threatened to refuse to release giobennet's body for burial unless the Ramsey couple came for an interview, and the boulder police often leaked secrets to the media."
"She was hit in the head, strangled by a nylon rope throat and her mother's brush, and possibly sexually assaulted."
"When he took her upstairs, it was clear that she had been dead for some time."
"He went down to the basement with a friend, where he saw his daughter, tied and gagged."
The kidnappers didn't call at the appointed time, and one of the police officers suggested that John go to see the big house
"The police came to Ramsey's house with many of Ramsey's friends, and they wandered around the house."
"She found a two-and-a-half-page ransom note demanding $118000 to return safely."
"Her daughter was taken from her home in the middle of the night," she said
"The few undisputed facts are as follows: just before 6 a.m. on December 26, Passy called the boulder police station from his home."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“23 Le Metier de Beaute Neck and Decollete Firming Creme, $450This astonishingly expensive cream claims to smooth and tighten the delicate skin around the neck and collarbone.”
“Ingredients include the oils and essences of oranges, elderberries, starflowers, grapes, coconuts and geraniums, which are all ‘supercharged’ with an anti-ageing algae.”
“It uses the acid produced when the exotic fruit ferments.”
“6 Rhonda Allison Moisture Eye-Zyme, $16Tones and firms the upper and lower lids while minimising fine lines and erasing crepey tissue.”
“Other Rhonda Allison fans include Sarah Jessica Parker and Mila Kunis.”
“However, the spritz works best if kept in the fridge.”
“5 Rhonda Allison Cucumber Spritz, $26Described as ‘giving skin a drink of water’, it is made from cucumber, coconut oil, witch hazel and honey.”
“4 Cygalle Healing Spa aromatherapy facial mist, $25Infused with jojoba oil, this spray was sold as part of a Valentine’s Day set so may have been a gift from husband Michael Douglas, 72.”
“Fans include Beyonce and Elle Macpherson.”
“Contains a skin-plumping compound, fermentus glaciarum.”


"23 Le Metier de Beaute Neck and Decollete compact cream, worth 450 US dollars, this amazing price cream is known to heal and compact the delicate skin around neck and clavicle."
"Ingredients include orange, elderberry, star flower, grape, coconut and Geranium oil and essence. These are super pressurized anti-aging seaweeds.
"It uses the acid produced by the fermentation of exotic fruit."
"6 Ronda Allison eye moisturizing enzyme, $16 tons and firm upper and lower eyelids, while minimizing fine lines and eliminating wrinkle tissue."
"Other fans of Ronda Allison include Sarah Jessica Parker and Mira Kunis."
However, Sprite works best in the refrigerator
"5 Rhonda Alison cucumber spray, priced at $260, has been described as" giving a cup of water to the skin. "It is made from cucumber, coconut oil, Hamamelis and honey.
"4 Cygalle Healing Spa aromatherapy facial spray, worth 25 US dollars, is injected into jojoba oil. This spray is part of Valentine's Day suit, so it may be a gift from Michael Douglas, 72 years old."
"Fans include Beyonce and Al MacPherson."
It contains a skin filling compound, the enzyme glacial bacteria



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the court ruling, it was determined Syed’s original trial attorney had demonstrated “deficient performance” and “prejudiced Syed’s defense” by failing to pursue witness Asia McClain, who presented a possible alibi for Syed on Serial.”
“Syed awaits a retrial for the 1999 murder of Lee after the Maryland Court of Special Appeals affirmed a lower court’s ruling to overturn Syed’s conviction.”
“No premiere date has been announced.”
“Amy Berg directed the docuseries, which features original music from Nick Cave and Warren Ellis.”
“The docuseries also promises to present “new discoveries” and “groundbreaking revelations” from the case that could upend the prosecution’s conviction of Syed.”
“The Case Against Adnan Syed also touts exclusive access to Syed, his defense team and family, as well as interviews with Baltimore law enforcement officials, Hae Min Lee’s friends and teachers and more.”
“...trial the network said Wednesday...”
“In production since 2015 The Case Against Adnan Syed closely re examines the events leading up to Hae Min Lee s disappearance from high school romance forbidden love and cultural conflict to the aftermath of her disappearance the original police investigation and the present day when Syed awaits a new...”
“HBO will explore the murder case against Adnan Syed, whose conviction in the 1999 killing of Hae Min Lee was the focus of the hit podcast Serial, in an upcoming four-hour documentary series.”


In the court ruling, said's trial lawyer showed "poor performance" and "biased against said's defense" for failing to trace witness Asia McClain. In a series of cases, Asia McLean provided said with possible alibi
"After the Maryland special court of appeal confirmed the lower court's decision to overturn said's conviction, said waited for a retrial of Lee's murder in 1999."
"No premiere date has been announced yet."
"Amy Berg directed doc users, which features original music by Nick keff and Warren Ellis."
Docusers also promised to provide "new findings" and "breakthrough enlightenment" of the case, which may overturn the prosecution's conviction of said
"The lawsuit against Adnan said also advocates exclusive contact with said, his defense team and family, as well as interviews with Baltimore law enforcement officials, Li Haimin's friends and teachers."
“… The trial website said, "Wednesday..."
"In the production since 2015, the case of Adnan said has carefully re examined the events that led to Li Haimin's disappearance from high school romance, love and cultural conflict to her disappearance, the initial police investigation and said's waiting for a new day..."
"HBO will explore Adnan said's murder in the upcoming four hour documentary series. His conviction in the murder of Li Haimin in 1999 is the focus of a popular podcast series."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The Arrangement” Season 2 premieres March 11 on E!”
“...many things not being said Henderson says...”
“...to keep up the ruse so she can keep her relationship with Kyle Josh Henderson but that relationship is going to get a lot more complicated...”
““One of the lines we’re exploring this season is when you’re coming from a place of anger and revenge, how sustainable is that?,” creator Jonathan Abrahams tells Variety.”
““It’s so much about emotion and passion in that world, and there’s so much emotion and passion between Megan and Kyle, but how sustainable is that?”
“For a while that s the thing that s worth fighting for but then you have to ask if you can ever get back to that While Megan and Kyle are moving forward in their relationship and contract by planning a wedding Evangelista says the honeymoon phase of their relationship...”
“...is over and now they are faced with questions of trust and whether or not the fantasy can withstand time...”
“There’s also the question of whose vision this wedding truly is, given that it was just one of many milestones she promised to mark when she signed the relationship agreement in the first place.”
““It’s not Megan’s vision, it’s not Kyle’s vision, it’s something else,” Evangelista says.”
““There’s always this other force around them, so it’s this young girl having incredible moments, something she’s fantasized about her whole life, and it’s out of her control in a lot of ways.”


The second season of arrangement premiered on March 11
“…… Henderson said a lot that he didn't say... "
“… Continue the trick so she can maintain her relationship with Kyle Josh Henderson, but it's going to get more complicated... "
"One of the lines we're going to explore this season is, how sustainable is it when you come from a place full of anger and revenge? "Creator Jonathan Abraham told variety
"There's so much emotion and passion in that world, so much emotion and passion between Megan and Kyle, but how sustainable is that?"
"There was a time when it was worth fighting for, but you have to ask if you can go back when Megan and Kyle move forward in their relationship and contract and plan the wedding." Evangelista said the honeymoon phase of their relationship
“…… It's over. Now they are faced with the problem of trust, and whether the fantasy can stand the test of time... "
"There's another question, whose vision is this wedding, because it's just one of the many milestones she promised to commemorate when she signed the love agreement."
"It's not Megan's illusion, it's not Kyle's illusion, it's something else," Evangelista said
"There is always another power around them, so this young girl has incredible moments, which she has been dreaming about all her life, and many aspects are beyond her control."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Published in Daily Times, August 10th 2017.”
“We had to re-fall for each other.”We’d miss Hemsworth too if we were Cyrus!”
““Suddenly you’re like, ‘I don’t recognise you anymore’.”
“And changing with someone else not changing like that is too hard,” she says.”
““I needed to change so much.”
“Earlier this year, Cyrus told Billboard that their broken engagement four years earlier was for the best because it made them a better pairing now.”
“The pair got engaged again in early 2016 but have yet to walk down the aisle.”
“Since reconciling after their famous split in 2013, the two stars, who try to keep their high-profile romance under the radar, have been going strong.”
“The two took to social media during the outing and their posts ignited rumours that the two had rekindled their broken romance, which turned out to be true.”
“Back in 2015, Cyrus helped the Aussie actor adopt Dora from Wylder’s Holistic Pet Centre & Rescue in LA’s Studio City neighbourhood.”


"Published in the daily times, August 10, 2017."
"We have to fall in love with each other again." If we were Cyrus, we would miss huntsworth, too
"All of a sudden you say," I don't recognize you anymore. "
"It's hard to change with other people instead of changing like that," she said
"I need to change so much."
"Earlier this year, Cyrus told the billboard that the break-up of their engagement four years ago was the best because it makes them a better partner now."
"The two were engaged again in early 2016, but they have not yet been married."
"Since the famous post breakup settlement in 2013, the two stars who are trying to hide their high-profile relationship under the radar have been very strong."
"The two went on social media during their trip, and their posts ignited the rumor that they had rekindled their lovelorn relationship. It turned out to be true."
"As early as 2015, Cyrus helped the Australian actor adopt Dora from Wilder's integrated PET Center and rescue center in the city block of Los Angeles studio."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She came and joined me for five days out there, which was absolutely fantastic.””
“The couple of course want the day to be a special, celebratory moment for their friends and family.”
“Prince Harry went for a workout at a gym on Tuesday, November 28, just one day after announcing his engagement to Meghan Markle.”
“Harry, 33, wore a beanie and gray sweat suit for the outing.”
“Palace officials revealed on Tuesday, November 28, that the couple will marry at St. George’s Chapel at Windsor Castle in England in May 2018.”
““Her Majesty The Queen has granted permission for the wedding to take place at the Chapel,” Kensington Palace said in a statement.”
““The Royal Family will pay for the wedding.”
“Further details about the wedding will be announced in due course.”Harry’s communications secretary added, “Prince Harry and Ms. Markle are delighted that the beautiful grounds of Windsor Castle will be where they begin their lives together as a married couple.”
“They also want the day to be shaped so as to allow members of the public to feel part of the celebrations too and are currently working through ideas for how this might be achieved.”
““We camped out with each other under the stars,” he said.”


"It's great that she came and stayed out with me for five days."
"The couple certainly want this day to be a special and celebratory time for their friends and family."
On Tuesday, November 28, the day after Prince Harry announced his engagement to Megan markel, he went to the gym to exercise
"Harry, 33, went for an outing in a little nightcap and grey sportswear."
"Palace officials revealed on November 28 (Tuesday) that the couple will be married in May 2018 at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, UK."
"Her Majesty has approved the wedding to be held in the church," Kensington Palace said in a statement
"The royal family pays for the wedding."
"More details about the wedding will be announced in due course," added Prince Harry's communications secretary. "Prince Harry and Ms. markel are happy that the beautiful venue at Windsor Castle will be where they will start living together as a married couple."
"They also hope that the shape of the day will make the public feel part of the celebration, and they are studying how to achieve that."
"We camped under the stars," he said



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We had a moment for the Super Bowl .”
“We're just supporting each other.”
“She was celebrating her birthday with best friend and superstar Beyonce but soon after Kelly Rowland's joy turned to pain.”
“The singer was seen in floods of tears outside Gjelina Restaurant on trendy Abbott Kinney Boulevard in the Venice area after her birthday lunch.”
“It's unclear what caused the upset, but Kelly suddenly appeared overwhelmed by her emotions as sobbed away in the street in LA.”
“So emotional Kelly Rowland was in floods of tears after an emotional birthday lunch in Los Angeles Sobbing away Kelly cried as she stood outside Gjelina Restaurant following a meal with Beyonce and Solange Knowles plus Jay Z Lunch date Beyonce husband Jay Z and sister Solange Knowles joined Kelly...”
“...for lunch at Gjelina restaurant in Venice but Kelly got a bit emotional The star wiped away her tears after dining with former Destiny s Child band mate Beyonce Knowles her rapper husband Jay Z and sister Solange Knowles...”
“As she stood on the side of the road with a friend keeping a watchful eye over her, it was difficult not to notice the vocalist, who donned a bright red top with three-quarter length black and white trousers.”
“She teamed it with a black cardigan and gold drop earrings as well as a chunky bangle and clutch bag.”
“Casual clothing: She teamed her top with black and white three-quarter length trousersLike sisters: Beyonce posted online wishing Kelly Rowland a happy birthdayBut her prim and proper look was compromised as she had to keep removing her large circle sunglasses to wipe her wet cheeks.”


"We spent some time in the Super Cup."
"We're just supporting each other."
"She was celebrating her birthday with her best friend and superstar Beyonce, but soon Kelly Rowland's joy turned into pain."
"After her birthday lunch, the singer was seen in tears outside the gjelina restaurant on the fashionable abbotkini Avenue in Venice."
"It's not clear what caused the uneasiness, but Kelly suddenly became emotional as he sobbed on the streets of Los Angeles."
"So after an emotional birthday lunch in Los Angeles, Kylie Rowland burst into tears. Kylie stood outside Jenna's Restaurant crying and had lunch with Beyonce, Solange Knowles and Jay Z. Beyonce's husband jay z and sister Solange Knowles joined Kylie..."
“… Having lunch at gjelina restaurant in Venice, Kelly was a little emotional. The star wiped away her tears after having dinner with former destiny's nursery rhyme partner, Beyonce Knowles, her rapper husband jay z, and her sister soranch Knowles
"It's hard not to notice the singer when she's standing by the side of the road and a friend is watching her. He's wearing a bright red coat and three quarter length black and white trousers."
"She paired it with a black cardigan and gold pendant earrings, as well as a thick bracelet and a handbag."
"Casual wear: she matches her top with her black and white three quarter length pantyhose sisters: Beyonce sends a post on the Internet to wish Kelly Roland a happy birthday, but her formal style is affected by having to constantly take off her big round sunglasses and wipe her wet cheeks."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...in almost every developed nation...”
“Far from it DMX allegedly went out of his way to evade taxes including by avoiding personal bank accounts setting up accounts in other s names and paying personal expenses largely in cash It looks like the rapper is in serious trouble as deliberately avoiding taxes is a serious crime...”
“Advertisement“But while raking in millions from his songs, DMX didn’t give any of it to the IRS.”
“...dollars as an artist actor and entrepreneur he was deliberately going out of his way to avoid taxes...”
“According to reports he is suspected of engaging in a multi year scheme to conceal millions of dollars of income from the IRS and to avoid paying 1 7 million of tax liabilities U S Attorney Joon H Kim said in his declaration that while DMX was making millions of...”
“The rapper has not come out to comment publicly.”
“As CI readers know, he was charged with tax evasion and fraud and could be convicted for more than 40 years if he’s hit with all the counts.”
“Not long after, he traveled to St. Louis to deal with a “family emergency.”Unfortunately, for the rapper, this trip to St. Louis might leave him with jail-time, as leaving the state when the government tells you not to is a big no-no.”
“Also, in July, authorities contacted the rapper, and he told them he was in Chicago.”
“The representative added DMX claimed he could be drug-free on his own after the government offered him to take drug addiction counseling.”


“…… In almost all developed countries... "
"Instead of deliberately evading taxes, rappers avoid personal bank accounts, open accounts in the name of others, and pay personal expenses mainly in cash. It seems that rap singers are in serious trouble, because tax evasion is a serious crime... "
"Advertising", but although he made millions from his songs, he didn't give it to the IRS
“… As an artist, actor and entrepreneur, he deliberately tried every means to evade taxes. "
"He is reported to be involved in a multi-year plan to conceal millions of dollars in IRS revenue and avoid paying $1.7 million in tax obligations. In his statement, US prosecutor Joon h Kim said that although the DMX made millions of dollars.... "
"The rapper hasn't come out to comment publicly yet."
"As Ci readers know, he is charged with tax evasion and fraud, and if he is charged with all the charges, he could be sentenced to more than 40 years in prison."
Soon after, he went to St. Louis to deal with a "family emergency.". Unfortunately, for the rapper, this trip to St. Louis may bring him prison, because when the government tells you not to leave the state, it's a big taboo for him to leave
In addition, in July, authorities contacted the rapper, who told them he was in Chicago
"The representative also said that after the government provided him with drug treatment consultation, he could get rid of drugs on his own."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Our estimate for Tyson Kidd’s net worth in 2018 is: $20 million...”
“Tyson Kidd net worth: wrestling salary distributionSo what is Tyson Kidd’s net worth in 2018?”
“Tyson Kidd is a professional wrestler.”
“Tyson Kidd was born on July 11, 1980, in Calgary, Canada.”
“This page will examine Tyson Kidd’s total career net worth.”
“Image Credit: Miguel DiscartTyson Kidd Career, EarningsTyson Kidd is part of the Hart wrestling family.”
“Tyson Kidd’s nicknames have included “Fact Dropper”, and “The Crown Prince of ECW (WWE brand)”.”
“Billed from Calgary, Alberta, Canada Tyson Kidd has had a prominent life in wrestling which debuted in July 23, 1995 and which ended in June 29, 2017.”
“In the ring, Tyson Kidd was trained by Bret Hart.”
“Some of the signature moves employed by Tyson Kidd included the Diving hurricanrana to the outside the ring sometimes while Slingshot Suicide Swinging neckbreaker Multiple Kick variations Wheelbarrow victory roll Reverse chinlock Split legged moonsault Arm drag Double jump moonsault Springboard Frankensteiner to an opponent seated on the top rope...”


"We estimate Tyson Kidd's net worth in 2018 to be $20 million..."
Tyson Kidd's net assets: fighting for salary distribution, what is Tyson Kidd's net assets in 2018? "
"Tyson Kidd is a professional wrestler."
Tyson Kidd was born on July 11, 1980 in Calgary, Canada
"This page will look at Tyson Kidd's total professional net worth."
Photo source: the career of Miguel Dickerson Kidd, a member of the Hart wrestling family
Tyson Kidd's nicknames include "de facto dropper" and "ECW Crown Prince (WWE brand)"
"Tyson Kidd, from Calgary, Alberta, Canada, made his debut on July 23, 1995 and ended on June 29, 2017. He has a remarkable life in the wrestling world."
In the ring, Tyson Kidd was trained by Brett Hart
Tyson Kidd's signature moves include diving, gliding, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard, springboard rope ……”



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Best Celebrity Shoe Collaborations -- J.Lo, Selena Gomez and MoreUp to 40% Off Celebrity-Favorite Fashion at the Amazon SaleHow to Watch Beyoncé's 'Black Is King' on Disney PlusRelated Gallery...”
“Prices listed are subject to change by the retailer.”
“TSM/Bauer-Griffin/GC ImagesSHOP JENNIFER'S SHADES:GET THE LOOK:MadewellEach product has been selected, and each product’s style has been reviewed, by our editorial team; however, we may receive affiliate commissions from some links to products on this page.”
“SHOP REESE'S SHADES:Draper JamesGET THE LOOK:WalmartJennifer LawrenceRay-Bans' iconic round sunglasses add a cool-girl flair to any outfit as seen on J.Law.”
“Ari Perilstein/Getty Images for ASCAPSHOP BILLIE'S SHADES:Privé RevauxGET THE LOOK:Zero UVReese WitherspoonThe Big Little Lies star is all about classic style and these tortoiseshell cat-eye frames from her Draper James brand is as versatile as it is elegant.”
“Gotham/GC ImagesSHOP BELLA'S SHADES:FentyGET THE LOOK:ShopbopBillie EilishLeave it to the "Bad Guy" singer to pull off an edgy, shapely pair like this bold triangular one from Privé Revaux, propped low on the bridge of the nose.”
“The futuristic, sporty style is perfect for the girl who is not afraid to experiment with trends.”
“SHOP BEYONCE'S SHADES:DitaGET THE LOOK:NordstromBella HadidThe supermodel rocked gal pal Rihanna's new luxury line head to toe, featuring a pair of multicolored transparent shield shades.”
“SHOP J.LO'S SHADES:QuayBeyoncéThe pop star served a lewk when she rocked these oversized sunglasses from Dita.”
“James Devaney/GC ImagesSHOP J.LO'S SHADES:AMAVIIGET THE LOOK:AmazonThe triple-threat talent loves sunglasses so much, she teamed up with Quay to design her own collection, and the best-selling aviator is now back in stock just in time for summer!”


"Best celebrity shoe collaboration - J.Lo, Selena Gomez and more offer up to 40% discount on celebrities' favorite fashion products at Amazon stores. How to watch Beyonce's" black is king "at Disney plusrelated gallery..."
"The prices listed may be changed by the retailer."
"TSM / Bauer Griffin / GC imagesshop Jenifer's Sunglasses: take it and see: Madewell each product has been selected by our editorial team, and the style of each product has been reviewed; however, we may receive additional commission from some product links on this page."
"Buy Reese's shadow: dreppe James guy look at this: Wal Mart Jennifer Lawrence bance" the iconic round sunglasses add cool girlishness to any of J. law's clothes. "
"Ali Perlstein / Getty Images shadow akapshop Billie: priv Revo gets a look: without the grapevine, Witherspoon's big lie is a classic film, and her Draper James brand's tortoise cat's-eye frames are elegant and versatile
"Gotham / GC photo shop Bella's shadow: fendigi look: shopbillie elish leave" bad guys "singer is happy to be able to take off a pair of avant-garde, symmetrical combinations from priv é revaux, just like this pair of bold triangle combinations, supporting on the bridge of the nose high and low."
"Futurism and sports style are very suitable for girls who are not afraid to try the trend."
"Buy the shadow of Beyonce: same as above: supermodel Nordstrom Bella Hadid has shocked her partner Rihanna's new luxury series from head to toe, with a pair of color transparent hoods."
"Buy J.Lo's hue: quaybeyonc, the pop star, looks lewd with Dita's oversized sunglasses."
"James dewani / GC imagesshop J.Lo's shadow: amavit look: Triple Threat talent likes Sunglasses very much. She has designed her own series with quay, and now the best-selling Aviator is back, just in time for the summer!"



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Beauty and the Beast Costumes to Reflect a Modern Belle Juicy Couture Teams With Beauty and the Beast...”
“Featuring dramatic shoulders and a plunging neckline the white gown gave Dion an angelic appeal that was only intensified by her emotionally charged delivery of My Heart Will Go On More from WWD com The Aftermath Stylist Law Roach on Creating Celine Dion s BBMAs Moment Emma Watson Wanted Her...”
“...it an haute couture design by Stéphane Rolland...”
“This new song is called How Does a Moment Last Forever and I d like to sing it for you in concert tonight for the very very first time Dion garnered praise this weekend both for her performance at the 2017 Billboard Music Awards and the dress she wore for...”
“So if you put yourself in my shoes, I could not refuse.”
“Twenty five years later, Disney asked me again if I would like to participate in the live-action remake of ‘Beauty and the Beast’ by recording another song.”
““Twenty five years ago, I was very fortunate to be a part of that magical movie ‘Beauty and the Beast.’ It was one of the biggest moments of my show business career actually, so, so thankful.”
“She fittingly chose a Belle-inspired yellow dress for the occasion.”
““I’m very nervous and very excited at the same time,” Dion said.”
“On Thursday night, Dion surprised the crowd at her Las Vegas show by announcing that for the first time, she would perform the original song written especially for Disney’s 2017 live-action remake, starring Emma Watson.”


"The clothing of beauty and beast reflects the juicy fashion team of modern beauty and beauty and beast..."
"This white robe features striking shoulders and drooping neckline, giving Dion an angelic charm, which is intensified by her emotional" my heart ". This work will be published from WWD.com "Aftercare" magazine continues, stylist rocky is creating Celine Dion's bbmas, Emma Watson wants her... "
“… This is St é phane Rolland's haute couture... "
"This new song is called how does a moment latens forever. I want to sing this song for you at tonight's concert. This is Dion's first time this weekend because of her performance at the 2017 Billboard Music Awards and her contribution to She was praised for her dress
"So if you put yourself in my shoes, I can't refuse."
"25 years later, Disney asked me again if I would like to record another song and participate in the live remake of beauty and the beast."
"25 years ago, I was lucky to be a part of the Magic Movie beauty and the beast. It was one of the most important moments in my acting career. Thank you so much
"She chose a yellow dress inspired by a beautiful woman for the occasion, which is very suitable."
"I'm nervous and excited at the same time," Dion said
"On Thursday night, Dion announced during her performance in Las Vegas that she would perform the original song starring Emma Watson for the first time, which was specially written for the remake of Disney's reality show in 2017 and surprised the audience."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I have no knowledge about anything Rose did or claimed to have done.””
“As for McGowan, she responded in characteristic unvarnished fashion in a tweet just now, with a spokesman telling Deadline there would be no further comment:Fuck you you fucking douche bag loser from hell.”
“But he has made an exception as Rose McGowan started her press tour to promote a new E!”
“...show and the publication of her book Brave.”
“McGowan has long maintained that Weinstein raped her, and has made her account of an assault at his hands at the Sundance Film Festival in 1997 a major part of the book.”
“Weinstein’s lawyer, Ben Brafman, is disputing McGowan’s version of what happened in that hot tub being non-consensual, and what happened in its aftermath.”
“Weinstein’s lawyer has offered as evidence emails from McGowan’s former manager Jill Messick and Ben Affleck, latter of whom McGowan said she told of the assault moments after it happened, eliciting an angry response from the actor/director.”
“Worth noting that Affleck’s email was sent to Weinstein on July 26, long before the New York Times and the New Yorker broke stories on the avalanche of actresses, assistants and others who claimed they were assaulted by Weinstein, who became a pariah overnight.”
“Baring the emails solicited before either Messick or Affleck knew what was coming or even why Weinstein asked for them, is embarrassing for both Affleck and Messick.”
“But we have long passed the point of decorum in this ongoing tawdry saga that has shaken Hollywood to its core.”


"I don't know what rose did or claimed to have done."
As for McGovern, she just tweeted in a typical unrefined way. The spokesman told reporters that the deadline will not be extended any more. Comment: screw you, you damned bastard. "
"But when Rose McGovern started her journalistic journey, promoting a new e!"
“… To show and publish her book. "
"McGovern insists that Weinstein raped her and makes her description of an attack on his hand at the 1997 Sundance Film Festival a major part of the book."
Weinstein's lawyer, Ben Brafman, challenged McGovern's claim that what happened in the hot tub was involuntary and what happened afterwards
"Weinstein's lawyers provided e-mails from former McGovern agents Jill mesic and Ben Affleck, who said that shortly after the attack, McGovern told about the attack, causing an angry reaction from the actor / Director."
"It's worth noting that Affleck's email was sent to Weinstein on July 26, and Weinstein became a pariah overnight long before the New York Times and the new Yorker disclosed the avalanche story of actresses, assistants and others claiming that they were attacked by Weinstein."
"Before mesic and Affleck don't know what's going to happen next, or even why Weinstein wants these emails, it's embarrassing for both of them to make them public."
"But we've long broken through the etiquette of this popular saga that's going on, and it's rocked the heart of Hollywood."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and flippers and clutching her trusty pool noodle with the caption I have to swim with noodles...”
“In addition to lounging on the yacht and touching up her sunscreen with the help of her husband Teigen also took her share of dips into the ocean sharing a Boomerang of herself plunging into the water donning the swimsuit...”
“The piece is also available in soft pink and clean white, for those looking to emulate Teigen’s gorgeous wardrobe.”
“The suit is clearly a favorite of Teigen’s, as she was already seen wearing the same one in black last week while vacationing in the Mediterranean.”
“The gold-studded, low-back style goes for around $600 (and if you’re currently trying to figure out how to make that work with your next paycheck, you’re not alone).”
“The two are enjoying the island with friends this week, and, unsurprisingly, Teigen has been soaking up the sun and sea in some pretty fabulous outfits, including a particularly glam one-piece nude swimsuit from Norma Kamali.”
“If you were looking for one more reason to envy Chrissy Teigen and John Legend’s glamorous life, their nine-day yacht vacation in Corsica might just do the trick.”


“… And flippers, holding on to her trusty pool noodles, which says, "I have to swim with noodles..."
"In addition to lying lazily on the yacht and wearing sunscreen with her husband's help, tegan also took her experience of sinking into the sea and shared her boomerang when she jumped into the water in her swimsuit..."
"It also has a soft pink and a clean white for those who want to imitate tegan's gorgeous wardrobe."
"This suit is obviously tegan's favorite because she was already seen wearing the same black suit when she was on holiday in the Mediterranean last week."
"This low waisted gold inlaid model costs about $600 (if you're trying to do that now in your next paycheck, you're not alone."
"They had a great time on the island with friends this week. As expected, tegan has been wearing some beautiful clothes and bathing in the sun and the sea, including a particularly dazzling nude Swimsuit by Norma Kamali."
"If you want to find another reason to admire the glamorous life of Chris tegan and John Legendre, their nine day yacht vacation in Corsica may be a success."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He had been in a relationship with Teen Mom 2 star Briana DeJesus, but they split in January.”
“And hooking up w him as i know people from the reunion leaked that.”
“Kailyn Lowry shared her relationship regrets and revealed that she was “hooking up” with ex-husband Javi Marroquin while they considered a reconciliation.”
“The Teen Mom 2 star opened up about her relationship with Marroquin in a series of tweets on Saturday, June 2.”
““Javi & I talked about getting back together at one point.”
“Why?”
“I don’t know because we both knew we didn’t want to & it would never work,” she revealed.”
““I regret even having those conversations.”
“I regret filming about it.”
“And hooking up w him as I know people from the reunion leaked that.”2- Javi & i talked about getting back together at one point.”


"He was in love with Briana deyessos, the star of teen Mom 2, but they broke up in January."
"I know the people at the party and I let that out by hooking him up."
Kailyn Lowry shared her regrets about the relationship and revealed that she was "hooking up" with her ex husband Javi Marroquin, who are considering a settlement
"On Saturday, June 2, the young mom No. 2 star announced her relationship with Marroquin on a series of tweets."
"Javier and I talked about getting back together."
"Why?"
"I don't know, because we all know we don't want to do this & it will never work," she revealed
"I even regret having those conversations."
"I regret filming for it."
"The people at the reunion party I knew told him about it." 2 - Javier and I talked about getting back together



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“All of this is remarkable.””
““It’s remarkable.”
“Less than a week later, even the actor replacing Spacey—Christopher Plummer—is still reeling from the news.”
“The sudden swap and race against time is a welcome challenge for Plummer, he said—but the veteran actor also feels “awfully sad” for Spacey, given the snowballing sexual-misconduct allegations against the House of Cards star.”
““I think it’s very sad what happened to him.”
“Kevin is such a talented and a terrifically gifted actor, and it’s so sad.”
“It’s such a shame,” Plummer told Vanity Fair at the premiere of his latest film, The Man Who Invented Christmas, in New York on Sunday.”
““That’s all I can say, because that’s it.”Plummer, who turns 88 a week before the release of All the Money, said he received a call from Scott offering him the part last week.”
“The Sound of Music star did not have trepidation in taking on the role of billionaire J. Paul Getty, he said, despite the circumstances.”
““It’s really not replacing him [Spacey]—it’s starting all over again.”


"It's all amazing."
"It's amazing."
"Less than a week later, the actor who connected to the stand in for spacey Christopher Plummer is still haunted by the news."
"The sudden exchange and race against time is a welcome challenge for plummer, he said, but the veteran actor is also" very sad "for spacey because of the increasing sexual misconduct charges against house of cards stars
"I think what happened to him is pathetic."
"Kevin is a very talented actor. It's so sad."
"It's a pity," Plummer told Vanity Fair on Sunday at the premiere of the latest film Santa Claus in New York
"That's all I can say, because that's it." Plummer, who turned 88 a week before all the money was released, said he got a call from Scott last week asking him to play the role
The voice of music star didn't panic when he played the role of billionaire J. Paul Getty, he said, despite the situation
"It really can't replace him (spacey) - it's all starting again."



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cassidy said she saw Harry the next day at the pool, recalling that he was understanding and respectful about the declined offer.”
“The group of women thanked them for their offer but said no.”
“She said Harry and his friends, who appeared to be part of a bachelor party, invited Cassidy and her friends out with them.”
“Earlier this year, the actress Katie Cassidy told Entertainment Tonight she had randomly met Harry in 2014 while on vacation with friends in Miami.”
“Harry has also been turned down for dates.”
“A mortified Goulding said no and called her interviewers out for being "naughty, naughty people."”
“During a 2016 interview with "The Project TV," Goulding was asked whether she planned to have a baby with Harry anytime soon.”
“He was, however, seen with the pop star Ellie Goulding at the 2016 Audi Polo Challenge, with eyewitnesses telling The Telegraph that the two "spent a lot of time sitting together under blankets."”
“They may have been "spotted" together at one point or another, but Harry never seriously dated the singer Natalie Imbruglia or the actress Emma Watson.”
“Vianney Le Caer/Associated PressDon't let the headlines fool you.”


Cassidy said she met Harry at the pool the next day and recalled that he understood and respected the rejected offer
"This group of women thank them for their offer, but they refuse."
She said Harry and his friends seemed to be at a bachelor party, inviting Cassidy out with her friends
"Earlier this year, actress Katie Cassidy told entertainment town that she ran into Harry while on holiday with friends in Miami in 2014."
"Harry's date was turned down, too."
A shameful gulding refused and called her interviewer "naughty, naughty"
"In an interview with project TV in 2016, gulding was asked if he planned to have a baby with Harry in the near future."
"However, at the 2016 Audi Polo challenge, he was seen with pop star Ellie Goulding, and witnesses told the daily telegraph that they" spent a lot of time under the blanket. "
They may be "found" together at some point, but Harry has never seriously dated singer Natalie imburia or actress Emma Watson
"Vianne Le caer / AP, don't let the headlines fool you."



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The undertones of fruit [from the orange juice] complement the Champagne, and I love tequila because it gives you a kick.” Lourd seemed to agree, saying, “I’m a mimosa gal, with a brunch,” before quickly adding, “but not too many because then you have to nap!””
“I love the two and why not mix them?” Chung explained, wearing a flapper-inspired frock.”
““I love tequila, I love Champagne.”
“Joining Dern was her Star Wars: The Last Jedi costar and fellow Film Festival judge, Billie Lourd, in a glittering Gucci dress, as well as actor Jon Tenney with producer Leslie Urdang, and actress Jamie Chung, who created the signature cocktail for Sunday’s Golden Globes, the Moët 75.”
“Poppy...”
“It is the greatest voice for emerging filmmakers and it s given me the wisdom to work with the director many many times said Laura Dern the newest judge of the Moët Moment Film Festival which kicked off its annual competition with a cocktail party at West Hollywood hot spot...”
“When I met Alexander Payne, he first showed me a short film.”
“Martin Scorcese made a short film that got him a movie.”
“1 / 9 Chevron Chevron Photo: Getty Images Laura Dern in Stella McCartney and Christian Louboutin“David Lynch made a short film that got him a movie.”


"The taste of fruit (orange juice) complements the taste of champagne. I like tequila because it can bring you fun." Lloyd seemed to agree. He said, "I'm Mimosa, brunch," and then quickly added, "but not too much, because then you'll have to take a nap!"
"I like these two things. Why not mix them together? "Zhong explained, wearing a loose leaf dress."
"I love tequila, I love champagne."
"Along with her Star Wars: the last Jedi actor and festival judge Billie Lauder, donning a shiny Gucci dress, actress Jon tanney and producer Leslie Urdang, as well as actress Jamie Chung, who created the iconic cocktail for Sunday's Golden Globe Award" Mott 75, "she said
"Bobbie..."
"This is the greatest voice of emerging filmmakers, and it has given me the wisdom to work with the director many times," said Laura Dean, the judge of the latest Mo è t moment Film Festival, which launched its annual competition with cocktail parties in West Hollywood
"When I met Alexander Payne, he showed me a short film first."
"Martin Scorsese made a short film and asked him to make a film."
"1 / 9 chevron chevron photos: Getty pictures Laura Dean in Stella McCartney and Christian Louboutin" David Lynch made a short film and asked him to make a film



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Everyone on the Jenner side is fine.”
“She taught me about character and so much growing up and I just feel like I don’t respect the character that she’s showing now.”Kim Kardashian’s younger sister, Khloe Kardashian, is also “taking it a little tough,” Caitlyn said at a book signing, according to RadarOnline.”
“I have a lot of friends that know the truth and know what I’ve been through and know the whole situation,” Caitlyn said.”
“...obviously when you do a book like that there are different opinions...”
“Why does everything have to be that Kris is such a bitch She added I ve never been so angry and disappointed in somebody in my whole life In response the Olympic gold medalist said on Good Morning America that the book is extraordinarily honest It is my perspective and...”
“... Everything she says is all made up.”
““I read it and basically the only nice thing she had to say was that I was great socially at a party one time.”
“In a recent episode of “Keeping Up With the Kardashians,” Kris fumed with anger about passages in “The Secrets of My Life” that claimed she knew Caitlyn was transgender before they wed.“None of it makes sense,”Kris said to daughters Khloe and Kim Kardashian.”
“(Their differing takes on their marital woes have been a topic of discussion for years.)”
“It was something Caitlyn grew to resent, she said, and she would steal her wife’s gowns and purses to wear while traveling.”


"Jenna's people are very nice."
"She's taught me a lot about character and growth, and I just don't think I respect the character she's showing right now," Caitlin said at a sign off, according to radarlonline
"I have a lot of friends who know the truth, know what I've been through, and know the whole situation," Caitlin said
“…… Obviously, when you write such a book, you will have different opinions... "
"Why is everything like this, Chris is such a whore, she added, I've never been so angry and disappointed in my whole life to respond to the Olympic gold medalist saying, Good Morning America, this book is very honest, this is my point of view and..."
"... everything she said was a fabrication."
"I've read it. Basically, the only good thing she has to say is that I was very sociable at a party once."
In a recent episode, keep in touch with Kardashian, Chris is furious at the statement in the secret of my life that she knew Caitlin was transgender before she got married. "It doesn't make sense," Chris told his daughters, Chloe and Kim Kardashian
"(their different views on marital misfortune have been the subject of discussion for many years.)
"It's something that Caitlin is getting more and more disgusted with. She said she would steal her wife's dress and purse to wear when traveling."



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More on freeing the nipple:One Survivor's Story on Feeling Sexy Without Nipples:Follow De Elizabeth on Twitter and Instagram.”
“Check out the other photos below, and see them IRL in the upcoming issue of Love magazine, available next Monday, July 24.”
“We are so totally here for these gorgeous images that celebrate these women's bodies.”
“The two women are pictured nude in their photos; Graham is seen with a hand draped over her breasts, while Kroes sits facing away from the camera with her legs tucked up towards her chest.”
“Demarchelier also took to social media to share the black-and-white photos he took of Graham and Kroes, both of which are just as beautiful.”
“Demarchelier shared the photograph on his Instagram page last night, where it's already received over 22k likes and complimentary comments from his followers.”
“With her hands on her hips, she stares confidently at the camera, and the pride she has about her body is definitely palpable.”
“In Chung's photo, she is seen posing topless, wearing a dark pair of jeans and chunky studded belt.”
“The model and TV host teamed up with legendary photographer Patrick Demarchelier for a gorgeous black-and-white shoot for Love magazine, along with Ashley Graham and Doutzen Kroes.”
“Alexa Chung is joining the widely popular #FreeTheNipple movement with her latest photo shoot.”


"More about releasing nipples: a survivor's story about feeling sexy nipples: follow Elizabeth on Twitter and instagram
"Please check out the other photos below and see them in next Monday's (July 24) issue of love magazine."
"We are here to celebrate these women's bodies for these gorgeous images."
"The two women in the picture are naked; Graham's hands are on his chest, while cross is sitting with his back to the camera, legs curled up to his chest."
"Demarchelier also shared his black and white photos of Graham and cross on social media, which are equally beautiful."
"Demarchelier shared this photo on his instagram page last night, where he has received more than 22000 praise comments from likes and followers."
"With her hands on her hips and her confident gaze on the camera, her pride in her body must be obvious."
"In the picture of Zhong, you can see her topless, wearing a pair of dark jeans and a thick Studded Belt."
"The model and TV host teamed up with legendary photographer Patrick Demarchelier, Ashley Graham and Doutzen Kroes to make a gorgeous black-and-white film for love magazine."
"Alexa Chung will join the popular" statue of liberty movement "with the latest photos."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Well, unless you decide to spill your secrets, but we'll leave that up to you...”
“These drugstore picks are all high quality, so no one will know you went the bargain route.”
“And the best part?”
“With these picks you can do your entire face — from foundation to lip gloss — without breaking your budget.”
“They literally try thousands of beauty products and definitely know a good match when they see one.”
“...to see cheap makeup swaps for high end products Trust us if anyone would know which cheap makeup products can sit next to your splurge worthy ones it s these experts...”
“But before you blindly fill up your cart at Target with an aisle s worth of shadows check out these makeup pros tips on the drugstore products that are exact or nearly exact duplicates of high end makeup Click here...”
“...d never use anything but your favorite 59 foundation and 24 lipstick...”
“We d be giant hypocrites if we told you to always bargain shop for your beauty products It turns out you totally can and maybe should hit up the drugstore for your beauty products even if you once swore you...”
“Our makeup bags are loaded with MAC lip glosses, Nars shadows, and tubes of Lancome mascaras.”


"Well, unless you decide to reveal your secret, we'll let you decide..."
"These pharmacies are all high quality, so no one will know that you are on a cheap route."
"And the best part?"
"With these picks, you can make the whole face - from foundation to lip gloss, without damaging your budget."
"They've really tried thousands of beauty products, and when they see one, they know a good match."
“… To see the exchange of cheap cosmetics for high-end products, believe us, if anyone knows which cheap cosmetics can sit next to your extravagant products, it's these experts... "
"But before you blindly fill target's shopping cart with a pile of shadows, please check the tips of these cosmetics professionals about drugstore products. These products are exactly or almost exactly the same as high-end cosmetics. Please click here..."
"Apart from your love of 59 foundation and 24 lipsticks...
"If we tell you that you have to bargain in the beauty shop, we are super hypocrites. It turns out that you can and perhaps should go to the drugstore to buy your beauty products, even if you have vowed to... "
"Our cosmetic bags are MAC lipstick, Nars eye shadow and Lancome mascara."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read more...”
“SpongeBob fans can now bid on this terrifying David Hasselhoff prop from the first movie SYFY WIREDavid Hasselhoff Auctioning ‘Big Dave’ Replica from SPONGEBOB NerdistDavid Hasselhoff is auctioning 100s of Baywatch and Knight Rider items and will deliver actual KITT car to.”
“...car up for auction Daily MailAre ya ready, kids?!”
“Knight Rider K I T T”
“...hand in Knight Rider film Inside NoVADavid Hasselhoff Auctioning Big Dave Replica from SPONGEBOB NerdistView Full Coverage on Google News Read more David Hasselhoff is auctioning off his Knight Rider car New York Post David Hasselhoff is auctioning off his Knight Rider car New York Post David Hasselhoff puts his...”
“David Hasselhoff auctioning off Knight Rider car WSB Atlanta David Hasselhoff auctioning off Knight Rider car WSB AtlantaDavid Hasselhoff Is Selling His Most Prized Possessions His 14 Foot Statue and Knight Rider Car InsideHookDavid Hasselhoff is auctioning off his Knight Rider car New York Post David Hasselhoff I have emotional...”


"Read more..."
"SpongeBob fans can now bid for the horror prop of David Hasselhoff in the first movie" Saffi connect ". David Hasselhoff is auctioning a copy of David Hasselhoff, the nerd of SpongeBob Hasselhoff) is auctioning more than 100 Baywatch and knight projects and will deliver the real kit to the audience. "
“… Are the kids ready for the auction? "
"Knight k i t"
“… David Hasselhoff auctions his knight's car New York Post David Hasselhoff auctions his knight's car New York Post David Hasselhoff put his
"David Hasselhoff auctions Knight's car WSB Atlanta David Hasselhoff auctions Knight's car WSB Atlantis David Hasselhoff sells his most precious property his 14 foot statue and the knight's car inside hokdavid Hasselhoff auctions his knight's car New York Post David Hasselhoff I have feelings..."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Dressed in a stunning plunging-neckline silver Prada gown, the 32-year-old was introduced to the stage by her superhero film's director Patty Jenkins, who explained why the star more than deserved to win the second annual #SeeHer award.”
“With the special trophy aiming to recognise the importance of accurately portraying women in the entertainment industry, Jenkins said of the former Miss Israel: 'She excelled at every aspect of the universal hero's struggle in real life on and off the screen.'”
“Getty Images'But the really special thing is, she didn't do it for the glory.”
“She didn't do it for the fame.”
“She's not here for the money.”
“She did it for us.”
“'She knew the great importance of this character and what she could mean to the world if well done.'”
“When Gadot stood in front of the mic, she thanked Patty - who has officially signed on to direct the Wonder Woman sequel - for her generosity.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
The 32 year old actress, who was introduced to the stage by superhero film director Patty Jenkins in a stunning silver Prada dress, explained why the star was more eligible for the second annual "see her award"
Speaking of the former Miss Israel, Jenkins said: "this special trophy is designed to recognize the importance of accurately portraying the image of women in the entertainment industry. She excels in all aspects of real life, both on and off the screen."
"But what's really special is that she didn't do it for honor."
"She didn't do it to be famous."
"She didn't come for the money."
"She did it for us."
"She knows the importance of this role and what she means to the world if she does well."
When gado stands in front of the microphone, she thanks Patty for her generosity, who has signed up to direct the sequel of wonder woman



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...eight year prison sentence after pleading guilty to bank fraud and identity theft in May 2014 the same year they split...”
“Over her six seasons on the show the reality star let fans into some of the most intimate moments of her life from the birth of her two sons Ayden 6 and Dylan 3 to the downfall of her marriage to estranged husband Apollo Nida who is currently serving an...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Her dismissal from the hit Bravo show, which was first reported by E!”
“Online, comes after a tough four-part reunion, in which she admitted to spreading inflammatory accusations to Porsha Williams that said Kandi Burruss and her husband Todd Tucker had planned on drugging Williams and their mutual friend Shamea Morton in order to take advantage of them sexually.”
“Williams had come under fire for repeating the accusations throughout the season because she believed the claims had come directly from Burruss.”
“Problem was, Parks had only heard the information from a still-unnamed source.”
““I repeated it because I heard it,” Parks said in the final episode of the reunion.”
““Something was brought to me.”
“I repeated what someone told me I shouldn t have repeated it I screwed up I m sorry Image zoom Phaedra Parks Porsha Williams Shereé Whitfield and Shamea Morton Credit Annette Brown Bravo NBC Many had wondered how Parks might be able to return to the show next season with...”


“… After pleading guilty to bank fraud and identity theft in May 2014, they were sentenced to eight years' imprisonment, and they separated in the same year. "
"In her six seasons on the show, the reality star has brought fans into the most intimate moments of her life, from the birth of her two sons, eden 6 and Dylan 3, to the breakdown of her marriage to her estranged husband, Apollo Neda, where she is currently working for a family
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She was fired on the hit show great, this is e!"
On the Internet, she admitted spreading inflammatory charges against Bertha Williams, saying that Katie Burroughs and her husband Todd Tucker planned to drug Williams and their mutual friend shamia Morton in order to sexually assault them
"Williams has come under attack for repeating the charges throughout the season because she thinks they come directly from borough
"The problem is that parks only heard the information from an unnamed source."
"I repeat it because I hear it," Parks said in the final episode of reunion
"Something has come to me."
"I repeat what someone told me I shouldn't repeat. I messed up. I'm sorry for image zooming. Fedra Pax POSA, Williams Shelley Whitfield and shamia Morton credit. Annette Brown Bravo NBC. Many people want to know how Pax might be able to come back to show next season with..."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Who knows, though?””
““I had to keep it hush-hush from you guys.”He added: “Baby number two may be coming soon.”
“The couple have welcomed their second child, a baby boy named Beckett, on Monday, February 12.”
“The newborn joins 17-month-old big brother, Boomer.”
“The Olympic champ announced the news on Instagram on Tuesday, February 13, sharing a sweet pic of Johnson with Boomer and their newborn son.”
““Magical moments yesterday… Nicole and I would like to introduce Beckett Richard Phelps to the world!” he captioned the photo.”
““We had a healthy baby boy and a healthy mama.”
“I truly do feel like the happiest man in the world.”
“Being able to build our family to now 4 (6 with doggies) is so incredible!#familyof4now.”The pair announced that they were expecting a new bundle of joy in August by posting matching photos to their social media accounts of Johnson, 32, holding their son.”
““Number 2 on the way!!!!”


"But who knows?"
"I have to keep silent with you." He added: "baby number two may soon be born."
On Monday, February 12, the couple welcomed their second child, a baby boy named Beckett
"Newborns join the 17 month old brother, baby boomers."
"The Olympic champion announced the news on instagram on Tuesday, February 13, and shared a sweet picture of Johnson with Boomer and their newborn son."
"Yesterday's magic moment Nicole and I want to introduce Beckett Richard Phelps to the world! "He added a title to the photo."
"We have a healthy baby boy and a healthy mother."
"I really feel like the happiest person in the world."
"It's incredible that we can build our family up to four (six with puppies)! #The two posted photos of Johnson, 32, holding his son on social media and announced that they were looking forward to a new round of joy in August
"No.2 is on the way!!"



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We'll just let Cynthia explain in the below clip.”
“So does that mean Peter is cool with Cynthia's current batch of boos?”
“No, she hasn't wasted any time in exploring potential matches in Atlanta and even across the country with one boo in her hometown and one in Los Angeles.”
“But don't get it twisted.”
“Though things seem to be heating up with her ATL man Will Jones this season of The Real Housewives of Atlanta Cynthia recently told The Daily Dish that she s not quite ready to put a ring on it again...”
“...just yet...”
“"I am dating, and with dating, I'm not just dating one person because for me, that's not really dating then.”
“That's just almost having, like, a boyfriend.”
“I'm not saying I'm dating 60 guys.”
“It's only a couple of guys that I have in my little rotation," Cynthia said with a laugh.”


"Let's let Cynthia explain it in the following clip."
"So does that mean that Peter is calm about Cynthia's boos now?"
"No, she didn't waste any time exploring potential games in Atlanta or even across the country, one in her hometown, one in Los Angeles."
"But don't screw it up."
"Although the performance of Atlantis will Jones in Atlanta's" real housewife "seems to be heating up this season, Cynthia recently told daily menu that she is not ready to put on the ring again..."
“… Not yet... "
"I'm dating. With a date, I'm not just dating someone, because for me, it's not a real date."
"It's like having a boyfriend."
"I'm not saying I'm going out with 60 men."
"There are only a few people in my circle," Cynthia said with a smile



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more of Emilia Clarke, Solo: A Star Wars Story comes to theaters on Friday.”
“She also shared the hilarious situation on The Graham Norton Show.”
“...she laughed.”
“Ever!'"”
“#StarWars pic.twitter.com/n0nGoYH0UO — John Hoey (@JohnnyHoey) May 19, 2018"I came home one day and she was like, 'You're never, ever going to get laid again!”
“Emilia Clarke’s actual bedroom as decorated by her mother with #SoloAStarWarsStory merchandise.”
“"WITH MY FACE ON IT!"”
“...she told Seth Meyers.”
“There's a lot of merchandise that comes along with being in a Star Wars movie, so there's a lot of stuff that mum can fill my house with!"”
“Now, Star Wars is here with a vengeance.”


"More about Emilia Clark, solo: the Star Wars story will be on Friday."
"She also shared the funny scenes from the Graham Norton show."
“…… She laughed
"Forever!"
"Star Wars pic.twitter.com/n0ngoyhoo -John Hoey (@ johnyhoey) May 19, 2018 "one day when I came home, she said," you will never, never go to bed again! "
"Amelia Clark's bedroom was decorated by her mother with" solo astar war story. "
"There's my face on it!"
“…… She told Seth Meyers
"There are a lot of goods in Star Wars movies, so mom can fill my house with a lot of things!"
"Now, Star Wars has its revenge here."



**Something goes wrong**
“Source: EOnline...”
“They are in the talks of working on some new projects.”The singer continues with her State Of The World tour across USA while remaining devote dto being a simgle mum to her son Eissa Al Mana.”
““She is open though for something more down the line.”
““Janet is really not in a position to get involved with someone at this time,” our source explained.”
“Sources told American entertainment website ENews that Janet Jackson is not in a position to get involved with someone else at this time.”
“It is alleged that Janet Jackson and Germain Dupri trust each other and they have been talking more after Janet’s divorce.”
“They later overcame that and found friendship again.”
“It is alleged that after Janet and Germain broke up, they had a period in which they lost touch.”
“Sources say that Janet and Dupri are just friends and there is absolutely no romance brewing between the two.”
“The two have been linked together ever since Janet Jackson’s divorce to Qatari Billionaire Wissam Al Mana.”


"Source: eoline..."
"They are discussing some new projects." The singer continues her world tour in the United States, while still working as a little mother for her son isa al mana
"But she wants something further."
"Janet is really not fit to socialize right now," our source explained
"The source told eNews, an American entertainment website, that Janet Jackson is currently unable to interact with other people."
"It's said that Janet Jackson and Germaine Dupree trust each other and have been talking more since Janet's divorce."
"They overcame that and found friendship again."
It is said that after Janet and Germain broke up, they once lost contact
"It's said that Janet and Dupree are just friends. There is absolutely no romance brewing between them."
"Janet Jackson and Qatari billionaire visam al mana have been linked since their divorce."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“James Brolin is the father of actor Josh Brolin.”
“Born Craig Kenneth Bruderlin, James Brolin was widely known for his role as Dr/ Steven Kiley on the 1969-1976 television series Marcus Welby, M.D.”
“Though she became a huge movie star and singing legend, Streisand had to be convinced that she was a truly gifted singer, as her initial ambition was to be an actress who sang rather than being known for her signing.”
“Born Barbara Joan Streisand (Barbara 'with' the second 'a'), Streisand made the decision early in her career to drop the second 'a' from her name so that 'Barbra' would have a more original spelling, rather than change her name.”
“"We wanted to be surrounded by people we've loved for a long time," says Streisand.”
“89 year old mother...”
“Streisand and Brolin married in 1998 in the intimate setting of Streisand s Maibu California living room in the presence of 105 guests including the likes of John Travolta and wife Kellly Preston record producer Quincy Jones and Streisand s...”
“Jason appeared in the film The Prince of Tides as Barbra's onscreen son.”
“Barbra Streisand and Elliot Gould had a son named Jason in 1967.”
“Megastar Barbra Streisand and popular actor James Brolin first met on the set of Capricorn One in 1970, a film in which her first husband Elliot Gould also starred.”


"James Brolin is the father of actor Josh Brolin."
Born in Craig Kenneth brodrin, James Brolin is known for his role as Dr. Steven Kelly in the 1969-1976 TV series Marcus Welby, MD
"Although she has become a superstar and a legend, Streisand must be convinced that she is a really talented singer, because her original ambition is to be a singing actress, not famous for her signing."
"Born in Barbara 'with' the second 'a', she decided to remove the second 'a' from her name early in her career, so that the spelling of 'Barbara' would be more original than changing her name."
"We want to be surrounded by people we've loved for a long time," Streisand said
"89 year old mother..."
"In 1998, Streisand and Brolin held a close wedding in Streisand's walking living room in California, attended by 105 guests, including John Travolta and his wife Kelly Preston's record producers Quincy Jones and Streisand s..."
"Jason plays Barbara's on-screen son in the movie Prince of the tides."
"Barbara Streisand and Eliot Gould had a son named Jason in 1967."
Star Barbara Streisand first met famous actor James Brolin on the set of Capricorn one in 1970. Her first husband, Eliot Gould, also starred in the film



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Anything he needs me to do, I'll do it.”
“I'm not only there to be a pretty face -- I'm actually contributing to the tour, handling the merch, etc.”
“We can be around each other non-stop and not be at each other’s throats like, 'Oh my gosh, I gotta get away from you.'”
“He makes me laugh, which is really important.”
“We're also both adventurous, outdoorsy.”
“Family is really important to him and it's really important to me as well.”
“"I love the way he treats his family, he takes care of his mother, he takes care of his father.”
“"I'm always proud of him," she continued.”
“I ended up just giving in one day, and honestly, we've been inseparable ever since."”
“"He kept pressing our mutual friend like, 'Just tell her to come chill with me at the studio, I just want to meet her.'”


"I'll do whatever he wants me to do."
"I'm not just there to have a beautiful face - I'm actually contributing to the tour, dealing with merchandise and so on."
"We can be together all the time, not like, 'oh my God, I have to leave you.'"
"He makes me laugh, which is really important."
"We all like adventure and outdoor activities."
"Family is really important to him and to me."
"I like the way he treats his family, he takes care of his mother, he takes care of his father."
"I'm always proud of him," she continued
"One day I gave in. To be honest, we've been together ever since."
"He kept urging our mutual friend to say," tell her to go to the studio with me. Calm down. I just want to see her. "



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RT if you hope it's true!”
“BBC UK is reporting that #KatyPerry & #TaylorSwift may have a surprise performance at the 2017 #VMAs on the 27th!!”
“That move has some Tumblr fans pretty worked up, and the hashtag #T6 (for her theoretical sixth album) trending.”
“Theory 2: She’s announcing a new albumOn top of all the posts going missing, Swift’s Tumblr theme has changed, from a peachy-pink background with white type to all black.”
“Given the non-evidence, the possibility of a hack made me nervous for only one second, but I’ve reached out to Swift’s record label and will update if I hear back.”
“A security screw-up big enough to take down her entire web presence seems unlikely.”
“Swift’s team is notoriously web savvy, pulling down the slightest copyright infringement in minutes and proactively buying up every domain name that could conceivably host porn about her.”
“Plus, that wouldn’t explain the absence on any other platform, or her site.”
“Also, this guy says he hacked her:Hello @taylorswift #taylorswift A post shared by Turn on post notifications™ (@taariqxo) on Aug 18, 2017 at 9:20am PDTIt’s very unlikely, given that this post went up about two hours into the online frenzy.”
“That kind of purge isn’t common.”


"If you want it to be true, don't!"
"BBC UK reports that Katy Perry and Taylor Swift may have a surprise performance at the 2017 Vmas on the 27th!"
"This move has excited some Tumblr fans, and the label # T6 (her theoretical sixth album) is also very popular."
Theory 2: she announced a new album. With all the posts gone, Swift's Tumblr theme changed from pink background and white font to all black
"Considering that there is no evidence, the possibility of hacker attack only makes me nervous for one second, but I have contacted Swift's record company and will update if there is any reply."
"A security hole that could destroy her entire online image seems unlikely."
"Swift's team is a well-known Internet expert. In a few minutes, they solved the slightest copyright infringement and bought every domain name that might carry her pornographic content."
"In addition, it doesn't explain why she didn't appear on other platforms or her website."
"Also, this guy said that he had invaded her: Hello @ Taylor Swift # Taylor Swift inform shared post by opening post ™  (@ taariqxo) at 9:20 a.m. on August 18, 2017, given that this article has been hot on the Internet for about two hours, it's unlikely. "
"This cleaning is not common."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Hubbards posed shirtless as they gazed down at Hayley’s baby bump, while in another photo Tyler bent down to kiss his smiling wife’s stomach, which was exposed by a black turtleneck crop top.”
“I’ve seen it since the first time I met her.”And as they counted down the days until they would meet their baby girl, the pair posed for a series of gorgeous pregnancy photos.”
“The Florida Georgia Line singer, 30, and his wife Hayley welcomed their first child on Saturday, Dec. 23, his rep confirms to PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Daughter Olivia Rose Hubbard was born in Nashville at 4:56 p.m., weighing 7 lbs., 13 oz.”
“She measured 19¼ inches long.”
““We’re so overwhelmed with joy and already more in love than we could have ever imagined with this little angel that God has given us,” the proud new dad tells PEOPLE.”
“He adds Olivia is the best Christmas gift we could have ever asked for Image zoom Credit Nathan Chapman Image zoom Tyler Olivia Rose and Hayley Hubbard Credit Nathan Chapman The couple exclusively revealed their baby news to PEOPLE back in June and dished on some of the things they...”
“...were looking forward to with their new addition...”
““There’s a lot that we’re going to get to learn,” Tyler said.”


"Mr. and Mrs. Hubbard are naked, staring down at Haley's lump, while in another photo, Tyler bends down to kiss his smiling wife's stomach, which is revealed by a black turtleneck jacket."
"I've seen her since I first saw her." As they counted down the days when they would see the baby girl, they put out a series of beautiful pregnancy photos
"The 30-year-old Florida Georgia frontline singer and his wife Hayley have their first child on Saturday, December 23, and his agent confirmed exclusively to people."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Daughter Olivia rose Hubbard was born in Nashville at 4:56 p.m., weighing 7 pounds and 13 ounces."
"She's 19 / 4."
The proud new dad told people: "we are ecstatic, and we love this little angel more than we can imagine."
"He added that Olivia is the best Christmas present we can ask for, thanks to Nathan Chapman, Taylor Olivia Ross and Haley Hubbard. Nathan Chapman, the couple, revealed their treasure news exclusively in June and introduced something about them..."
“… We are looking forward to their new addition... "
"We're going to learn a lot," Taylor said



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I know Quinn is mine, but she’s also hers, and I just feel like whatever she wants for her is what I will come to terms with.”“Scandal” airs on Thursdays at 9 p.m. on ABC.”
““I’ve been such a cog in this huge wheel for seven years, and I’m just very used to Shonda making the best decisions for the characters,” Lowes says.”
“I felt very safe.”Shortly after the fake shooting, Quinn went into labor and had the baby with a little help from Rowan, his salesman friend who was previously a war medic, as well assome hallucinations of her friends.”
““We had our stunt coordinator — I had a stunt double — and we took things really slow.”
“...instructing me on how to do everything really safely which was incredible Lowes says...”
“Getting so physical while pregnant was horrifying at first for Lowes but when it came to the day of shooting the actual scene she shares she felt very well taken care of We had a medic on set at all times and we had an OB on set who was...”
“She was able to surprise Rowan when he came down to the bunker, and she attacked him — and this time when she begged him not to kill her until after her baby was born, it turned out that “mother and children first” reminder sunk in.”
““The stakes couldn’t be higher,” Lowes says of “Good People.”When Olivia showed up at Rowan’s and the father-daughter duo engaged in a standoff over the fact that he should shoot her but couldn’t, Quinn used a hairpin to unshackle her handcuffs.”
“...trade and that doomed both her and her unborn daughter...”
“People revealed Rowan kept Quinn in a bunker where she pleaded for her life clutching her pregnant stomach and saying that in B613 it was supposed to be mothers and children first that s the rule but then railed against Rowan for his inability to see that Olivia would never...”


"I know Quinn is mine, but she's also hers. I just think I'll take whatever she wants." "Scandal" was broadcast on ABC at 9 p.m. Thursday
"I've been on this huge wheel for seven years, and I'm used to shoda making the best decisions for the character," Ross said
"I feel safe." Shortly after the fake shooting, Quinn gave birth and gave birth with the help of Rowan, a friend of Quinn's salesman, a former battlefield medic, and some hallucinations of her friends
"We have stunt coordinators - I have stunt doubles - and we're very slow."
“… It's incredible how to teach me how to really do everything safely, "says Lois
"At the beginning, Lois felt terrible about her physical condition during her pregnancy, but when she filmed the real scene she shared, she felt that she was taken good care of. We always had a medical staff on the set, and we had an obstetrician on the set. He was..."
"When Rowan came to the bunker, she was able to give him a surprise. She attacked Rowan. This time, she begged Rowan not to kill her before the baby was born. As a result, the reminder of" mother and child first "gradually became popular
"The stakes couldn't have been higher," Lowes said of "good people." when Olivia showed up at Rowan's, the father and daughter were in a stalemate because he should have shot her, but he couldn't, and Quinn released her handcuffs with a hairpin. "
“… It's a deal. It's a deal for her and her unborn daughter. "
"It is revealed that Rowan keeps Quinn in a bunker. She pleads in the bunker and holds fast to her pregnant stomach. In b613, it should be mother and child first. This is the rule. But later, because Rowan can't see Olivia, she will never..."



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Have a listen below:”
“While neither camp has acknowledged the leak, many uploads to YouTube of the track have been removed.”
“The DJ has previously worked with Selena Gomez and Tory Lanez on “Trust Nobody”.”
“The song will reportedly feature on Cashmere Cat’s forthcoming album Wild Love.”
“Although her song with Machine Gun Kelly, “Bad Things”, is currently number six on the Billboard Hot 100, “Love Incredible” is her first collaboration since breaking away from Fifth Harmony.”
“Cashmere Cat tapped Cabello for new song “Love Incredible”, which was leaked Wednesday.”
“Hitting the studio and posting cryptic lyrics to her Twitter on multiple occasions, the 19-year-old is keen to set herself apart from her former group members.”
“Since leaving Fifth Harmony only a month ago, Camila Cabello has been hard at work on her new sound as a solo artist.”


"Listen to the following:
"Although neither camp admitted the leak, many of the tracks uploaded to YouTube have been deleted."
"The DJ worked with Serena Gomez and tori lannis on don't trust anyone."
"It's reported that the song will appear in cashmere's upcoming album wild love."
"Although her song" bad things "with machine gun Kelly is currently ranked sixth in the top 100 list," incredible love "is her first collaboration since she left the fifth harmonic."
Cashmere filmed Cabello's new song "incredible love," which was leaked on Wednesday
"The 19-year-old girl has posted mysterious lyrics on her twitter many times and has made a splash in the studio. She is eager to stand out from her former team members."
"Since leaving fifth harmony a month ago, Camilla Cabello has been working hard as a solo artist to create her new voice."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“9 9 "The Final Straw" September 20, 2017 ( ) N/A”
“Arissa earns the admiration of her mother Kelly when she finds herself on a winning streak in her modeling career.”
“...overall No.”
“...inseason Title Original air date U.S. viewers(millions)1 1 "The New Wave" August 16, 2017 ( ) N/AThe model progeny meet and befriend each other at a Los Angeles photoshoot.”
“Cambrie Schroder moves out of her parents' house which emotionally affects her mother, Andrea, reeling from her divorce from Ricky Schroder.”
“2 2 "Daddy Issues" August 23, 2017 ( ) N/AAtiana De La Hoya invites the group (excluding Arissa Le Brock) to a photoshoot but Cambrie deems it unprofessional.”
“Beverly Peele is due to give birth to her next daughter, but Cairo is resentful.”
“3 3 "The Hookup Culture" August 30, 2017 ( ) N/AAtiana admits she prefers casual hook-ups, which doesn't sit well with Andrea, who believes Atiana is a bad influence.”
“Faith and Cambrie argue with their mom about slut shaming.”
“J.D.”


"9" last straw "20 September 2017 () not applicable"
"When Alisa found that she had been successful in her modeling career, she won the praise of her mother, Kelly."
“… "Total quantity"
“… In a photo shoot in Los Angeles on August 16, 2017, the descendants of models meet and become friends. "
"Cambry Schroeder moved out of her parents' house, which affected her mother Andrea emotionally because she divorced rich Schroeder."
"2" Dad problem "August 23, 2017 () n / aatiana de la Hoya invited the team (excluding arissa Le Brock) to take photos, but cambrie thought it was unprofessional."
"Beverly peel is about to give birth to a daughter, but Cairo is not happy about that."
"3" chat up culture "August 30, 2017 () n / aatiana admits that she prefers casual chat up, which is not suitable for Andrea. She thinks atiana is a bad influence."
"Faith and cambry argue with their mother about Slut humiliation."
“J.D.”



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And we're so glad!”
“In fact, in July 2016, Kunis revealed to late-night host James Corden that she always thought of Kutcher as just a pal who once helped her with her chemistry homework on set — until she caught a glimpse of him from behind at an awards ceremony years later.”
“The pair, who married in 2015 and have two kids, attended the star-studded 2018 Breakthrough Prize Awards ceremony on Sunday and walked the red carpet together for the very first time since they were co-stars on "That '70s Show."”
“Actors Ashton Kutcher and Mila Kunis attend the 2018 Breakthrough Prize at NASA Ames Research Center on December 3, 2017 in Mountain View, California.”
“Jesse Grant Getty Images The Bad Moms star 34 wore a strapless Dolce Gabbana gown featuring a pretty floral skirt while her husband 39 sported a classic black tuxedo to the annual event which honors achievements in math and science and was held at the NASA Ames Research Center in...”
“Mountain View California...”
“Steve Jennings / Getty ImagesNot only did the happy couple look terrific together, they also turned the occasion into a fun date night, chatting and laughing as they posed for shutterbugs, E!”
“News reports.”
“At one point, Kutcher put his arm around his wife's waist and whispered something in her ear that made her giggle.”
“Kimberly White / Getty ImagesThe lovebirds met as co-stars on "That '70s Show" back in 1998, but didn't fall for each other until more than a decade later.”


"We are so happy!"
"In fact, in July 2016, Kunis revealed to late night host James cordon that she always thought Kutcher was just a friend who had helped her with her chemistry homework on the set - until she caught a glimpse of Kutcher from behind at an award ceremony a few years later."
"The two married in 2015, have two children, and attended the star studded 2018 breakthrough awards ceremony on Sunday, their first time on the red carpet since they co starred in" that's the show of the 1970s. "
"Actors Ashton Kutcher and Mila Kunis attended the 2018 breakthrough awards ceremony at NASA Ames Research Center in mountain view, California, on December 3, 2017."
"Jesse grant Getty Images's 34 year old bad mom star wore a strapless Dolce Gabbana dress with beautiful flowers, while her husband, 39, wore a classic black tuxedo to participate in the NASA Ames study, focusing on The annual mathematics and science achievement commendation activities held in Beijing
"California mountain view..."
"Steve Jennings / Getty pictures the happy couple not only looked great together, they also turned the occasion into a fun date night, chatting, laughing and posing to the blindbug, e!"
"News coverage."
"Once, Kutcher put his arm around his wife's waist and whispered something in her ear that made her giggle."
Kimberly white / Getty in 1998, the couple met as co stars in the '70s show, but didn't fall in love until more than a decade later



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I can tell you that she has a little speckle on her left eye, and there are just little things about her that I find so endearing and sweet and amazing.”
““Lauren’s amazing.”
““With Lauren, there’s a little bit more of a risk just because I feel like through this whole thing she’s been so reserved,” he says.”
“One of four Laurens cast this season, she’s been one of the most quiet and reserved contestants this franchise has ever seen — but all along, Arie has been drawn to her.”
“I don’t really have any worries about us after this, and that really gives me a lot of comfort.”Then there’s Lauren.”
“It’s so comfortable with her.”
“She’s got great values, she loves her family, she’s funny and goofy and sexy at the same time.”
““She’s laid all the cards out on the table.”
““With Becca, I know who she is,” explains Arie.”
“She’s been a frontrunner from the beginning — landing the first one-on-one date of the season — and their relationship has remained solid throughout.”


"I can tell you that there is a spot on her left eye. I think some of her little things are so lovely, sweet and magical."
"Lauren is wonderful."
"It's more risky to be with Lauren, just because I think she's been very conservative throughout this," he said
"As one of Lawrence's four actors this season, she's one of the quietest and most conservative players in the show's history - but Ellie has always been attracted to her."
"After that, I really didn't worry about us, which really gave me a lot of comfort." And Lauren
"It's so comfortable to be with her."
"She has high values, she loves her family, she's funny and stupid and sexy."
"She put all the cards on the table."
"With Becca, I know who she is," Ellie explained
"She's been the front runner from the beginning - it's the first one-on-one date of the season - and their relationship has been solid."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The surprises continue when Melissa announces Life of the Party will donate an additional $25,000 and on top of that, Melissa and Ben are personally giving $25,000 for a total of $75,000.”
“Since Chassidy is unable to afford their tuitions, Ellen surprises the mother and daughter with $25,000 to put toward their education, courtesy of Shutterfly.”
“She's crushed by it... She regretting not finishing school.”
“'My character is very excited and her husband immediately says I want a divorce.”
“'We're tasking our daughter to college it's the first time she's going away which I can't even imagine.”
“Makeover: Her little girl gives her a new haircut and dresses her differently to fit inAs far as the movie, Melissa says it has a lot of heart.”
“And we kept going Happy Anniversary?'”
“'He's weirdly yelling out things like, "Can you grab his butt in the next take."”
“And to make it even more awkward, it was shot on the day of her 11th wedding anniversary with Ben.”
“We are in a relationship, there is some making out in a library.'”


"When Melissa announced that" life of the party "would donate another 25000 US dollars, the surprise continued. In addition, Melissa and Ben personally donated 25000 US dollars, totaling 75000 US dollars."
"Because chasidi couldn't afford the tuition, Ellen surprised the mother and daughter and offered them $25000 for their study, which was provided by shutterfly."
"She was crushed by it... She regretted not finishing her studies
"My character was so excited that her husband immediately said I was going to divorce."
"We let our daughter go to college. This is her first time to leave. I can't imagine it."
"A makeover: her little daughter gave her a new haircut and dressed her differently to meet the needs of the film, which Melissa said was very meaningful."
"Do we continue to have a happy anniversary?"
"He yelled strangely," can you grab his ass in the next shot
"What's more embarrassing is that this picture was taken on the 11th anniversary of her marriage to Ben."
"We're in love. Someone's making out in the library."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Representatives for Rihanna, Nyong’o, and DuVernay have not yet responded to Vanity Fair’s request for comment.”
“The project is still in the early stages and will potentially begin production in 2018, per EW.”
“Now it is.”
“From there, DuVernay and Rae tweeted their approval of the project, getting everyone’s hopes up for this fictional idea to start becoming a reality.”
“Things took a more serious turn when Nyong’o herself tweeted their work at Rihanna, saying, “I’m down if you are.” Rihanna tweeted back, saying, “I’m in Pit’z.” You know things are getting real when celebrities start using nicknames.”
“...the scans After that several more Twitter users tweeted about the hypothetical project dreaming up storylines for a fictional film and imagining who should join the behind the scenes team tagging DuVernay and Rae in the process...”
“The picture went viral on Tumblr shortly after it was taken then took the Internet by storm again recently when Twitter user 1800SADGAL tweeted it out joking that in the image Rihanna looks like she scams rich white men and lupita is the computer smart best friend that helps plan...”
“The prospective movie was inspired by a photo of Rihanna and Nyong’o side by side at a Miu Miu fashion show in 2014.”
“DuVernay also seemed to confirm the news on Twitter, tweeting, “We deserve nice things,” and sharing a link to the movie news on Twitter Moments.”
“Rae’s team confirmed to Vanity Fair that the project is in the works, adding that the original Twitter users who imagined the concept for this film will be credited and included in some form.”


"Representatives of Rihanna, nyong'o and Duvernay have yet to respond to vanity fair's request for comment."
"The project is still in its early stages and is expected to go into production in 2018."
"Now it is."
"Since then, duvinai and ray have tweeted their approval of the project, making everyone hope that this fictional idea will come true."
"Things have changed a lot. When nyong'o herself posted their work in Rihanna on her micro blog, she said," if you're me, I'm out of business. "Rihanna replied on Weibo," I'm at pit'z. "You know when celebrities start using nicknames, things get real."
“… After the scan, several other Twitter users posted a hypothetical project on Twitter to conceive a storyline for a fictional movie and imagine who should join the behind the scenes team, tagging Duvernay and Rae in the process... "
"This picture went viral on Tumblr shortly after it was shot, and recently it caused a stir on the Internet. Twitter user 1800sadgal joked on twitter that in this picture, Rihanna looks like cheating rich white people, Lupita is a good friend of computer intelligence, help plan..."
"This film of the future was inspired by the side-by-side photos of Rihanna and nyong'o at the 2014 Miu Miu fashion show."
"Duvernay also seems to have confirmed the news on twitter, where he said," we should get something good "and shared a link to the movie news on twitter."
"Rae's team confirmed to vanity fair that the project was in progress, adding that Twitter users who initially envisioned the movie's concept would be recognized and included in some form."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read more from Yahoo Celebrity:”
“'”Maybe he should enlist his new BFF, Officer Bivens, to talk to the boys about the importance of keeping their rooms clean.”
““It’s still yours, but I’m going to hang on to it.”
“I’m going to hang on to it, guys,” he said.”
““I was like, ‘You know what?”
“However, he said he later took it back after he saw it in the corner of one of their bedrooms covered in clothes.”
“...he forgot to thank them in his acceptance speech...”
“I had to google him later and I thought Holy mackerel this guy s really famous That led to Affleck to joke We re not going anywhere else together now Affleck who finally shaved off that beard also talked about giving his Oscar to his sons Atticus and Indiana after...”
““I knew it was somebody who was famous, but I couldn’t put my finger on it,” the cop said.”
“While seated in the audience, he explained that he initially didn’t know who the Manchester by the Sea actor was.”


"Read more about Yahoo celebrities:
"Maybe he should call up his new friend, officer Bevins, to talk to the children about the importance of keeping the room clean."
"It's still yours, but I'll stick to it."
"I'll stick with it, guys," he said
"I said," you know what? "
"But, he said, he saw it in the corner of one of their bedrooms, covered in clothes, and brought it back."
“…… In his acceptance speech, he forgot to thank them.... "
"Later, I had to Google him. I thought this guy was really famous, which made Affleck joke that we are not going anywhere else now. Affleck finally shaved off his beard and said that he would give his Oscar to his sons Atticus and Indiana..."
"I know this is a very famous person, but I can't put my finger on it," the police said
As he sat in the audience, he explained that he didn't know at first who the actors were on the beach in Manchester



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The couple started dating earlier this year and confirmed their relationship on Valentine's Day.”
“...with you Lets make a lot shmoney and love together...”
“Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid EmailThis is the touching moment rapper Offset proposed to his girlfriend Cardi B on stage in front of thousands of screaming fans.”
“The Migos rapper, best known for the 2016 hit Bad And Boujee, dropped to his knee and waved an enormous eight-carat diamond ring in front of Cardi as she shouted in surprise.”
“They had been at Power 99's Powerhouse concert in Philadelphia when Offset - real name Kiari Kendrell Cephus - touched Cardi's arm to get her attention while she was talking to the crowd.”
“Dropping down to one knee as she turned around, Offset then showed her a dark jewellery box containing the huge bling and Cardi reacted by dancing around on the spot and shaking her long dark hair in excitment.”
“(Image: Getty Images North America)Offset took the ring out of the box and placed it on Cardi['s left hand as she gasped in amazement before hugging him in front of all their delighted fans.”
“The sweet moment came just two months after the Bodak Yellow rapper gushed over her relationship with Offset, telling MTV that she was ready to take the next step with him.”
“"I'm a woman.”
“Every woman, I think, wants to get married and wants to have children," she said.”


"The couple started dating earlier this year and confirmed their relationship on Valentine's day."
“… Make a lot of money with you, love together... "
"Thank you for subscribing to our more newsletters. Let me see our invalid privacy email. It's a touching moment for rapper offset to propose to his girlfriend Cardi B in front of thousands of screaming fans."
"The migos rapper, best known for bud and buggy in 2016, fell to his knees and waved a huge 8-carat diamond ring in front of Katie when she screamed in surprise."
"When they were at the power 99 concert in Philadelphia, offset - whose real name is Carey Kendall severs - touched Cady's arm to get her attention as she talked to the audience."
She turned around, knelt down on one knee, and showed her a black jewelry box with huge jewelry in it. Cady danced on the spot and shook her long black hair excitedly
"(photo source: Getty Images North America) offset takes the ring out of the box and puts it on Caddy's left hand. Caddy gasps in surprise and hugs him in front of all the happy fans."
Just two months ago, the bodak yellow rapper talked about her relationship with offset and told MTV that she was ready to take the next step with him
"I'm a woman."
"I think every woman wants to get married and have children," she said



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s a personal relationship.”
“Koenig said her relationship with Syed is “Definitely [...] weird and hard to define.”
“...killer is punished...”
“They all concern the violent deaths of beautiful young women they all suggest that the police were incompetent in securing justice for that woman s death and they all invite the audience to retrace the gory details of her killing perhaps in order to save her by ensuring her real...”
“Serial, The Jinx and Making a Murderer do show how far the genre has developed since then, but they also share some key similarities.”
“Take, for example, the early twentieth century magazine, True Detective, which splashed sensational stories across its covers like “The Riddle of Oregon’s Dismembered Brunette”, and spawned giants of the genre like Dashiell Hammett, Jim Thompson, and Ann Rule.”
“Real life crime stories have long been treated as entertainment: from eighteenth-century tabloids to In Cold Blood to The Thin Blue Line.”
“If finding the truth necessitates remaining objective, I’m not sure to what extent these aims are compatible.”
“The makers of Serial, The Jinx, and Making a Murderer would all declare their purposes were twofold: to make an entertaining programme, and to find the truth.”
“I love these shows for their strangeness, for their sheer spectacle, and for the thrill each time new and crazier evidence comes to light, confirming my insightful suspicions.”


"It's a personal relationship."
Koenig said her relationship with said was "absolutely [...] ]It's weird, it's hard to define. "
“… The murderer was punished... "
"They are all concerned about the violent death of a beautiful young woman. They all think that the police are not capable of justice for this woman's death. They all invite the audience to trace back the bloody details of her death, perhaps to save her by ensuring her true identity..."
Series, doom and murderer do show how far this genre has developed since then, but they also have some key similarities
For example, in the early 20th century, real detective magazine published sensational stories on its cover, such as the mystery of the dismembered black haired woman in Oregon, and gave birth to such giants as dashier Hammett, Jim Thompson and Ann Ruhr
"Real life crime stories have long been seen as entertainment: from 18th century tabloids to cold blood to thin blue line."
"If finding out the truth requires objectivity, I'm not sure to what extent these goals are consistent."
The producers of the series, doom and the murderer all claim that their purpose is twofold: to make an entertainment show and to discover the truth
"I love these shows because of their strangeness, because of their spectacle, because whenever new and crazier evidence is found, I feel excited, which confirms my insightful doubt."



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But I also think that shouldn’t cloud the decisions that need to be made for the future.””
“The NBC show currently averages 4 million viewers a morning, a 3 percent drop from 2017 before Lauer’s exit, the Nielsen company said.”
“For much of the past half-century, CBS has been an after-thought in the mornings, a distant third-place broadcast that changed names, formats and personalities as often as an impatient designer changes paint.”
“More: A year after Lauer firing, ex-reporter calls out NBC; Comcast says she's wrong“It just has the strongest DNA out of all the morning shows,” said Shelley Ross, who produced rivals at ABC and CBS.”
“The show launched in 1952 and while it has had missteps – it has never recovered the dominance it enjoyed prior to the ham-fisted departure of Ann Curry a decade ago – “Today” viewers can be confident it will be around tomorrow.”
“The long history of “Today” likely helps it absorb hits.”
“ABC’s “Good Morning America,” the first-place broadcast with 4.1 million viewers, lost 5 percent of its audience.”
“CBS has lost 10 percent of its audience in the same period, to just under 3.2 million.”
“Lauer’s downfall, also due to reports of inappropriate relationships with women, came less than two weeks later.”
“Rose, a skillful interviewer who moonlighted on both “60 Minutes” and his own PBS show, teamed with Gayle King and Norah O’Donnell.”


"But I also don't think that should cast a shadow over future decisions."
"NBC now has an average of 4 million viewers every morning, down 3% from 2017 before Raul left," Nielsen said
"For most of the past half century, CBS has been people's afterthought in the morning, a distant third place broadcast that has changed its name, form and personality as often as an impatient designer has changed the paint."
"More: a year after Raul was fired, a former reporter called NBC; Comcast said she was wrong," says Shelley Ross, a rival producer at ABC and CBS. "It just has the strongest DNA of all morning shows."
"The show was launched in 1952, and although it made mistakes - it never regained its dominance a decade ago before Ann Curry's clumsy departure - today's viewers can believe that it will appear tomorrow."
Today's long history is likely to help it absorb hits
ABC's "Good Morning America" ranked first with 4.1 million viewers, down 5 percent
"CBS lost 10 percent of its audience in the same period, less than 3.2 million."
Less than two weeks later, Raul's downfall was also due to reports of improper relations with women
Rose, a skilled interviewer, worked part-time on 60 minutes and his own PBS program, working with Gail king and Nora O'Donnell



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While we wait to hear more about their supposed romantic getaway, read up on what's really going on between Bieber and Gomez.”
“As of now, Justin is not invited."”
“According to Entertainment Tonight, Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber looked cute and cozy over the weekend when they were spotted boarding a private jet together at the Van Nuys airport in California on Saturday, Dec. 16, 2017.”
“In photos shared by TMZ, the "Wolves" singer, who recently announced that her new album will drop "very soon," was bundled up in a black coat.”
“Meanwhile, Bieber sported jeans and kept warm in a multi-colored jacket.”
“The "Boyfriend" hitmaker smiled and Gomez kept her head down as the two walked alongside their pilot, pulling their carry-on luggage behind them.”
“As the gossip rag noted, "they're packed for at least a few days."”
“TMZ later reported that the two had landed in Seattle, Wash., before hitting up the Sugar Factory on Saturday evening for what looked to be a super sweet date night.”
“As Nicki Swift previously reported, Gomez, 25, and Bieber, 23, dated on and off between 2011 and 2014, before spiraling into a turbulent breakup.”
“However, the infamous exes appeared to finally make peace with one another after Gomez opened up about her kidney transplant earlier this fall.”


"As we wait for more information about their so-called romantic getaway, please read carefully what happened between Bieber and Gomez."
"So far, Justin has not been invited."
"According to entertainment tonight, Serena Gomez and Justin Bieber were found boarding a private plane together at fannius airport, California, on Saturday, December 16, 2017. They looked lovely and cozy at the weekend."
"In the photos shared by TMZ, the wolf singer, who recently announced the end of his new album soon, was wrapped up in a black coat."
"Meanwhile, Bieber was wearing a multicolor jacket and jeans to keep warm."
"Boyfriend" killer smile, Gomez head down, two people walk next to the pilot, dragging carry on luggage behind
As the rumor goes, "they have to pack for at least a few days."
"TMZ later reported that the two landed in Seattle, Washington, and went to a sugar factory on Saturday night for a seemingly super sweet date night."
"As Nicky swift previously reported, Gomez, 25, and Bieber, 23, dated intermittently between 2011 and 2014, and then fell into a tumultuous breakup."
"However, after Gomez made her kidney transplant public earlier this fall, the two notorious predecessors seem to have finally reconciled."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ticketholders can also seek a refund at point of purchase, according to the band’s social media account.”
“— Dead & Company (@deadandcompany) December 5, 2017All tickets for the December 5 show will be honored for the rescheduled date, according to the statement.”
“Early this morning, Tuesday, December 5th, John Mayer was admitted into the hospital for emergency appendectomy forcing the Dead & Company December 5th concert in New Orleans to be postponed.”
“The band’s official Twitter account broke the news of Mayer’s health issue early Tuesday.”
“The group includes former Grateful Dead members Bob Weir, Mickey Hart, and Bill Kreutzmann.”
“Mayer’s representative said on Wednesday the singer was “in good spirits.”Dead & Company has been around since 2015.”
“On Wednesday, Mayer’s representative said concerts scheduled for December 7 and 8 in Florida would also be postponed.”
“Mayer was admitted into the hospital on Tuesday morning, forcing his band Dead & Company to postponed its December 5 concert in New Orleans.”
“(CNN) —John Mayer is on the mend following an emergency appendectomy, his representative confirms to CNN.”


"According to the band's social media account, ticket holders can also ask for a refund at the time of purchase."
"Dead & Company (@ deadandcompany) December 5, 2017 according to the statement, all tickets for the performance on December 5 will be cashed on the rescheduled date."
John Mayer was taken to hospital early this morning, Tuesday, December 5, for appendectomy, which forced a postponement of the "death and company" concert in New Orleans on December 5
"The band's official twitter account announced earlier on Tuesday about Meyer's health problems."
"This organization includes former grateful members Bob will, Mickey Hart and bill kruzman."
Mayer's representative said on Wednesday that he was "in good mental condition.". "Death and company" has been around since 2015
Meyer's representatives said on Wednesday that concerts originally scheduled for December 7 and 8 in Florida would also be postponed
Mayer was admitted to the hospital on Tuesday morning, forcing his band to die and delaying its December 5 concert in New Orleans
(CNN) - John Mayer's agent confirmed to CNN that he was improving after emergency appendectomy



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“-30-”
“More information can be found in the ESPYS media kit: http://bit.ly/1Qfu16d.”
“WHERE:Fans can cast their vote at ESPYS.com and a list of The 25th ESPYS nominees is available to members of the media at: http://bit.ly/2017ESPYnom.”
“WHEN:Voting is underway and all categories will close when the live show starts on Wednesday, July 12, at 8 p.m.”
“ET.”
“Pardon the Interruption’s Tony Kornheiser and Michael Wilbon will host The ESPY Nomination Special on Sunday, July 2, at 3 pm ET on ESPN.”
“HOW:Fans will determine the winners in most ESPYS categories by voting online at ESPYS.com up to the start of The 25th ESPYS.”
“2017 ESPYS FACTS & FIGURES:In Best Male Athlete, 2009 winner Michael Phelps is joined by three newcomers to the category – Sidney Crosby, Russell Westbrook, and Kris Bryant.”
“Westbrook has history working in his favor, given that the award has gone to an NBA player every year since 2011.”
“Oklahoma softball’s Shay Knighten and Clemson football’s Deshaun Watson are both nominated for Best Championship Performance, the first time since 2005 that multiple college athletes have competed for the honor.”


“-30-”
"More information can be found in the espys media kit: http://bit.ly/1Qfu16d 。”
"Location: fans can vote against it ESPYS.com The 25th espys nomination list can be provided to the media through the following website: http://bit.ly/2017ESPYnom 。”
"When: voting is in progress and all categories will be closed on Wednesday, July 12, at 8 p.m. when the live show begins."
"Wait a minute."
"Excuse me for interrupting Tony Cohen, Heather and Michael Wilburn will host the ESPY nominations special at ESPN on Sunday, July 2, at 3 p.m. est."
"How: fans will vote online to determine the winner of most espys categories ESPYS.com Website until the beginning of the 25th espys. "
"Espys 2017 facts and figures: best male athlete, 2009 champion Michael Phelps joins three new categories - West Nick Rossby, Russell Westbrook and Chris Bryant
"Westbrook's history is good for him because this award has been awarded to an NBA player every year since 2011."
"Both Oklahoma softball's shannetten and Clemson's deshaw Watson have been nominated for the best tournament performance award, the first time since 2005 that more than one college student has competed for the honor."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...allegations went public two days after she had undergone an elective total hysterectomy in the hopes of treating her chronic pain caused by endometriosis and she was she was high as a f ing kite from the surgery...”
“Miller s attorney Matthew Walerstein told The Wrap at the time he categorically and vehemently denies Ms Perrineau s outrageous claims adding that his legal team had gathered overwhelming evidence directly contradicting these false and offensive claims In an interview with New York Magazine last month Dunham said Perrineau s...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I made a terrible mistake.”
“When someone I knew, someone I had loved as a brother, was accused, I did something inexcusable: I publicly spoke up in his defense,” she wrote.”
““There are few acts I could ever regret more in this life.”
“I didn t have the insider information I claimed but rather blind faith in a story that kept slipping and changing and revealed itself to mean nothing at all I wanted to feel my workplace and my world were safe untouched by the outside world a privilege in and of...”
“...itself the privilege of ignoring what hasn t hurt you and I claimed that safety at cost to someone else someone very special she continued...”
“Dunham also apologized directly to Perrineau, 24.”
““To Aurora: You have been on my mind and in my heart every day this year,” she said.”


“…… The charges were made public two days after she underwent selective total hysterectomy, hoping to treat her chronic pain caused by endometriosis. She felt high after the operation... "
"Miller's lawyer, Matthew Wallerstein, told the Wall Street Journal at the time that he flatly and strongly denied Ms. Perino's shameless charges, adding that his legal team had collected a large amount of evidence in an interview with New York magazine last month to directly refute these false and offensive charges. Dunham said, "Ms. Perino..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I made a terrible mistake."
"When someone I know, a brother I love, is accused, I do something unforgivable: I defend him openly," she wrote
"There is nothing I regret most in my life
"I don't have the inside information I claim, but blindly believe in a story, which is constantly falling and changing, and shows that it is meaningless. I want to feel that my workplace and my world are safe and free from the influence of the outside world. This is a privilege, in harmony with..."
“… It's a privilege in itself to ignore what doesn't hurt you, and I claim that security comes at the expense of others, a very special person, she continued
"Dunham also apologized directly to Perino, 24."
"To Aurora: you're in my mind every day this year, in my heart," she said



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“According to Beyoncé’s Instagram, the names are Rumi and Sir Carter, two handles that are definitely unique enough to keep company with the likes of Blue Ivy.”
“Beyoncé announced that she and Jay Z would be expecting not one, but two new additions to the family in February of this year with an artistic Instagram photo of herself clad in a veil and an exposed baby bump that sent the Internet into a tizzy.”
““We would like to share our love and happiness.”
“We have been blessed two times over,” the “Lemonade” singer captioned the photo.”
“Beyoncé shared a series of photos throughout her pregnancy, many who featured their 5-year-old daughter, Blue Ivy Carter.”
“The twins’ birth was one of the most widely anticipated events of 2017, with Beyoncé’s avant garde Instagram pregnancy announcement breaking a Guinness World Record for most liked photo on Instagram.”
“The power couple, who married in 2008, welcomed Blue – who is now five – on January 7, 2012.”
“See the name announcement in all its glory below.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
Please enter a valid email address
"According to Beyonce's instagram, which is named rummy and Sir Carter, these two handles are absolutely unique enough to be compatible with plants such as blue ivy."
"Beyonce announced that what she and jay z are looking forward to is not one, but two new family members added in February this year. A veiled art photo of her on instagram and an exposed baby lump have thrown the Internet into chaos."
"We are willing to share our love and happiness."
"We've been blessed twice," the lemonade singer wrote in the title of the photo
"Beyonce shared a series of photos during her pregnancy, many of which were photos of their five-year-old daughter, Ivy Carter."
"The birth of the twins is one of the most anticipated events in 2017, and Beyonce's avant-garde instagram pregnancy announcement broke the Guinness world record for the most popular photo on instagram."
"The power couple got married in 2008, and on January 7, 2012, they ushered in blue, now five years old."
"Please see the name announcement below."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Also inside the InStyle party, Diane Kruger made a quick outfit change into a white top and black pant while her boyfriend and Walking Dead star Norman Reedus met up with their mutual friends.”
“At the same soirée, Vanessa Hudgens, Julianne Hough and Nina Dobrev were having a great time on the dance floor.”
“Image zoomMeanwhile, Paulson and Jennifer Aniston celebrated Sam Rockwell‘s award for best supporting actor in a motion picture.”
“Angelina Jolie and son Pax enjoyed their mother-son night, sitting next to Chris Hemsworth and bowing their heads in conversation throughout the night.”
““It’s time!” she yelled at him before hugging and kissing him offstage after his acceptance speech.”
“Sterling K. Brown‘s historic win was loudly applauded by many in the room, including his People v. O. J. Simpson: American Crime Story costar Sarah Paulson who jumped out of her seat and sat on the stage stairs to enjoy the moment.”
“Be sure to check out PEOPLE’s full Golden Globes coverage to get the latest news on Hollywood’s big night.”
“This Is Us creator Dan Fogelman perfectly captured the moment Hanks returned to his table with a tray of martinis for his cast.”
“During the first commercial break, Tom Hanks was spotted at the lobby bar getting drinks for The Post table.”
“Meyers received a huge reaction from the star-studded crowd with many resounding “ooh’s” when the emcee made the joke about Harvey Weinstein being included in the In Memoriam section of the show in 20 years.”


At InStyle's party, Diane Kruger quickly changed into a white coat and black pants, while her boyfriend and "walking dead" star Norman Reedus met their mutual friend
"At the same party, Vanessa Huggins, Julian Hoff and Nina Dobrev had a good time on the dance floor."
Paulson and Jennifer Aniston celebrate Sam Rockwell's best supporting role
"Angelina Jolie and her son, parks, enjoyed their mother and son's night sitting next to Chris Hemsworth and talking all night."
"It's time! "After his acceptance speech, she yelled at him before hugging and kissing him off stage."
Sterling K. Brown's historic victory won warm applause from many people, including Sarah Paulson, the star of his people's magazine Simpson: the American crime story, who jumped out of her seat and sat on the stage stairs to enjoy the moment
"Be sure to check out people's full coverage of the Golden Globes and get the latest news on Hollywood night."
"This is the moment when American creator Dan fogman perfectly captured Hanks coming back to the table with a plate of martini."
"During the first commercial break, Tom Hanks was found in the lobby bar carrying drinks for the post desk."
"When the host joked that Harvey Weinstein had been included in the commemorative part of the show within 20 years, Meyers got a huge response from the crowd of stars, a lot of loud" oops. "



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Source: ENewsGet more information here:”
“Claire Foy the British actress won he second straight SAG Award for performance by a female actor for her role as Queen Elizabeth II on The Crown.”
“Here's 6 of the biggest jaw- droppers from the night:1: Julia Louis- Dreyfus won her 3rd & 4th SAG Awards for Veep, for best performance by a female actor in a comedy series!”
“She now has won 9 SAG Awards!”
“2: Sterling K.”
“Brown!!!”
“I love him, mainly because of his role in This Is Us but he won best performance by a male actor in a drama series AND best performance by an ensemble for a drama series- This Is US.”
“3: Elisabeth Moss!!!”
“4: Big Little Lies cast is full of so much love.”
“Oscars & Grammy's' to come soon.”


Source: enewsget more information here:
"British actress Claire foy won the sag actress Performance Award for the second time in a row for her role as Queen Elizabeth II in the crown."
"Here are six of the world's biggest jaw hanging Nights: 1: Julia Lewis Dreyfus won the third and fourth sag awards for her" veep, "her best actress performance award in the comedy series
"She has now won nine sag awards!"
"2: pounds."
"Brown!"
"I love him mainly because of his role in this is us, but he won the best actor performance award and the best company performance award - this is us."
"3: Elizabeth moss!"
"4: big and small lies are full of love."
"The Oscars and Grammys are just around the corner."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We would also like to thank the Los Angeles Police Department, KlaasKIDS, SERT Ministries and Anonymity Rescue for their efforts in bringing Julia home."”
“We are so grateful to every single person who helped spread the word and joined us in our search.”
“More than a month after actress Arielle Kebbel announced that her sister, Julia, had been found safe after being missing for two weeks, Julia took to Instagram to explain what led to her disappearance, revealing that she suffers from bipolar disorder.”
“Using Arielle Kebbel's Instagram account, the director of promotions at NBCUniversal wrote her story captioned under a photo of herself looking at a sunset on a cliffside.”
“"My name is Julia Kebbel.”
“I have bipolar disorder and suffered a severe episode at the end of January 2018," the post read.”
“"It led to me experiencing a psychotic break from reality, during which time, I went missing with my dog, Cindy."”
“Julia thanked her loved ones and "good Samaritans" who helped her during the frightening ordeal, also revealing that she is "grateful for the treatment and care" she is receiving for her mental illness.”
“"I would like to thank every person involved in the search for us for your incredible outpouring of support and love," she added.”
“"On my road to recovery, I am hoping to help raise awareness of mental health disorders, including fighting the stigmatization of these illnesses that affect so many.”


"We would also like to thank the Los Angeles Police Department, craskide, SERT departments and anonymous rescue organizations for their efforts to bring Julia home."
"We are very grateful to everyone who helped spread the information and joined our search."
"More than a month ago, actress Arielle Kebbel announced that her sister Julia was found safe two weeks after she disappeared. Julia explained the cause of her disappearance on instagram, revealing that she had bipolar disorder."
"Nbcuniversal's marketing director used Arielle Kebbel's instagram account to write his story under a photo of himself watching the sunset on the edge of a cliff."
"My name is Julia Cabell."
"I suffered from bipolar disorder and experienced a serious attack at the end of January 2018," the Post wrote
"It made me experience schizophrenia with reality, during which my dog Cindy and I disappeared."
Julia thanks the people she loves and the "good people" who helped her in this terrible ordeal. She also reveals that she "thanks" her treatment and care for her mental illness
"I want to thank everyone involved in our search for incredible support and love," she added
"On my way to recovery, I hope to help people raise their awareness of mental diseases, including eliminating the stigmatization of these diseases that affect so many people."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the video above.”
““Don’t let ISIS win.”In the end, she got it right, and harmonizing with a choir commenced — but Corden got a weird look on his face and realized that the choir was singing, “Hello Julia” instead of “Hallelujah.” And it was all Wiig’s fault.”
““I cannot bear this cross any longer.”“James,” Wiig said, trying to calm him down.”
“See Video: 'Carpool Karaoke': James Corden Hosts Impromptu Date-Night for Kelly Clarkson, Her Husband“I don’t know who will bring about world peace, but it won’t be us,” Corden said after the final straw.”
“Throughout the video, Wiig transformed “Hallelujah” to “Hollaback girl,” “Halle Berry,” “Hickory Farms,” “How are you” and “Happy Doo Dee,” among others.”
“He then tried to get her to say Hallelujah out loud in conversation, but she refused to say the actual word.”
“However, she still couldn’t get it right but found a different way to pronounce it wrong, which angered Corden.”
““I don’t know if you are pronouncing … I think you are pronouncing Hallelujah wrong.”“I don’t think I was,” Wiig responded, but agreed to try again.”
“See Video: James Corden's First-Annual 'Late Late Show' Christmas Giveaway Totally Sucks“I’m sorry, Kristen,” he said after he stopped the music.”
“Everything went well, until Corden realized Wiig’s pronunciation of the word “Hallelujah” wasn’t quite right.”


"Watch the video above."
"Don't let Isis win." In the end, she got it right and began to harmonize with the Choir - but with a strange look on his face, cordon realized that the choir was singing "Hello Julia" instead of "Hallelujah.". It's all wig's fault
"I can't stand this cross any more." "James," wig said, trying to calm him down
"Watch the video: 'carpool karaoke': James Corden hosts an impromptu date night for her husband Kelly Clarkson." I don't know who will bring world peace, but it won't be us, "Corden said after the last straw
"Throughout the video, Wiig turned Hallelujah into hollback girl, Halle Berry, pecan farm, how are you and happy doodle."
"Then he tried to get her to say Hallelujah out loud in the conversation, but she refused to tell the truth."
"But she didn't get it right, but she found another way to pronounce it wrong, which angered cordon."
"I don't know if you're reading I think you mispronounced Hallelujah "I don't think I am," wig replied, but agreed to try again. "
"Watch the video: James cordon's first annual late show Christmas gift sucks," he said after stopping the music. "I'm sorry, Christine."
"Everything went well until cordon realized that wig didn't pronounce the word 'Hallelujah' very correctly."



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...ex hasn t If you or someone you know is in need of help please contact the SAMHSA substance abuse helpline at 1 800 662 HELP”
“I am happy for her and the fact that she s moving forward with her life just as I m sure she is with me It honestly seemed he was over the Ariana situation the source reveals adding that Miller had said at one point I ve matured and my...”
“One day after the 26-year-old rapper was pronounced dead from an apparent overdose, Grande, 25, shared a black-and-white photograph of her former boyfriend via Instagram on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In the picture, Miller stares up at the camera while sitting on the grass.”
“A pair of tennis shoes, presumably Grande’s, can be seen between his legs.”
“Choosing to let the image speak for itself, Grande shared the image without a caption.”
“The “God Is a Woman” singer disabled comments on the social media platform after some fans began to blame her for Miller’s death on Friday.”
“Miller, whose real name was Malcolm McCormick, was pronounced dead at 11:51 a.m. at his Studio City, California, home on Friday, the Los Angeles County Department of Medical Examiner-Coroner confirmed in a statement to PEOPLE.”
“A cause of death is yet to be determined, but a source told PEOPLE that Miller had gone into cardiac arrest after appearing to suffer a drug overdose.”


“… If you or someone you know need help, please contact the SAMHSA drug abuse help hotline at 1800 662 "help"
"I'm happy for her and, in fact, she's going on with her life just as I'm sure she's with me. To be honest, he seems to have put an end to Ariana's situation. According to the source, Miller once said, "I'm mature, my..."
"The day after the 26 year old rapper was declared dead from an apparent drug overdose, Grande, 25, shared a black-and-white picture of her ex boyfriend on instagram on Saturday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In this photo, Miller sits on the grass and stares at the camera
"You can see a pair of tennis shoes between his legs, probably Glenn's."
"Grande chose to let this photo speak for himself. He shared this photo without explanation."
The "God is a woman" singer commented on social media as some fans on Friday began to blame her for Miller's death
"Miller, whose real name is Malcolm McCormick, was pronounced dead at his home in Studio City, California, at 11:51 a.m. Friday, the coroner of the Los Angeles County Department of forensic medicine confirmed in a statement to people magazine."
"The cause of death has not yet been determined, but a source told people that Miller appeared to have cardiac arrest due to an overdose."



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Also Read: 'Orange Is the New Black' Star Laverne Cox on Why Season 4 Was Unlike Any Other Season (Exclusive Video)“Orange Is the New Black” Season 6 will drop on July 27 on Netflix.”
“Watch the teaser below.”
““OITNB” is produced by Lionsgate and also stars Laverne Cox, Uzo Aduba, Danielle Brooks and Dascha Palanco.”
“...holed up in Frieda s bunker that had just been turned over by CERT officers while the rest of the penitentiary s inmates were loaded up on buses and shipped out to new prisons...”
“Also Read Orange Is the New Black Star Laverne Cox Exclusive EmmyQuickie Portraits Photos In case you didn t remember since it s been a while the final episode of season five played out over three days during a riot and saw Piper Alex Laura Prepon and Nicky Natasha Lyonne...”
“Well, at least that’s what Piper (Taylor Schilling) says and based on where we left things last year, its safe to say the times are a changin’.”
“It’s been almost a year since we saw the ladies of Litchfield and, based on the one line of dialogue we get in the clip, we can tell you we’re entering a whole new world with them when they return.”
“But we’re willing to overlook the lack of action now that we know when the sixth installment will drop.”
“Yeah, the release date announcement video is less than 20 seconds and just scans an abandoned mess hall in the prison.”
“On Tuesday, Netflix revealed that the dark comedy will return for Season 6 on July 27 with, well, is their another word for teaser that means extra teaser?”


"Also read: 'orange is the new black' star Lavine Cox why the fourth season is different from any other season (exclusive video)" orange is the new black "the sixth season will fall on July 27 at Netflix."
"Look at the joke below."
Oitnb is produced by Lion Gate, starring ravine Cox, uzzo aduba, Danielle Brooks and Dasha palanco
“… Hiding in Frida's bunker, which has just been turned upside down by cert officials, while other prisoners in the prison are transported to the new prison by bus.... "
"While reading orange is the new black star Lavine Cox's exclusive portrait of Amy Casey, just in case you don't remember, because it's been a while since the last episode of season 5 played for three days, in a riot, to see Piper, Alex laulappen and nikina tashalin..."
"Well, at least that's what Piper (Tyler Schilling) said. Based on what we left last year, we can say for sure that the times are a change."
"We haven't seen the ladies in Lichfield for nearly a year. According to a dialogue in the clip, we can tell you that when they come back, we are entering a new world with them."
"But we are willing to ignore the lack of action because we know when phase 6 will end."
"Yes, the video of the announcement date is less than 20 seconds, just scanning an abandoned canteen in the prison."
Netflix revealed on Tuesday that the black comedy will return to season 6 on July 27. Well, another word they use is "banter", which means "extra banter"



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Millie was like, ‘I want to do this with Linnea.’””
“He continued: “When we got to the point of writing the episode, we wanted to see if we really needed it or not.”
“The controversial standalone episode, “The Lost Sister”, which featured Eleven teaming up with a group of violent punks in Chicago, almost didn’t even happen according to the show’s creators Matt and Ross Duffer.”
“In an interview at Vulture, the brothers dove deep on their thinking behind the episode.”
“They said that the intention was to have a kind of break before the climactic final two episodes.”
“RELATED: ‘Stranger Things’ Kids Watch Their Own Audition Tapes“It was sort of like a pilot, but there was no intention to do a spinoff or anything.”
“But it does feel like that.”
“It’s a totally different show embedded within the show.”
“Because we wanted Eleven to have her own journey and have this journey of self-discovery or whatever, that’s why we did it,” Matt explained.”
“We actually did toy with pulling the episode completely, but then the ending with Eleven didn’t work at all.”


"Millie said," I want to do it with Lina. "
"When we're going to write this episode, we want to see if we really need it," he added
According to the show's creators Matt and rose Duffy, 11 people in the controversial independent episode "lost sister" teamed up with a group of violent punks in Chicago, but hardly happened
"In an interview with vultures, the brothers thought deeply about the reasons behind the incident."
"They said the aim was to take a break before the last two episodes of the climax."
"Related reports:" strangers' children watch their own audition tapes. "It's a bit like a pilot, but not intended to do a spin off or anything
"But it does feel like that."
"It's a completely different show."
Matt explained, "we do it because we want the 11th to have a journey of our own, a journey of self discovery or something."
"We're actually playing to pull this episode out completely, but the ending of the next 11 episodes didn't help at all."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here, Coogler makes black identity invincible, but avoids simplification by turning Wakanda into a society of different tribes, each with its own customs, goals and political agendas that reflect a conflicted world very much like our own.””
“Black Girl Nerds It s afro futuristic and Blackity black as hell...”
“With 49 early reviews in, “Black Panther” currently has a perfect 100 percent score on Rotten Tomatoes, with critics raving about Coogler’s vision for the African utopia and its conflicted king/superhero, played by Chadwick Boseman.”
“Kudos have also gone to Coogler’s long-running collaborators, including including production designer Hannah Beachler, editor Michael P. Shawver, and newly minted Oscar nominated cinematographer Rachel Morrison for helping turn Wakanda into a living, breathing world.”
“Also Read Black Panther Film Review Supporting Players Steal Show in Marvel s Excellent African Adventure But the biggest praise has gone to the film s supporting cast with critics hailing Michael B Jordan s performance as Erik Killmonger as the latest addition to Marvel s recent streak of intriguing...”
“...villains after years of forgettable foes...”
“The women of Wakanda have also been praised as show-stealers, with breakout star Letitia Wright standing out as Black Panther’s excitable tech wunderkind sister Shuri.”
““‘Black Panther’ boasts a lot of black talent on both sides of the camera, which is unusual enough for a big studio movie, but this is also one of the most Africa-centric films Hollywood has ever produced,” wrote TheWrap’s Alonso Duralde.”
“American viewers don t get much of a look at one of the planet s most gorgeous and populous continents so it s exciting to see the wildly popular Marvel movies take us there Read more of Black Panther s rave reviews below Also Read Black Panther Reaction Video Why...”
“Marvel s Latest Is Different Than All Previous Films Video Kenneth Turan Los Angeles Times With dialogue that deftly explores serious questions such as how much if anything do wealthy countries owe the poor and oppressed of the world Black Panther draws energy from Coogler s sense of excitement at...”


"Here, kugeller makes black identity invincible, but avoids simplification by turning vakanda into a society composed of different tribes, each with its own customs, goals and political agenda, reflecting a world of conflict very similar to ours."
"Black girl nerd, this is African futurism, as black as black hell..."
Black Panther received 49 early reviews in Rotter tomatoes, and now has a perfect score of 100% in Rotter tomatoes. Critics have commented on Coogler's contribution to African Utopia and its contribution by Chadwick Bosman Boseman as the contradictory King / superhero
"Kugler's long-term collaborators, including producer designer Hannah Beecher, editor Michael P. shoff, and Oscar nominated photographer Rachel Morrison, have also been praised for helping vacanda become a vibrant world."
"I've also read the supporting role of black leopard review in Marvel's outstanding African adventure, but the film's supporting role is the most well received one. Critics praised Michael Jordan's role as Eric kilmenger as Marvel's latest consecutive performance..."
“… The villain after the enemy who has been forgotten for many years... "
"Wakanda's women are also praised as show snatchers. Breakthrough star Letitia Wright is the exciting sister of Black Panther's technology genius Shuri."
Alonso duralde of the wrap wrote: "Black Panther has a lot of black talent on both sides of the camera, which is unusual enough for a big movie, but it's also one of the most African centered movies ever made in Hollywood."
"The American audience can't see one of the most beautiful and populous continents on earth, so it's great to see the popular Marvel cartoon film take us there to read more reviews of panthers. Here's the Panther reaction video. Why..."
"The latest version of marvel is different from all previous films. The dialogue in the film" Kenneth Turan Los Angeles Times "skillfully explores some serious issues, such as how much money rich countries owe the world's poor and oppressed people, and the Panther draws energy from kugeller's excitement..."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Days before this, a third man, Bruce Rowley, attempted to impress to the singer by allegedly robbing a bank in Connecticut before driving to her Rhode Island home and tossing the stolen cash over the fence.”
“After being released from custody, Swarbrick allegedly proceeded to send at least 13 threatening letters and emails before the end of August.”
“Federal prosecutors in Nashville said in a press release Thursday that Eric Swarbrick, of Austin, has been charged with interstate stalking and sending interstate communications with the intent to threaten.”
“He is currently in custody in Texas and will be brought to Tennessee at a later date.”
“Under lock and key Suspected stalker Eric Swarbrick 26 left has been arrested on federal charges of interstate stalking and sending interstate communications with the intent to threaten Taylor Swift pictured on August 25 in Nashville right According to prosecutors Swarbrick personally delivered letters threatening to rape and kill the...”
“Reputation songstress and himself to the Big Machine Label Group office on multiple occasions and was arrested by Nashville police on August 2”
“He was released from custody, but continued to send letters and emails.”
“'Too often, we have seen the consequences of ignoring signs of escalating violent behavior by some individuals,' said US Attorney Cochran.”
“'The attention given to this matter by our law enforcement partners and the resulting federal charges we have brought should serve to prevent a future tragic event.'”
“According to the complaint, in January 2018, Big Machine Label Group in Nashville began receiving letters from Swarbrick expressing his desire for BMLG CEO Scott Borchetta to introduce him to Swift.”


A few days before, a third man, Bruce Raleigh, tried to impress the singer by robbing a bank in Connecticut, driving to her home in Rhode Island and throwing the stolen cash on the fence
It is said that after his release, swumbrick sent at least 13 threatening letters and e-mails before the end of August
Federal prosecutors in Nashville said in a news release Thursday that Eric swumbrick of Austin was charged with interstate stalking and sending interstate communications with intent to threaten
"He is currently in Texas and will be taken to Tennessee later."
"According to the letter submitted by prosecutor svebrick, the suspected stalker Eric svebrick (left) was arrested on August 26 for suspected of interstate tracking and sending interstate communication, intending to threaten Taylor Swift (right) to take photos in Nashville on August 25, in which he threatened to rape and kill Taylor Swift..."
"The honorary female singer and herself went to the office of big machine label group many times and were arrested by Nashville police on August 2."
"He was released, but continued to write and email."
'we often see the consequences of ignoring signs of escalating violence by certain people,' said U.S. prosecutor John Cochran
"The attention of our law enforcement partners to this matter and the federal charges it raises should help prevent future tragedies."
"According to the complaint, in January 2018, the big machine label group in Nashville began to receive letters from swarbrick expressing the hope that Scott borchetta, CEO of bmlg, would introduce him to swift."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“Brandon s mother she s still siding with her son...”
“On Monday night, the 55-year-old rocker took to Instagram once again to call out his oldest child after Brandon, 22, insisted in a social media post earlier that day that they stop airing out their grievances on social media.”
“"If you want to bad mouth me, do it to my face," Brandon declared in a lengthy post.”
“"You post something for the world to see, saying I'm a bad kid and my mom is a bad mother, what do you expect?”
“Seriously, who's the fkn adult here?”
“How would you even know if I'm a bad kid, you're not even around enough to know what kind of person I am."”
“The message came after Brandon -- who allegedly assaulted Tommy back in March -- shared a video of his seemingly unconscious dad on social media, which appeared to be in response to Tommy's Instagram rant on Father's Day about the lack of respect he receives from his son.”
“The feud continued when Tommy started listing all of the money he's allegedly spent on Brandon.”
““Rehab for son: $130,000, Party for son’s 21st birthday last year: $40,000,” he wrote.”


Related libraries
"Brandon's mother, she's still on her son's side..."
"On Monday night, Brandon, 55, insisted in a social media post earlier in the day that they had stopped venting their discontent on social media, and then came back to instagram to call for his oldest child."
"If you want to speak ill of me, speak to my face," Brandon declared in a long blog post
"You send things to the world, say I'm a bad child, my mother is a bad mother, what else do you expect?"
"Seriously, who are the FKN adults here?"
"How do you know if I'm a bad boy? You don't know what kind of person I am."
"The news came after Brandon - who is said to have attacked Tommy in March - shared a video of his seemingly unconscious father on social media, which seems to be a response to Tommy's comments on instagram on father's day about his son's lack of respect."
"When Tommy started listing all the money he had spent on Brandon, the fight continued."
"The cost of my son's rehabilitation was $130000, and the cost of his 21st birthday party last year was $40000," he wrote



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Shortly after rumors spread this morning claiming that the couple split and called off their wedding, the Hunger Games actor posted a video with Cyrus on his Instagram story, proving they're still going strong.”
“The couple doesn't explicitly address the split gossip in the clip.”
“Instead, they show themselves dancing and getting silly in the car.”
“Miley films a selfie video of them grooving to the music until Liam screams and scares her.”
“"I'm gonna beat the sh—," she jokingly threatens in response to his prank.”
“He just smiles and says, "Number one!"”
“...to the camera.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Shortly after rumors this morning that the couple broke up and canceled their wedding, the hungry game actor posted a video with Cyrus on instagram proving that they were still together."
"The couple did not explicitly mention the break-up scandal in the clip."
"Instead, they show up dancing in the car and becoming stupid."
"Miley filmed a self portrait in which they slotted with the music until Liam screamed and scared her."
"I'm going to beat that asshole," she jokingly threatened in response to his prank
He just laughed and said, "number one!"
“… Look at the camera. "
This content was imported from {embedded name}



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“With reporting by Brody Brown...”
“ET.”
“Shannon Beador is ready to move on from ex-husband David Beador.”
“The Real Housewives of Orange County star, 54, spoke candidly about dipping her toes back in the dating pool during an exclusive interview with Us Weekly.”
““My good friend Tamra [Judge] pulls out the stops for her friend, you’ll see that,” Shannon recently told Us of the upcoming RHOC season.”
““The whole thing is awkward to me, especially when you get set up with someone.”
“It’s all new, so new, but it’s kind of exiting at the same time.”The Real for Real Cuisine creator added that while she “was hoping” to double date with fellow single costar Kelly Dodd, it didn’t happen.”
“Even so, the duo have a “great” friendship this season and have “come to an understanding with each other” amid their respective divorces.”
“Shannon also spoke candidly about mourning her split from David after 17 years of marriage.”
““I shed a lot of tears those seven months.”


"Brody Brown's report..."
"Wait a minute."
"Shannon BIDO is ready to leave his ex husband, David BIDO."
"The 54 year old real Orange County Star housewife confessed in an interview with us weekly that she put her toes back in the dating pool."
"My good friend Tamra (the judge) canvasses for her friends, and you'll see that," Shannon recently told us about the upcoming RhoC season
"The whole thing was embarrassing for me, especially when you were framed."
"It's all new, so new, but it's an exit at the same time." True for true food creator added that although she "wanted" to work with her single partner, kailiduode, this did not happen
"Even so, the friendship between the two is" great "this season, and they" understand each other "in the process of their divorce."
"Shannon also spoke frankly about her breakup with David after 17 years of marriage."
"I shed a lot of tears in those seven months."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To get your fill of the "Game of Thrones" romance in the meantime, look back at Harington and Rose's love story with our timeline of their relationship and the best 15 scenes the couple shared together on screen.”
“As reported by The Sun, Harington said the proposal didn't go as he'd planned.”
“He told the proposal story during a taping for an upcoming episode of "The Jonathan Ross" show.”
“Harington had a romantic proposal planned, but pulled the trigger a day early.”
“He accidentally called this "blowing his load" early, but quickly corrected himself: "What I meant to say was, I popped my question a bit early.”
“Not blew my load."”
“Kit Harington and Rose Leslie are living the fairy tale ending their "Game of Thrones" characters never got to see.”
“After dating for several years, the happy couple is now engaged to be married.”
“Unfortunately for "Game of Thrones" fans hoping to hear a romantic proposal story, Harington flubbed a key turn of phrase when he told the tale to Jonathan Ross during a taping for his upcoming October 7 episode.”
“I was going to string up some lights in some trees and do all the romantic stuff but we were in the country and we were under this beautiful night sky and had a log fire burning and red wine and I blew my load early Harington reportedly told Jonathan...”


"At the same time, to give you a full experience of the romance in game of thrones, take a look at the love story of Harrington and rose, their relationship schedule, and the 15 best scenes they share on screen."
"According to the sun, Harrington said the proposal didn't go according to his plan."
He told the story of the proposal while recording for the upcoming Jonathan Ross show
"Harrington had planned a romantic proposal, but pulled the trigger one day in advance."
He accidentally called this "bragging" ahead of time, but quickly corrected himself: "I mean, I raised my question ahead of time."
"It's not my burden."
"Kit Harrington and rose Leslie are going through a fairy tale ending a power game character they've never seen before."
"After a few years of love, the happy couple are engaged now."
Unfortunately for fans of game of Thrones who want to hear the romantic proposal story, Harrington told Jonathan Ross the story while recording the upcoming October 7 episode, but there was a key slip of the tongue
"I was going to hang some lights on the trees and do some romantic things, but we were in the countryside, under the beautiful night sky, burning firewood and drinking red wine. I blew my things off in the early morning. According to the report, Harrington told Jonathan..."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Stormi Webster, Chicago, Saint, North, Penelope are all lovely monikers, but fail to follow the family's 'K' name tradition we've come to know and love.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Fortunately, it sounds like heavily-pregnant reality star Khloé might save the day, as she recently revealed her plans for naming her and boyfriend Tristan Thompson's daughter.”
“'I think a T but a K is an option as well.”
“That's as far as I know,' she posted on Twitter.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Tommy Webster, Chicago, saint, north, Penelope are all lovely nicknames, but they don't follow the family tradition of" K "that we are gradually familiar with and love."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Fortunately, it sounds like the pregnant reality TV star heloe may have saved the day because she recently revealed the names of her daughter and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson."
"I think t, but K is also a choice."
"As far as I know," she tweeted
"This content was imported from twitter."



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And I just think you can’t lump everybody into the same group, because every relationship is different.””
“Image zoom Jordan Rodgers | Credit: Courtesy Captain Morgan“We always get lumped into being part of The Bachelor franchise, so every person is like, ‘Oh my God, I’m glad you guys are still together!’ ” he says.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s something that we continually talk about,” Rodgers, 29, tells PEOPLE.”
““But I think what’s best right now is we feel no pressure to do it.”
“Think about it: When you get together in an accelerated process, it makes sense to take your time afterwards.”
“We still have no doubts about what we want to do, and we want to get married — but we want to enjoy every moment of it.”“When you meet in nine weeks, you miss the dating and the courtship and the traveling!” he explains.”
““And with what we both do for work — she’s grinding, flipping houses, and from August to December I’m traveling a ton — we’re taking our time.”
“But we’re enjoying every moment of it.”
“I imagine at some point in the near future we re going to sit down and really talk about when and what that ll look like but we don t have a date set yet But even though they haven t nailed down any details the SEC analyst says he...”


"I just don't think you can put everyone in the same group because every relationship is different."
"Image zooming Jordan Rogers | credit: polite Captain Morgan" we're always part of the bachelor series, so everyone says, "oh my God, I'm glad you're still together! "He said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's something we talk about a lot," Rogers, 29, told people
"But I think the best thing now is that we don't have the pressure to do it."
"Think about it: when you get together in an accelerated process, it makes sense to take your time afterwards."
"We still have no doubt about what we want to do, we want to get married - but we want to enjoy every moment of it." "When you meet in nine weeks, you miss appointments, courtship and travel! "He explained
"And the work of the two of us - she's dawdling, turning over the house, I've got a lot of business trips from August to December - we're taking our time."
"But we enjoy every moment."
"I think sometime in the near future, we'll sit down and talk about what it will look like and when, but we haven't set a date yet, although they haven't set any details yet, SEC analysts said he..."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“""? "”
“...anything else I can do?”
“"Do I have a purpose?”
“"It was after all the Whip My Hair thing and I had just stopped giving voice lessons and I was kind of in that gray area of" Who am I?”
“"I really feel like I've lost my mind at some point," Willow confessed.”
“During the episode that focused on the loss, Jada Willow asked what her biggest loss to date was her life.”
“In the second episode of her mother Jada Pinkett Smith's 's Facebook Watch series Red Table Talk Willow released her hit "Whip My Hair" in 2010.”
“Willow Smith felt as if she lost her "sanity" after having had success in the music industry at the age of nine.”


“""? "”
“… What else can I do? "
"Do I have a purpose?"
"That's after all the whipping of my hair. I just stopped giving voice lessons. I'm kind of like" who am I "in the gray zone
"I really feel that I lost my mind at some point," Yang Liu admitted
"In this episode, Jada willow asks her that the biggest loss so far is her life."
In the second episode of her mother Jada Pinkett Smith's Facebook watch series "red table talk willow," she launched her hit song "whip my hair" in 2010
Willo Smith, who was successful in music at the age of nine, felt as if she had lost her "sense"



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While the model and actress went on to share “that I have my mom’s back in this — fully,” she made it clear that she’s “still very close to my dad.””
““I said how I felt and I didn’t want to apologise for it.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In July, nearly six months after the 47-year-old actor filed for divorce from his now-estranged wife Eve Mavrakis, Clara commented on a photo of Winstead, 33, shared by a fan account, writing: “Most beautiful and talented woman on earth?”
“Oh man y’all are delusional.”
“The girl is a piece of trash x Clara went on to share in the interview that there had been a lot building up to it and a lot to deal with not to make excuses or anything but yeah it wasn t my finest moment Image zoom Credit Instagram...”
“Explaining how she came to leave the comment the model and actress said that she was repeatedly being tagged in that same photograph of her father s new girlfriend...”
““I kept being tagged in this photograph and I was seeing negative things about my mom,” she shared.”
“It wasn’t the right way to go about things, but it’s a hard thing to wrap your head around when you feel you had this idea of what the family unit is and then to have that shift.”
“He didn’t want us to see that, but, you know, there were paparazzi following them around,” Clara shared, defending her father.”


As the model and actress continued to share "I have my mom back - totally," she made it clear that she was "still very close to my dad."
"I said how I felt, and I don't want to apologize for that."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In July, nearly six months after the 47 year old actor filed for divorce from his now separated wife Eve mavrakis, Clara commented on a picture of 33 year old Winstead shared on her fan account: "the most beautiful and talented woman on earth?"
"Oh, my God, you're all delusional."
"This girl is a garbage x Clara continued in the interview that there are a lot of built it up and a lot of dealt with no excuses or anything, but yes, this is not my best moment picture scaling credit instagram..."
"Explaining how she left a comment, the model and actress said she had been tagged many times on the same photo of her father's new girlfriend..."
"I've been posted on this picture all the time, and I see negative news about my mother," she said
"It's not the right way to do things, but when you feel like you have this idea of what a family unit is, and then you have this transformation, it's hard to rack your brains."
"He doesn't want us to see it, but, you know, paparazzi are following them," Clara shares, defending her father



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Take a few tips from Union, discover the top gifts, and land yourself on the nice-list among all your friends and family.”
“She served on former President Barack Obama's National Advisory Committee for Violence Against Women and has worked on Planned Parenthood's breast health initiative.”
“Throughout her career, Union has not only starred in endless films, but has also grown to be an outspoken activist for women's reproductive health and victims of sexual assault.”
“Playing the lead role of Mary Jane Paul, Union stars in the weekly BET series, Being Mary Jane.”
“Her recent partnership with Shutterfly, launching goods perfect for holiday gifting prompted us to get a few suggestions from Union on how to be the ultimate gift-giver.”
“Opinionated and empowering American actress, Gabrielle Union continues reaching new strides, adding accomplishments to her already vast list, and capturing audiences everywhere with her gleaming smile.”


"Get some advice from the union, find the most important gifts, and put yourself on a good list of all your friends and family."
"She served on former President Barack Obama's National Advisory Council on violence against women and participated in the family planning breast health initiative."
"Throughout her career, Eun has not only starred in numerous films, but also grown up to be an outspoken activist of female reproductive health and sexual abuse victims."
"Starring Mary Jane Paul, the union star in the weekly gambling series, is Mary Jane."
"She recently worked with shutterfly to launch products that are very suitable for holiday gifts, which prompted us to get some advice from the Union on how to become the ultimate giver."
"The bigoted and empowering American actress Gabriel League continues to take new steps, adding her achievements to her already huge list and attracting the audience with her brilliant smile."



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My dad has more energy than anyone I know.””
““And then we spend that evening at my parents’.”
“The adorable 5-month-old baby boy is all smiles in the photo card, which Conrad, 31, shared on Instagram Friday.”
““I’ve finally got our act together and sent out a holiday card this year!” the first-time mom wrote in the post.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“She and William are in the shot too, each on either side of their son who is dressed in a cream-colored winter sweater.”
““Joyful” the card says.”
““Love, The Tells.”Conrad may have finally gotten her holiday cards checked off her list, but there’s one holiday tradition that didn’t go as well.”
““We also managed to kill our Christmas tree in 2 weeks… so there’s that,” she joked in the caption.”
“Earlier this month, the Hills alum told PEOPLE exclusively about the very special family tradition she’ll be carrying on with her son.”


"My father is more energetic than anyone I know."
"Then we spent the night with my parents."
Conrad, 31, shared this photo card on instagram on Friday with a cute 5-month-old boy smiling
"I finally put our actions together and sent a holiday card this year! "The fledgling mother wrote in the post."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She and William are also filming, both standing on both sides of their son, who is wearing Beige winter clothes."
The card says "happy"
"Love you, tell me." Conrad may have finally removed her holiday cards from the list, but there is one holiday tradition that is less popular
"We also managed to kill our Christmas tree in two weeks That's it, "she joked in the title
"Earlier this month, alumni of hills told people about the very special family tradition she will inherit with her son."



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That was also where she publicly rebuked West’s lyric about her in her acceptance speech.”
“Photograph: YoutubeIt was at the 2016 Grammys, when 1989 beat Kendrick Lamar’s To Pimp a Butterfly for album of the year, that Swift first began to truly test the public’s patience.”
“And if the images could talk, they might say, “I know what you think of me”, or, perhaps, in the words of Joanne the Scammer: “I’m a messy bitch who lives for drama.”But still, in all those images, Swift left a lot to be decoded.”
“But it doesn’t amount to much more than a succession of disconnected images.”
“The video is good fun, if a little bit mad; it’s certainly the most brazen and ambitious pop music video since Beyoncé dropped Lemonade in the spring of last year, replete with pyrotechnics and dozens of costume changes.”
“The music video for LWYMMD, which premiered during Sunday night’s VMAs, sees Swift double down on her vengeful streak, making theatre of her scandal-laden career in an attempt to communicate a self-awareness that’s mostly eluded her.”
“But the Old Swift be damned; this new one is all about retribution and, as the title of her forthcoming album suggests, reputation.”
“So much so that hearing her new single made me nostalgic for the days of Fearless and Red.”
““Because she’s dead.”In the battle between Swifts, my allegiance is with the deceased version, a shrewd chronicler of young-adult courtship and seasoned, starry-eyed songwriter.”
“Why?”


"This is also her acceptance speech publicly accused west of her lyricism."
"Photo: YouTube it beat Kendrick Lamar at the 2016 Grammy Awards in 1989 to pimp the album of the year, which is the first time swift has really begun to test the public's patience."
"If these images could speak, they might say," I know what you think of me, "or, in the words of the liar Joanne," I'm a slovenly bitch born for drama. " However, in all these images, swift left a lot to be interpreted. "
"But it's just a series of disconnected images."
"This video is interesting, if a bit crazy; it must be Beyonce's most brazen and ambitious pop music video since she threw lemonade last spring, full of fireworks and dozens of clothing changes."
"When lwymmd's music video premiered at Vmas on Sunday night, she saw Swift's double blow of revenge, turning her scandalous career into a drama, trying to convey a sense of self that she hardly realized."
"But the old swift is damned, this new one is all retribution and, as the title of her upcoming album shows, reputation."
"Even hearing her new single reminds me of the days of fearlessness and red."
"Because she's dead." In the battle between swifts, I am loyal to the late version, a shrewd young man, courtship chronicler and experienced star eyed songwriter
"Why?"



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...response to Jackson How did he not know that your Paris Jackson Michael Jacksons daughter like do you not pay attention to the entertainment industry...”
“PARIS JACKSON POSES TOPLESS ON INSTAGRAM She snidely quipped to the man I said oh sorry I m waiting for hair and makeup should I wait elsewhere also why do you assume I m homeless One fan wrote to in...”
“"One of the first people on set, sitting in the parking lot and this dude comes up to me and says homeless people aren't allowed in this area,” she said on Twitter.”
“The 19-year-old shared the mistaken identity story on social media.”
“While filming her new untitled series for Amazon Studios film, a crew member approached the Jackson and asked her to leave.”
“Paris Jackson may be the daughter of pop icon Michael Jackson and a rising star in her own right, but to a stranger she was falsely identified as a homeless person.”


“… In response to Jackson, why doesn't he know your Paris Jackson? Michael Jackson's daughter likes you and doesn't pay attention to the entertainment industry... "
"Paris Jackson posed topless on instagram. She sneered and said to the man," Oh, I'm sorry. I'm waiting for my hair and cosmetics. Should I wait somewhere else? Why do you think I'm homeless? "A fan wrote in his letter
"One of the first people to show up on the set was sitting in the parking lot and a guy came up to me and said," homeless people are not allowed to enter this area, "she tweeted
"The 19-year-old shared the story of this false identity on social media."
"While filming a new untitled series for Amazon, a staff member approached Jackson and asked her to leave."
"Paris Jackson may be the daughter of pop idol Michael Jackson. She is a new star herself, but for a stranger, she is wrongly regarded as homeless."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: 10 Pro-Woman Porn Sites Your Clitoris Will Thank You For...”
“"That’s true," Haddish confirmed.”
“...women of color in Hollywood all good things hopefully...”
“The second?”
“The Grapefruit Method, an oral sex technique demonstrated (hilariously) by Tiffany Haddish—without question the breakout star of Girls Trip.”
“The Grapefruit Method isn't a new term or something invented by the film–it was actually first popularized back in 2014 by viral tutorial videos from Auntie Angel of Angel's Erotic Solutions.”
“(You can see that here.)”
“But in a scene-stealing moment of the film, Haddish's character, Dina, demonstrates for her friends the oral sex act while using a grapefruit and a banana as props.”
“Since then, the scene has launched many discussions about whether it's for real.”
“The directions, according to Dina, are simple: Cut off the top and bottom of a room-temperature grapefruit, then cut a hole in the middle of it.”


"Related: 10 Pro Female porn websites, your clitoris will thank you..."
"That's true," Hades confirmed
“… Women of color in Hollywood want to have good things... "
"The second one?"
"Grapefruit method, it's a kind of oral sex skill, and Tiffany haddish is undoubtedly the breakthrough star in the girl's journey."
"Grapefruit law is not a new term, nor is it the invention of movies - it was actually first popularized in 2014 by Auntie angel's viral guidance video on" the solution to angel's sex. "
"(you can see it here.)
But in a sneak shot in the film, hadish's character Dina uses a grapefruit and a banana as props to show her friends oral sex
"Since then, there has been a lot of discussion on whether it is true."
Dina said the method is simple: cut off the top and bottom of the room temperature grapefruit, and then cut a hole in the middle



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As for Turner, she promised Corden that she’ll just go ahead and get finale spoiler details “tattooed on my forehead next time.””
“Just a moral, folks!”
“Just ask Sophie Turner, the actress who’s played the tactical Sansa Stark since the beginning.”
“In early June the actress commemorated the show which is nearly done shooting its final season by getting a tattoo of a direwolf along with the message the pack survives It s clearly meant to be an ode to family and all things House Stark but of course once they...”
“...saw it fans worried that she was somehow giving away the ending of the show...”
“But why would she do that?”
“Of course, Turner didn’t spoil anything.”
“The actress stopped by James Corden’s Late Late Show to explain that she was well aware that people might misconstrue the new ink, to the point where friends warned her not to get it.”
““When I was getting it done, people advised me not to because it looked like I was giving it away.”
“But I wasn’t!” she said.”


"As for Turner, she assured Corden that she would continue to get the final spoiler detail" tattooed on my forehead next time. "
"It's just a morality, guys!"
"Ask Sophie Turner. She's been playing the tactical Sansa stark from the beginning."
"In early June, the actress tattooed a local werewolf on the show to commemorate the completion of the final season of the show. At the same time, she also conveyed a message: the wolves survived, obviously to celebrate the stark family and everything, but of course, once they..."
“… The fans who saw it worried that she somehow leaked the ending of the show... "
"But why did she do that?"
"Of course, Turner didn't destroy anything."
Speaking on James cordon's evening show, the actress said she knew that people might misunderstand the new ink so much that her friends warned her not to buy it
"When I finish the task, people advise me not to do it because it looks like I'm giving it away."
"But I am not! "She said



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hope everyone had a wonderful July 4th yo.””
“It’s just foolish to do when there’s love out there in the world to look at the negative stuff.”
“Following his interview with The Sun where the 26-year-old singer stated that he “can’t read” Twitter anymore due to the negativity, fans feared that Sheeran quit the platform completely.”
“However, he clarified with an interview on Today that it’s not the case.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““They made so much of a big deal out of this,” he explained.”
““I got asked in an interview if I read negative things and I was like, ‘Oh, I don’t even go on Twitter anymore.’ It’s not like I quit it.”
“I still post on Instagram and post on Twitter He continued I m just not going to wake up and read something and be like Well that s rude I don t want to choose to do that anymore and everyone s made a huge deal out of it Host...”
“Matt Lauer said he likely had plenty of good tweets to read thanks to his fans who were outside ready to watch him perform...”
““There’s so much positivity out there,” Sheeran replied.”


"I hope you have a wonderful July 4th Festival."
"When there is love in the world, it's stupid to look at the negative things."
"After an interview with the sun, the 26 year old singer said that because of the negative influence of twitter, he" couldn't understand "Twitter, and fans worried that Sheeran would completely withdraw from the platform."
"However, he clarified in an interview today that this is not the case."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"They made a lot of money from it," he explained
"In an interview, someone asked me if I had read anything negative, and I said," Oh, I'm not even on twitter anymore. " I didn't give it up. "
"I'm still posting on instagram and twitter, and he goes on, I just don't want to wake up and read something, and then say, it's rude, I don't want to choose to do it anymore, everyone makes a lot of money from it..."
"Matt Raul said that he may have a lot of good microblogs to read. Thank those fans who are outside to watch his performance..."
"There are so many positive things out there," Sheeran replied



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He looked like he was having a really good time with his friends.””
““He was smiling during the entire song and threw a fist pump in the air at the chorus,” says the onlooker.”
“The onlooker says when one singer belted out a rendition of Prince’s “Kiss,” Styles showed his approval.”
“Styles listened intently as well.”
“An onlooker tells Us that the “Hello” singer later stood on the couch to watch others perform karaoke.”
“As the birthday boy downed shots of Casamigos Tequila with the liquor’s cocreator Rande Gerber (his wife, Cindy Crawford, and 15-year-old daughter, Kaia Gerber, also attended), Adele sipped margaritas.”
“When he rang in his 23rd birthday at Cafe Habana in Malibu, California, Adele was among the roughly 30 guests.”
“...show is still tight with the 28 year old singer...”
“Explained Styles now 23 She said I did some pretty cool stuff when I was 21 good luck And I was like Geez Two years later Styles who will release his debut solo single Sign of the Times on the...”
“(It also netted her seven of her 15 Grammys.)”


"He seems to have a good time with his friends."
"He laughed the whole song and threw a fist at the chorus," the onlooker said
Onlookers said that when a singer sang the prince's "kiss" loudly, styles showed his approval
"Stiles listened attentively, too."
A bystander told us that the "hello" singer later stood on the sofa and watched others perform karaoke
"Adele sips Margarita as the birthday boy and co creator of wine, Rand Gerber (his wife Cindy Crawford and his 15-year-old daughter Kaya Gerber, too), drinks casami gose tequila
"When he called the Havana cafe in Malibu, California, on his 23rd birthday, Adele was one of about 30 guests."
“… The 28 year old singer's performance is still very tense... "
"23-year-old styles explained that she said I did some cool things when I was 21. Good luck. I'm like Geez of styles in two years' time. He will publish his first solo in the New York Times..."
"It also won her seven of the 15 Grammy Awards."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And, like the rest of the internet, we think she’s really pretty!”
“One thing’s for sure, she can definitely sit with us.”
“It's strange because I have naturally curly hair, but I decided to straighten it for the pictures, which caused me to look even more like her I guess."”
“"This was a first, but once one person saw it, everyone noticed it.”
“April says her tweet caught like wildfire and spread quickly.”
“It's kind of amusing actually."”
“"I'm surprised because I still don't really see the resemblance but I guess it resonated with a lot of people.”
“News, April says she doesn’t see it.”
“But in an interview with E!”
“Honestly, we see the resemblance!”


"And, like everyone else on the Internet, we think she's really beautiful!"
"One thing is for sure, she will be able to sit with us."
"It's strange because I have naturally curly hair, but in order to take pictures, I decided to straighten it, which makes me look more like her."
"This is the first time, but one person saw it and everyone noticed it."
"April said her micro blog was caught like wildfire and spread quickly."
"It's really interesting."
"I'm surprised because I still don't see the similarities, but I think it resonates with a lot of people."
"In the news, April said she didn't see it."
"But in an interview!"
"To be honest, we see similarities!"



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The chemistry between Alicia, Kelly, Adam and Blake will make for a wildly unpredictable and compelling season 14!"”
“She brings unparalleled expertise and has proven she knows how to help artists win,” Paul Telegdy, president of alternative and reality group at NBC Entertainment, said Wednesday in a statement.”
““We are thrilled to welcome back Alicia’s positive energy, competitive spirit and sheer talent.”
“Keys is fresh off her season 12 win with Chris Blue.”
“The duo replaced Gwen Stefani and Keys from season 12.”
“That means current season 13 coaches Miley Cyrus and Jennifer Hudson are out.”
“Alicia Keys will return to the NBC singing competition series and join returning favorites Adam Levine and Blake Shelton and first-time coach Kelly Clarkson for the upcoming season.”
“NBC's The Voice has firmed up its coaching staff for season 14.”
“The Grammy winner rejoins a coaching staff that will include Adam Levine, Blake Shelton and Kelly Clarkson.”


"The chemistry between Alicia, Kelly, Adam and black will make Season 14 extremely unpredictable and compelling!"
"She brings unparalleled expertise and proves that she knows how to help artists win the competition," Paul telegdy, President of NBC Entertainment's alternative and reality group, said in a statement on Wednesday
"We are very happy to welcome Alicia's positive energy, competitive spirit and talent."
"Keith just finished her season 12 win with Chris bloom."
"The pair replaced Gwen Stephanie and Keith in season 12
"It means that No. 13 coaches Miley Cyrus and Jennifer Hudson will be out this season."
"Alicia case will return to the NBC singing competition series, and in the coming season, she will play with the returning hot Adam Levin, black Sheldon and first-time coach Kelly Clarkson."
"The voice of NBC has consolidated the coaching staff for Season 14."
"Grammy winners will rejoin the coaching staff, including Adam Levin, Blake Sheldon and Kelly Clarkson."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As many parents know, when the kids are happy, everyone’s happy.”
“Phew!”
“On Thursday, Live with Kelly and Ryan cohost Kelly Ripa shared several family photos just in time for the holidays.”
“Through the series of 10 historic throwback Thursday images, fans got the message: This family is serious about holiday cheer.”
“Related story Kelly Ripa Shared an Amazing 20-Year Throwback of Mark Consuelos & Big Baby Lola“Some photos of Christmas past.”
“Little, middle, big,” Ripa captioned the post, referring to each of her three children, Michael, 20, Lola, 16, and Joaquin, who is 14.”
“Dad Mark Consuelos was also in the mix.”
“More: Kelly Ripa Is, Like, So Embarrassing on Her Anniversary With Mark ConsuelosIn the images, we see loads of smiles, dazzling Christmas decor and a range of matching holiday-themed pajamas, obviously.”
“The real question is: Does her Lola approve?”
“If you’ve followed Ripa on social media, you may know the teen is not a fan of her mom’s desire to share intimate family photos of her daughter.”


"Many parents know that their children are happy, and everyone is happy."
"Bah!"
"On Thursday, Kelly Ripa, who lives with Kelly and Ryan, shared some family photos just in time for the holiday."
"With 10 historic backtracking images on Thursday, fans got the message that the family is serious about the festive cheer."
Related story: Kylie Ripa shares mark Consuelos and baby Lola's amazing 20-year retrospective "some pictures of the past Christmas"
"Small, medium, big," Ripa said in the title of her post about her three children, Michael, 20, Lola, 16, and Huajin, 14
"Dad, Marc Consuelos is among them."
"More information: Kylie Ripa was embarrassed when she took a picture with mark Consuelos on the anniversary. We saw a lot of smiles, dazzling Christmas decorations and a series of matching Holiday Themed pajamas, obviously."
"The real question is: does her Lola agree?"
"If you've followed Ripa on social media, you probably know that the child doesn't like her mother sharing her daughter's intimate family photos."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 100 (season premiere)”
“The Flash (new episode)9 p.m.-10 p.m.”
“The Originals (season premiere)Tuesday, April 248 p.m.-9 p.m.”
“...episode 9 p m 10 p m Life Sentence series premiere Friday April 20 8 p m 9 p m Dynasty 9 p m 10 p m...”
“The Flash new episode 9 p m 10 p m Black Lightning series premiere Monday Feb 26 8 p m 9 p m DC s Legends of Tomorrow new episode 9 p m 10 p m iZombie season premiere Wednesday March 7 8 p m 9 p m Riverdale new...”
“Tuesday, Jan. 168 p.m.-9 p.m.”
“All times are ET/PT.”
“Check out the CW’s complete midseason premiere schedule below.”
“Meanwhile Dynasty is moving to Friday nights, beginning March 9.”
“The new comedy Life Sentence, starring Lucy Hale, will debut Wednesday, March 7, following a new episode of Riverdale.”


Top 100 (premiere season)
"Flash (new episode) 9:00 p.m. to 10:00 p.m."
"Original (Premiere) April 24, Tuesday 4:48 p.m. - 9:00 p.m."
“… Episode 9 9:10pm life imprisonment series premiere Friday, April 20, 8:9pm Dynasty, 9:10pm... "
"Lightning new episode 9:10pm black lightning series premiere February 26 Monday 8:9pm DC tomorrow legend new episode 9:10pm izombie season premiere Wednesday March 7 8:9pm Riverdale new..."
Tuesday, January 16, 168-9 p.m
"All the time is ET / Pt."
"Take a look at CW's full mid season premiere schedule below."
"At the same time, the Dynasty will start on March 9 and move to Friday night."
Life in prison, a new comedy starring Lucy hale, will premiere on March 7 (Wednesday) after a new episode in Riverdale



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I think it’s magic.””
““I was about to go in and record when I decided that it needed Gwen on it — because it is our song.”
““It fits my story,” he continued.”
““This was one of those songs where the more I heard it, the more I fell in love with it,” Shelton said in a statement.”
“The track, called “Nobody But You,” is a love song that hit home for Shelton, as it reflects on how a loving relationship can transform your life for the better — something both he and Stefani have openly credited their relationship with doing.”
“The talented duo released their third duet on Shelton’s album Fully Loaded: God’s Country on Dec. 13.”


"I think it's amazing."
"I was just about to go in and record it when I decided I needed Gwen on it - because it's our song."
"It fits my story," he continued
"This is one of the songs, and the more I listen to it, the more I like it," Shelton said in a statement
The song, only you, is a hit with Sheldon because it reflects how a relationship can make your life better - both he and Stephanie openly admit that their relationship did it
"The pair released their third duet on December 13 in Sheldon's album full load: the kingdom of God."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It showed that she’s not that good of an interviewer.””
““But I have no regrets about that question, nor am I in the market for a lesson from Jane Fonda on what is and is not appropriate.”
“...awkward moment the former Fox News anchor addressed the actress s controversial past while claiming she was not in the market for a lesson from Jane Fonda on what is and is not appropriate When she first complained publicly after the program and repeatedly I chose to say nothing as...”
“...my generally philosophy is what other people think of me is none of my business Kelly said on her show Monday...”
““However, Fonda was at it again last week, including here on NBC and then elsewhere, so it’s time to address the ‘poor me’ routine.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Last week, Fonda and Grace and Frankie costar Lily Tomlin joked about the awkward moment from September on Today‘s earlier hour: When Hoda Kotb asked how long they’ve known each other, Fonda estimated 50 years.”
“Tomlin had a sharper guess: “I think before your first face lift!” Fonda then joked to Tomlin, “Who are you, Megyn Kelly?”On Monday, Kelly, 47, reminded her audience that the actress had appeared on her show to promote Our Souls at Night, a movie about aging.”
““The truth is, most older women look nothing like Fonda, who is now 80,” the host said.”
““And if Fonda really wants to have an honest discussion about older women’s cultural face, then her plastic surgery is tough to ignore.”
“Fonda herself knows this and that is why to her credit she s discussed her cosmetic surgery pretty much everywhere before coming on our show Image zoom Jane Fonda and Megyn Kelly After showing a reel of Fonda openly talking about having work done in other interviews over the years...”


"It shows that she is not a very good interviewer."
"But I don't regret it, and I don't want to learn from Jane Fonda what's right and what's wrong."
“… Before the embarrassing moment, Fox News Anchor talked about the actress's controversial past, and claimed that she was not in the market for the lesson, from Jane Fonda what is and inappropriate, when she first complained publicly about the end of the show, I repeatedly chose not to say anything as... "
“…… My philosophy of life is that it's none of my business what other people think of me, Kelly said on Monday's show
"However, Fonda came back last week, including NBC and other places, so it's time to solve the routine problem of poor me." Get news, feature, etc
"Last week, Fonda, grace and Frankie's partner Lily Tomlin joked that from September to early today, it was an embarrassing moment: when Hoda Kotb asked them how long they knew each other, Fonda was estimated to be 50 years old."
Tomlin guessed more clearly: "I think before your first plastic surgery! Fonda then joked to Tomlin, "who are you, Megan Kelly? "On Monday, the 47 year old Kelly reminded viewers that the actress appeared on her show to promote our souls at night, a film about aging."
"The fact is that most older women don't look like Fonda at all. She's 80 years old now," the host said
"If Fonda really wants to have a frank discussion about the cultural face of an elderly woman, her plastic surgery is hard to ignore."
"Fonda knows that herself, so it's commendable that she's talking about her plastic surgery almost everywhere, and then on our program pictures zoom Jane Fonda and megyn Kelly, after showing a volume of Fonda's public talk about her work in other interviews over the years..."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In terms of what people respond to, it’s always interesting.”
““Nobody makes me bleed my own blood” is one that has always kinda stuck with me.”
“If you would write and direct this thing, we could put the band back together.” That was the key to it, these things don’t exist in a vacuum in terms of the writing and situation.”
“To me, it was really important when we said we could do it, the first person I called was Rawson Thurber, who wrote and directed the movie, and said, “Hey would you get on board with this thing?”
“It’s fun to connect with people on something like that — like at Halloween, I see people dressed up as the movie and things like that.”
“...there would be over the years we ve been aware of people who are fans of the movie and their connection with it which I ve appreciated...”
“I didn t know what it would be like because I was away from it for so long and I never really thought there would be any reason to do the character again but then when this opportunity came up especially talking to Omaze and what good ideas for fundraising...”
“BEN STILLER: It was really strange and fun.”
“Image zoom Credit: OmazeENTERTAINMENT WEEKLY: What did it feel like to step back into the White Goodman shoes?”
“EW talked with Stiller about filming the new video and looking back on the “true underdog story,” 13 years later.”


"It's always interesting in terms of people's reaction."
"No one makes me bleed" has been bothering me
"If you can create and direct this, we can regroup the band." This is the key. In terms of creation and situation, these things do not exist in a vacuum
"For me, it's really important when we say we can do it. The first person I called was Rosen Thurber, the screenwriter and director of the film, and he said," Hey, can you accept this? "
"It's fun to communicate with people on things like this - on Halloween, I see people dressed up in movies and things like that."
“…… Over the years, we have learned about movie fans and their connection with movies, and I appreciate that... "
"I don't know what that will look like, because I've been away from it for too long. I never thought there would be any reason to play this role again, but when this opportunity comes up, especially talking with omaze, what good fund-raising ideas are there..."
"Ben Stiller: it's really strange and interesting."
Image zooming credit: omaze Entertainment Weekly: what's it like to put on white Goodman shoes again? "
"EW and Stiller talked about making a new video and looking back on the 'true loser story' 13 years later."



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Just do it!”
“At one point, he yells: “Do it!”
“February 2014: During a press conference to promote Nymphomaniac at the Berlin Film Festival, he delivers a cryptic line: “When the seagulls follow the trawler, it is because they think sardines will be thrown into the sea.” Then he stormed out.”
“The bag reads “I am not famous anymore” in large letters across his face.”
“February 2014: LaBeouf wears a paper bag on his head as he walks the red carpet at the Cannes Film Festival for the premiere of his movie Nymphomaniac.”
“He apologized via Twitter to Clowes—but the tweets were all unattributed quotes themselves, too.”
““The idea of the ‘star’ could become a prime site for the formulation of new stances whose honesty might advance a more satisfying kind of affect,” he said.”
“In a 2016 interview with ArtNet News, he cited this moment as transformational in terms of moving him introducing him to a future in performance art.”
“This incident kicks off LaBeouf’s notable phase of borrowing quotes, lines and works from other people.”
“December 2013: LaBeouf releases a short film online that viewers discover is a plagiarized enactment of a short story that was actually written by author Daniel Clowes, who is not credited.”


"Just do it!"
Once, he yelled, "do it!"
"February 2014: at the Berlin Film Festival, he told a mysterious speech at a press conference about" sexy maniac ":" when seagulls follow trawlers, they think sardine will be thrown into the sea. " Then he stormed out
"I'm not famous anymore" was written in large letters on his face
"February 2014: Labov, wearing a paper bag on his head, walks on the red carpet of Cannes Film Festival to attend the premiere of his film" sexy madman. "
"He apologized to Clovis on twitter, but the tweets themselves were not contributing quotes."
"Stars' ideas may be the best place to develop new positions, and the honesty of those positions may have a more satisfying impact," he said
"In an interview with artnet news in 2016, he referred to this moment as a transformation to give him an insight into the future of performing arts."
"This incident opened the prelude of rabov's eye-catching stage of borrowing other people's quotations, lines and works."
"December 2013: Labov released a short film on the Internet, and the audience found that it was a plagiarized short story, which was actually written by the author Daniel Clowes, but it was not commendable."



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She's obsessed with her curly hair, and if she finds someone who has the same hair, she runs to them and is like, "You have curly hair like me?"”
“Discussing what it's like raising a mixed-race daughter, the 36-year-old added:'Kanye always has his family around and people who look like my daughter—that's important to me,' she explained.”
“She's a dairy fan'Just Cheese!”
“3.”
“Her Dad wrote her favourite songSean and Jayden found out the star thinks her Dad's song 'Amazing' is pretty great.”
“2.”
“Her nickname is 'Bubs'North told Kaia that's what her family calls her.”
“Here's what we learned"1.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”


"She's crazy about her curls. If she finds out that someone has the same hair, she'll run up to them and say," do you have my curls? "
"In discussing the feeling of raising a half blood daughter, Kanye, 36, added: 'Kanye always has family around, and people who look like my daughter are very important to me,' she explained
"She's a dairy fan, just cheese!"
“3.”
"Her father wrote her favorite song. Sean and Jaden found that the stars thought her father's song 'amazing' was quite great."
“2.”
"Her nickname is bubus," North told Kaya, and that's what her family called her
Here's what we learned about "1"
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and apparently I needed to be very prepared To hear Cuoco tell the hilarious story herself watch the video below...”
“The TSA agent proceeded to tell Cuoco that she isn t allowed to have a wine opener on the plane and the actress defended herself in a straightforward manner saying she is a big drinker and adding Here s the thing she said to the agent I just like alcohol...”
““She, like, takes it out and I’m like, oh my God, I’m going to be on a no-fly list,” she explained.”
““Like the arms one, like a Rabbit,” she told the host, “and I was like, ‘Oh my God!’ That’s a weapon.”Cuoco continued by explaining that the TSA agent proceeded to search her other bags and found a second wine opener in her makeup bag.”
“Unfortunately, Cuoco wasn’t stopped to be asked about a designer, but rather because of the wine opener in her bag.”
“I was “thinking I’m going to get a compliment on my purse,” she joked.”
“She continued by admitting on their summer vacation to Australia, it was Cuoco who was stopped and asked about her bag.”
“Cuoco began the story by revealing that her boyfriend Karl Cook always gets searched and patted down by airport security.”
“Photo by SilverHub/REX/ShutterstockWhile appearing on Jimmy Kimmel Live, The Big Bang Theory star Kaley Cuoco opened up to Jimmy Kimmel about an awkward incident she had with a TSA agent for packing two wine openers.”


“…… Obviously, I need to be fully prepared to let Kuko tell this interesting story in person and watch the following video... "
"TSA agent then told Kuko that she was not allowed to have a wine bottle opener on the plane, and the actress defended herself in a straightforward way, saying that she was a heavy drinker, adding that this was what she said to the agent, I just like alcohol..."
"She, like, took it out, and I was like, oh my God, I'm going to be on the no fly list," she explained
"It's like an arm, it's like a rabbit," she said to her master, "and I thought," my God! "That's a weapon." Kuko went on to explain that TSA agents continued to search her other bags and found a second bottle opener in her make-up bag
"Unfortunately, Kuko was not asked about the designer, but because of the bottle opener in her bag."
"I was thinking that my wallet would be praised," she joked
"She then admitted that during their summer vacation in Australia, it was Kuko who stopped them and asked about her bag."
"Kuko revealed at the beginning of the story that her boyfriend Carl cook was always searched and searched by airport security officers."
"Silverhub / Rex / shutterstock on Jimi Kimmel's live show, big bang theory star Kelly Kuko disclosed to Jimi Kimmel the embarrassing incident that happened when she and TSA agents packed two bottle openers."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““We can only do this together — moms, are you with me?” she asked.”
“...because you want to pass judgement on them it should be because you sincerely want to know how did you choose to feed your baby and what was that like she continued...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Thursday The Big Bang Theory star who shares sons Frederick 9 and Miles 12 with ex Michael Stone revealed that when she was a new mom for the first time she left a group meeting in tears because the other moms in attendance had been so competitive with each...”
“...other...”
““I instantly felt out of place,” Bialik, 42, said in a video posted on Facebook and Youtube.”
““I used cloth diapers, I didn’t use pacifiers or bottles.”
“I didn’t have fancy clothes — neither did my baby — I didn’t have a manicure.”
“I mean I barely had time to shower, how was I going to get a manicure?”The actress added that the “women at this mom’s group were encouraged to brag” about every aspect of motherhood.”
“How fast their labor was how precocious their babies were with pooping rolling over sitting up smiling everything was a competition These were not my people she said before noting that she never went to any such mom s group again Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements plus...”


"We can only do it together - Mom, are you with me?"? "She asked
“…… Because you want to judge them, it should be because you sincerely want to know how you choose to feed your children and what it is like, she continued
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Thursday, the star of the big bang theory, a half parent of former Michael Stone, revealed that when she became a new mom for the first time, she left a group meeting in tears because the other moms at the meeting were competing with each other..."
“… Other... "
"I immediately felt uncomfortable," bialik, 42, said in a video posted on Facebook and Youtube
"I use diapers, not pacifiers or bottles."
"I don't have beautiful clothes - nor do my children - I don't have manicures."
"I mean I hardly have time to take a bath. How can I get a manicure? "The women in this mom group are encouraged to brag about all aspects of their mothers," the actress added
"How fast are they giving birth, how precocious are their children, how feces roll, sit up and smile, everything is competition. These are not my people. She said before that she never went to any mother's group like this again. She wanted all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements plus..."



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tarantino’s rep did not respond to a request for comment.”
“Audio of the interview was pulled from YouTube on Tuesday due to a copyright claim by Sirius XM.”
“After being accused by Uma Thurman of coercing her to perform a dangerous driving stunt, which led to a car crash, on the set of “Kill Bill,” the filmmaker is now under fire for defending Roman Polanski in a 2003 Howard Stern interview that has resurfaced online.”
“Tarantino said Polanski’s 13-year-old victim “wanted to have it and dated the guy.” Polanski was arrested in 1977 for five offenses following the alleged assault, including rape by use of drugs, perversion, sodomy, and lewd and lascivious acts upon a child under 14.”
“He fled the country after pleading guilty to unlawful sex with a minor.”
““He didn’t rape a 13-year-old,” Tarantino said in the unearthed interview when asked by Stern why Hollywood embraces Polanski.”
““It was statutory rape.”
“That’s not quite the same thing.”
“… He had sex with a minor.”
“That’s not rape.”


"Representatives of Tarantino did not respond to requests for comment."
"Due to the copyright requirements of Sirius XM, the audio of the interview was pulled out of YouTube on Tuesday."
"After being accused by UMA Thurman of forcing her to perform dangerous driving stunts on the set of Kill Bill, which led to a car accident, the filmmaker is now under attack for defending Roman Polski in an interview with Howard Stern in 2003, which reappeared online."
Tarantino said Polanski's 13-year-old victim "wanted to own it and date the man." Polanski was arrested in 1977 for five crimes after the attack, including drug rape, sexual perversion, sodomy, and indecency and obscenity against children under 14
"He fled the country after admitting to having illegal sex with a minor."
When stern asked why Hollywood embraced Polanski, Tarantino said in an interview: "he didn't rape a 13-year-old."
"This is legal rape."
"It's not the same thing."
“… He had sex with a minor
"It wasn't rape."



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...last month s picks go here...”
“2 Available 12 6 17 Trolls Holiday Special Available 12 8 17 El Camino Christmas NETFLIX ORIGINAL The Crown Season 2 NETFLIX ORIGINAL Available 12 11 17 Catwoman The Magicians Season 2 Available 12 12 17 Disney s The Santa Clause Disney s The Santa Clause 2 Disney s The...”
“And so is Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“2.”
“USA TODAY can exclusively reveal that those titles will be available on Netflix in December, just in time for the holidays.”
“Here are a few highlights.”
“12/5 Marvel's Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“2We gave 3.5 stars to the super-powered sequel starring a tree and a racoon that came out earlier this year.”
“12/12 The Santa Clause 1-3The 1994 film about Tim Allen growing a white beard in five minutes, and then the two less-stellar movies that followed it, will get you into the Christmas spirit.”
“12/22 BrightWill Smith and Joel Edgerton in blue Orc makeup star in the Netflix original film Bright, from Suicide Squad and End of Watch director David Ayer.”


“… Last month's highlights are here... "
"2 options 12 6 17 Troll holiday specials 12 8 17 El Camino Christmas Netflix original crown Season 2 Netflix original options 12 11 17 Catwoman magician Season 2 options 12 12 17 Disney Santa Claus Disney Santa Claus Disney Santa Claus Disney Santa Claus Disney Santa Claus Disney Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus Santa Claus
So is guardian of the galaxy
“2.”
USA Today exclusively reported that the films will be released on Netflix in December, just in time for the holiday
"Here are a few highlights."
"12 / 5 Marvel's guardian of the galaxy"
"2 we awarded 3.5 stars for the sequel to a tree and a raccoon released earlier this year."
"12 / 12 Santa Claus clauses 1-3 the 1994 Tim Allen movie with a white beard in five minutes, followed by two less dazzling movies, will bring you into the spirit of Christmas."
"On December 22, brightwell Smith and Joel Edgerton played the stars of Netflix's original movie light in blue orc, from David Eyre, director of suicide squad and lookout."



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And, uh, apparently a “trickle” of that is better than nothing.”
“There, she learned all the proper royal tea protocols (lol), including how to crook her finger while holding her cup and saucer.”
“During that time, she got married Trevor Engleson, who stayed behind in California.”
“Although Markle is from Los Angeles, she moved to New York and then Toronto several years ago to film Suits.”
“Photo: BBCShe allegedly ended her first marriage by mailing her engagement and wedding rings to her ex.”
“Markle and the queen on Commonwealth Day.”
“Phew.”
“Eventually, her first solo tea meeting with the queen and her corgis went well.”
“According to Us Weekly, Morton’s book states that Markle visited Rose Tree Cottage in Pasadena, California, for afternoon tea in the fall of 2017.”
“But … let’s not feel too bad for the guy, since he’s now producing a TV sitcom about a man whose ex marries a British royal — which is tacky of him, to say the least.”


"And, er, obviously, a little is better than nothing."
There, she learned all the royal tea etiquette, including how to bend her fingers while holding cups and saucers
In the meantime, she married Trevor engelson, who stayed in California
Although Marcel is from Los Angeles, she moved to New York and Toronto to shoot suits a few years ago
"Photo: bbcshe is said to have ended her first marriage by sending her engagement letter and wedding ring to her ex girlfriend."
"On Commonwealth Day, mark and the queen."
"Bah."
"In the end, her first solo tea party with the queen and her kogis went well."
"According to us weekly, Morton's book says that in the fall of 2017, markel went to the rose tree cottage in Pasadena, California, for afternoon tea."
"But Let's not feel too sorry for this guy, because he's making a TV sitcom about a man's ex-wife marrying a member of the British royal family - at least that's his vulgarity. "



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...most and didn t lead to anything else and was the fault of stupid groupies trying to trap him and everybody just needs to move on...”
“She is in a bubble of love and peace and happiness right now and everything that happened with Tristan is less about cheating and more like it was just a random drunken hookup that meant nothing and was kissing at...”
““She’s basically already forgiven him,” a source said.”
“...mending fences with her child s father...”
“Though it was reported that Kardashian was devastated upon hearing the news that Thompson may have been unfaithful she has since been consumed by happiness upon the birth of her daughter and People reports she is in the process of...”
“We ain't involved in this."”
“"I was enjoying my night with my mama and aunt.”
“Didn't see her," Union wrote.”
“"Don't know her.”
“But the actress wasted no time immediately shutting down the idea that she had anything to do with any of it.”


“… Most people, without leading to any other mistakes, are stupid groups trying to trap him, everyone just needs to move on... "
"She is in a bubble full of love, peace and happiness. What happened to Tristan is nothing more than cheating. It's just a random drunkenness. It's meaningless. It's just kissing..."
"She has basically forgiven him," one source said
“… Working with her child's father on the fence... "
"Although it is reported that Kardashian is very sad after hearing that Thompson may be unfaithful, she has been swallowed up by happiness since her daughter was born. People report that she is..."
"We are not involved in this."
"I had a good time with my mother and aunt."
"I didn't see her," the union wrote
"I don't know her."
"But the actress immediately dismissed the idea that she had something to do with it."



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s not an easy thing.””
“It was “written about the two of us, but it’s like, not about the two of us,” Lopez explained.”
“Alex Rodriguez but she s being careful not to repeat past mistakes The pop star said in a recent interview with Good Morning America that despite the lyrical content of her latest song El Anillo which is Spanish for The Ring she and her beau are just enjoying their relationship...”
“...and in no rush to walk down the aisle...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We have to take our time,” she explained.”
““I’ve made plenty of mistakes in my past.”
“We’re mature now.”
“We’re grown-ups, and we’re going to take our time and we’re going to do things at our own pace.”The 48-year-old continued, “Our life right now is incredibly wonderful.”
“Between our kids and our work, we’re truly blessed.”


"It's not easy."
"It's about the two of us, but it doesn't seem to be about the two of us," Lopez explained
"Alex Rodriguez, but she is very careful not to repeat the same mistakes. The pop star recently told Good Morning America that although the lyrics of her latest song El anillo are in Spanish, she and her boyfriend are just enjoying their relationship..."
“… Don't rush down the aisle... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We have to take our time," she explained
"I've made a lot of mistakes in the past."
"We are mature now."
"We are all adults. We will take our time and do things at our own pace." The 48 year old continued, "we have a wonderful life now."
"Between our kids and our jobs, we're really lucky."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Daniel Farrands wrote and directed the movie, which also features Patty Hearst's daughter Lydia and Mean Girls actor Jonathan Bennett.”
“'Guess what guys!”
“During a coffee run in Los Angeles on Friday afternoon she was seen planting a passionate kiss on the musician while she held onto his face.”
“Later the pregnant star couldn't stop smiling as she seemed giddy with joy.”
“Getting cozy: Hilary Duff appears to be very smitten with her baby daddy Matthew Koma.”
“During a coffee run in Los Angeles on Friday afternoon she was seen planting a passionate kiss on the musician while she held onto his faceOn a day where the temperatures topped 100 degrees in Los Angeles, the singer/actress looked undeterred by the heat.”
“The 30-year old, who is pregnant with her first daughter, was spotted getting cozy with Koma outside a restaurant in the Studio City section of LA.”
“And her baby bump was in full view.”
“PDA!”
“The happy couple couldn t keep their hands off of each during their time out together Reasons to smile The blonde actress smiled a smile that said she was every inch in love Deja vu The So Yesterday singer was also seen kissing Koma in this Instagram photo shared on...”


Daniel Franz created and directed the film, and Patty Hurst's daughter Lydia and the mean girl actor Jonathan Bennett are also the protagonists of the film
"Guess what, guys!"
"Last Friday afternoon, on a coffee trip in Los Angeles, she was seen holding the musician's face and kissing him warmly."
"Then the pregnant star couldn't help laughing because she seemed dizzy with joy."
"More and more comfortable: Hillary Duff seems to have a crush on her baby dad, Matthew coma."
On a coffee trip in Los Angeles on Friday afternoon, she was seen holding the musician's face and kissing him warmly. On a day in Los Angeles when the temperature was 100 degrees Celsius, the singer / actress didn't look frightened by the heat
The 30-year-old, pregnant with her first daughter, was found with coma outside a restaurant in Los Angeles studio city
"Her little lump is in full view."
"PDA!"
"The reason why the happy couple can't stay together without touching each other's hands and smiling is that the blonde actress said with a smile that she loved each other very much, so in this picture shared by instagram yesterday, she saw the singer kissing KOMA as well..."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I was 18 and he was 78.'”
“'He'd ask if you wanted to go upstairs, and that was that.”
“But it's hard to tell the blonde bombshell has any regard for the publishing mogul by the way she talks about their former romance.”
“When appearing on Kocktails With Khloe on Wednesday evening, the 30-year-old described how she went out of her way to step out on the publishing mogul, who will turn 90-years-old next month.”
“Ouch Kendra Wilkinson told Khloe Kardashian during an episode of Kocktails With Khloe that she used to cheat on Hugh Hefner by checking into hotels down the street here they are seen in 2006 Her old home The blonde now 30 moved into the Playboy mansion in Holmby Hills California...”
“...when she was just 18 years old Dreamy The E”
“...star has said she moved into the mansion because it was nice, unlike the 'ugly' apartment she was living in'I would go to hotels down the street,' said the mother of two, who is now married to former athlete Hank Baskett.”
“Pauly Shore was the guest who grilled the cover girl about her past (he had also asked Khloe about why she, Kim and Kris Jenner dated black men).”
“Wilkinson claimed she was not expected to be monogamous with the senior citizen, who she moved in with when she was just 18-years-old and he was 78-years-old.”
“But she was expected to be quiet about it.”


"I'm 18, he's 78."
"He'll ask if you want to go upstairs, that's it."
"But from the way the blonde talked about their previous relationship, it's hard to see what she likes about the publishing tycoon."
"On Wednesday night, the 30-year-old appeared on" kocktails "with Khloe, describing how she spared no effort to defeat the publishing tycoon, who will turn 90 next month."
"Ouch, Kendra Wilkinson tells Khloe Kardashian that in an episode of kocktails and Khloe, she once cheated Hugh Hefner to check the hotel on the street, and they saw her old house in 2006. The blonde is now 30 years old and moves into the Playboy mansion in Holmby hill, California..."
“… When she was 18 years old, the dream of "e"
"The star said that she moved into the Mansion because it was very nice, unlike the ugly apartment she lived in," I'll go to the hotel on the street, "said the mother of two, who is now married to ex athlete Hank Basquet
"Pauly shore is a guest of the cover girl's past (he also asked Khloe why she, Kim and Kris Jenner date black people)," he said
Wilkinson claimed that she did not want to be monogamous with the old man. She moved in with him when she was 18 and he was 78
"But she should be silent about it."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...https://t.co/cxFsi4eVhX – James Woods (@RealJamesWoods) October 9, 2017”
“Also Read: James Woods Defends Dolly Parton Over Anti-Trump Emmys JokeWhile Woods was busy setting the record straight on his future, the actor bluntly asserted that he has no interested in running for politics in California.”
““Once Upon a Time in America” actor and noted conservative James Woods took to Twitter on Sunday to shoot down reports that he was retiring from acting, reports that originated with Woods’ real-estate agent.”
“Woods also has some bad news for his fans: He also has no intention of running for political office in California, no matter how much they might want him to.”
“Also Read: Did James Woods Announce Retirement From Acting...”
“Through His Real Estate Agent?”
“Taking a page from Mark Twain, Woods told his Twitter followers on Sunday that “The reports of my retirement are greatly exaggerated …”Reports of Woods’ retirement began circulating after news broke that the actor is selling one of his four Rhode Island homes for $1.39 million.”
“As part of the listing Woods agent Allen Gammons said in a news release that Woods is retiring from acting and is looking to simplify his life by selling his many real estate holdings on both coasts It seems like Gammons might have complicated Woods life instead as Woods was...”
“...prompted to set the record straight on social media...”
“Perhaps bolstered by the false reports of Woods’ retirement, fans of the actor began calling foe the actor to run for Congress.”


“... https://t.co/cxFsi4eVhX - James Woods (@ realjames woods) October 9, 2017 "
"Read another: James Woods defends Dolly Parton against trump Emmy jokes. While woods is busy clarifying his future, the actor bluntly claims that he has no interest in running for California politics."
James Woods, a once in America actor and well-known conservative, on twitter on Sunday refuted reports that he would quit the show business, which came from woods' real estate agent
"Woods has some bad news for his fans: he has no intention of running for political office in California, no matter how much they want him to run."
"Also read: James Woods announced his exit from the show business..."
"Through his real estate agent?"
"On Sunday, woods took a page from Mark Twain and told his twitter fans," the story about my retirement has been greatly exaggerated... " Reports of woods' retirement began to circulate after news that the actor would sell one of his four homes in Rhode Island for $1.39 million
"As part of the listing, Allen Gammons, Woods' agent, said in a press release that woods would withdraw from the performing arts industry and hope to simplify his life by selling many of his real estate assets in the two coastal areas. It seems that Gammons may make Woods' life more complicated, rather than like woods..."
“… Tips to clarify facts on social media... "
"Perhaps because of the false reports about Woods' retirement, fans of woods began to appeal against him running for Congress."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe the next continent the pair hits will be Asia?”
“Given her jet-setting lifestyle, this isn't the first time they've taken their romance overseas: Earlier this year, they were spotted aboard a yacht in Cannes, People reports.”
“Kardashian and her 23-year-old beau Bendjima, a former boxer-turned-model who has worked with Calvin Klein and Ralph Lauren, have allegedly been dating since December.”
“The star is no stranger to the luxury vacation lifestyle,, but she also spends a significant amount of time in the Calabasas home she's meticulously curated for herself.”
“The brood has hit destinations like Nantucket, the South of France, and most recently, Florida.”
“The 38-year-old mom of three has been sharing her and her family's travels via social media all summer long.”
“For her part, Kardashian took to Snapchat to share a video at the foursome's attempt at smoking a traditional hookah, as well as to show off some of her favorite meals from the trip thus far, including a colorful fruit plate and a delicious-looking bowl of pasta.”
“"RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARC," he captioned the stunning shot.”
“In one postcard-worthy photo shared to Huck's Instagram account, Kardashian and her group are seen riding camels through the desert.”
“The group has been spending their vacation doing all of the typical tourist activities—like riding camels, seeing the pyramids, and posing in front of the Great Sphinx—as well as living it up at Hacienda Bay and on the northern coast beaches.”


"Maybe Asia will be the next continent for two men to attack?"
It's not the first time they've brought romance overseas, given her jet lifestyle, according to people: they were found on a yacht in Cannes earlier this year
"Kardashian and her 23-year-old boyfriend, beau bendjima, are said to have been dating since December last year. Benjima was a boxer born model who worked with Calvin Klein and Ralph Lauren
"The star is no stranger to the luxurious holiday lifestyle, but she also spent a lot of time at her home in Calabasas, planning for herself."
"This nest has reached Nantucket in southern France and recently Florida."
"The 38 year old mother of three spent the summer sharing her travels with her family through social media."
"Kardashian shared a video of four people trying to smoke a traditional hookah on snapchat, and showed some of her favorite meals on the trip so far, including a colorful fruit plate and a bowl of delicious looking spaghetti."
"The predator of the lost arc," he added the title to this amazing shot
In a postcard photo shared on Huck's instagram account, Kardashian and her team ride a camel across the desert
"The group's holiday activities include camel riding, pyramid tours, posing in front of the Sphinx, and enjoying on manor Bay and the beaches on the north coast."



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be a damn professional.””
“I miss ‘I had a vision of love’ Mariah.”
“As improbable as it seems, “The House” actor Cedric Yarbrough says that it really happened.”
“Yarbrough took to Facebook on Wednesday to detail how the singer “ruined” an intended cameo featuring her in the film.”
““Yeah, a real funny cameo was SUPPOSED to happen in the new film #TheHouse with the superstar Mariah Carey.”
“But it was ruined by superstar Mariah Carey,” Yarbrough wrote.”
““The film takes place in a suburban home but is made into a ‘Casino’.”
“Why not have Mariah be an act in the casino?”
“Funny idea Also Read Mariah Carey Blames Everybody for New Year s Eve Chaotic Mess Yarbrough went on to say that Carey eventually graced the set with her presence after waiting for her for 3 4 hours And when the porpoise ranged songstress arrived Yarbrough recalled she scuttled a stunt...”
“...that had been cooked up in her absence...”


"Be a professional."
"I miss Maria," I have an illusion of love. "
"Although it seems unlikely," said house actor Cedric yabro, "it really happened."
On Facebook Wednesday, Yarbrough detailed how the singer "ruined" her Cameo image in the film
"Yes, a really interesting guest star should take place in the new film house and super star Maria Kelly."
"But it was ruined by superstar Maria Carey," arbro wrote
"The film took place in a suburban home, but it was made into a" casino. "
"Why not let Maria perform in the casino?"
"Interesting idea also read that Mariah Carey blamed everyone for the chaos of new year's Eve. Arbro went on to say that Carey finally beautified her existence after waiting for her for 3-4 hours. When the dolphin range female singer arrived, arbro recalled that she failed the stunt..."
“… Fabricated in her absence... "



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A source previously told Us that Teefey “has trust issues” over Gomez’s newly rekindled romance with Justin Bieber, and Bieber is hoping to that Gomez’s family “gives him another chance.””
“Thank you.”Since unfollowing multiple accounts, Gomez made a snapshot of her mom, Mandy Teefey, her profile picture.”
“I love you Grand Prairie.”
“Even when I don’t know how to do it well or actually want it.”
““In many ways it very well could have been better than my life today, but I’m grateful for a voice that can enable change today.”
““The home I grew up in, from birth to 12.. (no one was home when I knocked this time lol) I visit this place every chance I get,” she wrote alongside a photo of herself sitting on the front porch steps.”
“The “Fetish” singer, who reactivated the account shortly after, shared a heartfelt photo via the account on Sunday, January 7, showing her outside her childhood home in Texas.”
“Gomez expressed her disproval of a cover story for Billboard magazine’s 2017 Woman of the Year issue that included details about her home.”
“Wtf is happening — Hifza ❤ (@HappylenasLarry) January 7, 2018As previously reported, the producer made her Instagram account private in December, following controversy over of a recent Billboard interview about a teddy bear in Gomez’s home.”
“She unfollowed demi, camila & all her friends & 13 reasons why cast & wizards of waverly place cast & so many peoples.”


"A source told us earlier that Tiffany had" a trust problem "with Gomez's renewed relationship with Justin Bieber, and Bieber hoped Gomez's family would" give him another chance. "
"Thank you." Since opening multiple accounts, Gomez has taken a snapshot of her mother, Mandy teefey, along with her profile photo
"I love you prairie."
"Even when I don't know how to do it well or really want to."
"In many ways, it could have been better than my life today, but I'm grateful for a voice today that can make a difference."
"I grew up at home, from birth to 12 years old.".. (no one was at home when I knocked on the door this time, haha) I'll go to this place whenever I get a chance, "she wrote next to a picture of herself sitting on the front porch steps
The "fetishist" singer later reactivated the account and shared a heartfelt photo of her childhood home in Texas on Sunday, January 7
"Gomez expressed her rebuttal to Billboard magazine's cover story for women of the year 2017, which includes details of her family."
"WTF is happening - hifza ❤  (@ happynaslarry) January 7, 2018 as previously reported, the producer privatized her instagram account in December last year after giving an interview on a billboard about the teddy bear in Gomez's house
"She abandoned Demi, Camilla and all her friends and explained why the 13 actors and wizards in Waverly Place and so many people were there."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...for more trending news...”
“This was a required training flight that happened to take place on Valentines Day so we altered the flight path slightly to make a heart shape Virgin Atlantic said in tweets The airline later shared an animation of the flight drawing the heart 30 000 feet in the sky Click...”
“Responding to people's concerns, the airline clarified that the flight was for training purposes.”
“...flight s route However some people Twitter were not impressed with Virgin Atlantic s Valentine s Day gimmick and called out the airline for wasting aviation fuel and causing possible delays...”
“The Airbus A330 plane took off from London at 11 30am and spent about two hours creating a Valentine appropriate heart shaped flight path measuring about 100 miles in length The unique flight path was spotted by air traffic monitoring portal Flight radar 24 which shared a screenshot of the...”
“...s Day...”
“But to celebrate the year s most romantic day a Virgin Atlantic flight went not one but 100 extra miles A Virgin Atlantic flight took off from London s Gatwick Airport and flew to UK s southwest coast to draw a heart shaped flight course on the occasion of Valentine...”
“...for each other often involving expensive gifts trips or well planned surprises...”
“The flight took off from London s Gatwick Airport and took two hours to complete the path VirginAtlantic is drawing a giant heart in the sky to celebrate ValentinesDay2018 Follow live at Flightradar24 flightradar24 February 14 2018 Lovers on Valentine s Day go the extra mile to express their affection...”


“… More popular news... "
"It was a necessary training flight, which happened to happen on Valentine's day, so we changed the flight route a little bit and made it into a heart shape," virgin tweeted. Virgin Airlines later shared a flight animation on twitter, drawing the heart at 30000 feet... "
"In response to people's concerns, the airline clarified that the flight was for training purposes."
“… But some people on twitter are not impressed by Virgin Atlantic's Valentine's Day gimmick, and shout that the airline is wasting aviation fuel, causing possible delays... "
"The Airbus A330 took off from London at 11:30 a.m. and it took about two hours to create a heart-shaped flight path about 100 miles long. Flight radar 24, the air traffic monitoring portal, has found this unique flight route, and the website has shared a picture of... "
“… Valentine's Day... "
"But to celebrate the most romantic day of the year, a Virgin Atlantic flight flew another 100 miles from London's Gatwick airport to the southwest coast of England, drawing a heart-shaped route on Valentine's Day..."
“… For each other, it usually includes expensive gifts, trips or well planned surprises... "
"The flight took off from London's Gatwick Airport and completed the journey in two hours. Virginia Atlantic is drawing a huge heart in the sky to celebrate Valentine's day. Valentine's Day lovers walk one more mile to express their love on flighttradar24 live on February 14, 2018..."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whether or not he ever goes back to such a short length again willingly remains to be seen, though if Styles intends to keep acting, he'll need to get used to making certain changes with his appearance for roles.”
“Fortunately for Styles, he enjoyed the breezy feeling afterwards, so it wasn't all bad.”
“Still, a hairdo like that wouldn't go over well if he truly was enlisted during World War II, so it had to go!”
“When you've had long hair for as long as Styles did, surely that feeling of nakedness sounds about right.”
“While promoting his new sing "The Sign of the Times" on Elvis Duran and the Morning Show, Harry Styles talked a little bit about Dunkirk, including what cutting off his hair for the movie felt like.”


"It remains to be seen whether he is willing to go back to such a short length, but if styles intends to continue acting, he needs to get used to making some changes to his appearance in the role."
"Fortunately, he enjoyed the breeze, so it wasn't all bad."
"Even so, if he did enlist during World War II, that haircut would not be very popular, so he had to change it!"
"When you have long hair as long as your hair, that feeling of being naked must sound right."
"While promoting his new song" the symbol of the times "on Elvis Duran and the morning show, Harry stiles talked about Dunkirk, including the feeling of cutting off hair for the film."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The young prince is now fifth in line to the throne—behind his grandfather Prince Charles, his father Prince William, and siblings Prince George and Princess Charlotte.”
“April 23, 2018: Welcoming Another PrinceGetty ImagesThe couple gave birth to another boy, Prince Louis, on April 23, 2018, just a month before Prince William's brother, Prince Harry, was set to tie the knot to Meghan Markle.”
“Oh, to be young and in love!”
“The Middleton family later shared this adorable throwback from graduation day!”
“June 2005: A Graduation CelebrationHandoutIn 2005, the young couple graduated from St. Andrews and celebrated their accomplishments together.”
“October 2002: And Then They Were RoommatesFor their second year at university, the couple moved out of their dorm rooms and into a flat together along with two other friends.”
“The rest, as you already know, is history!”
“The story goes, Kate was modeling a revealing sheer dress for a charity fashion show and Prince William reportedly paid 200 euros for a front-row seat.”
“April 2001: The Dress That Started It AllWhile the duo met at the start of school, it wasn't until a fateful spring semester fashion show that Kate really caught the attention of the young prince.”
“Kate was studying art history while Prince William was working towards a degree in geography.”


The young prince is now the fifth in line to the throne, after his grandfather Prince Charles, father Prince William, brother and sister Prince George and Princess Charlotte
"April 23, 2018: picture of another Prince: the couple gave birth to another boy, Prince Louis, on April 23, 2018, just a month before William's brother, Prince Harry, married Megan markel."
"Oh, young, in love!"
"The Middletons later shared a lovely memoir of this graduation ceremony!"
June 2005: graduation ceremony in September 2005, the young couple graduated from St Andrews University and celebrated their achievements together
October 2002: they were roommates when they were sophomores in college. The couple moved out of the dormitory and moved into an apartment with two other friends
"The rest, you already know, has become history!"
Kate is said to be modelling a revealing transparent dress at a charity fashion show, and Prince William is reported to have paid 200 euros for a front row seat
April 2001: when they met at the beginning of school, Kate really caught the attention of the young prince
"Kate is studying art history, while Prince William is studying for a degree in geography."



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Though I’m trying to do better, I know I have a long way to go,” Weinstein said, adding that he was working with therapists and planned to take time off to “deal with this issue head-on.””
““I appreciate the way I’ve behaved with colleagues in the past has caused a lot of pain, and I sincerely apologize for it.”
“...with news features and more...”
““You look at everything all over the world today and how women are dressing and what they are asking by just presenting themselves the way they do.”
“What are they asking for?”
“Trouble,” Karan said at the CinéFashion Film Awards in Los Angeles on Sunday.”
“Late Monday, the designer said in a statement to PEOPLE that her comments had been taken out of context and she was “truly sorry to anyone” she offended.”
“Initially during the red carpet interview with the Daily Mail, the designer talked about injustice women faced around the world before defending her movie mogul friend.”
“Image zoom Credit: Matt Baron/REX/Shutterstock; Venturelli/WireImage“I think we have to look at ourselves.”
“Obviously, the treatment of women all over the world is something that has always had to be identified,” she told the reporter.”


"While I'm trying to be better, I know I have a long way to go," Weinstein said He added that he was working with the therapist to plan to take leave "to deal with the problem head-on."
"I appreciate the way I get along with my colleagues in the past, which has brought me a lot of pain, and I sincerely apologize for that."
“… There are news features and more... "
"You look at everything in the world today, how women dress, and what they ask for just by showing off."
"What do they want?"
"Trouble," Kalan said Sunday at the Cheney Fashion Film Awards in Los Angeles
"Late Monday, the designer told people in a statement that her comments were taken out of context and that she was" deeply sorry "for anyone she offended
"Initially in a red carpet interview with the daily mail, the designer talked about the unfair treatment faced by women around the world before defending their film tycoon friends."
"Image scaling credit: Matt Baron / Rex / shutterstock; venturi / WireImage." I think we have to look at ourselves
"It's clear that the treatment of women around the world has always had to be determined," she told reporters



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...rock album The War On Drugs A Deeper Understanding Best R B album Bruno Mars 24K Magic Best rap album Kendrick Lamar Damn...”
“Newcomer Alessia Cara won best new artist, considered the least important category of the main five.”
“His album 24K Magic picked up record of the year for the title track, song of the year for That's What I Like and best R&B album.”
“But Mars' victory was rap's defeat.”
“Jay-Z was the leading nominee with eight nods but left empty handed, one year after his wife Beyonce missed out on album of the year to Adele.”
“Kendrick Lamar, widely expected to pick up the evening's main prize for his fourth album DAMN, was limited to rap-only categories.”
“AdvertisementHe picked up five awards, including best rap album and best rap performance.”
“Hillary Clinton s Fire And Fury skit at Grammys Image Jay Z with his wife Beyonce and daughter Blue Ivy at the Grammys The evening was not just a disappointment for those who hoped to see rap break out from genre specific categories but it was also noticeably short on...”
“...female winners...”
“In a politically charged ceremony where the Time's Up movement and the #MeToo campaign were celebrated, and where invitees wore white roses to support victims of sexual harassment, only one female artist picked up a major award.”


“… Rock albums better understanding of the war on drugs best RB album Bruno Mars 24K magic best rap album Kendrick Lamar damned... "
"Newcomer Alicia Carra won the Best Newcomer Award and was considered the least important of the five categories."
"His album 24K magic won the album of the year, the song of the year," that's what I like, "and the best R & B album."
"But Mars' victory was rap's defeat."
"Jay-Z became the main nominees with eight nods, but returned empty handed. A year ago, his wife Beyonce missed Adele's album of the year."
Kendrick Lamar is widely expected to win the night's major award for his fourth album, damned, which is limited to rap
He won five awards, including best rap album and best rap performance
"Hilary Clinton's passionate and angry sketches at the Grammy Awards with his wife Beyonce and daughter blue Ivy not only disappoint those who want to see rap stand out from a particular genre, but also show a clear lack of..."
“… Women's winners... "
"In a political ceremony to celebrate the" progress of the times "movement and the" Mayo movement ", the invitees wore white roses to support the victims of sexual harassment, and only one female artist won the prize."



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A judge must still sign off on the plea deal.”
“The terms of De Lesseps plea deal, including the one-year probation, will be transferred to New York where she lives, according to court documents.”
“Her charges have been reduced with the plea deal.”
“De Lesseps was arrested on felony charges of battery on an officer, resisting arrest without violence and two counts of crimes against a person as well as a misdemeanor charge of disorderly intoxication.”
“"I’m going to (expletive) kill you," de Lesseps said, according to the affidavit.”
“After being handcuffed and put in a police car, de Lesseps removed her handcuffs and later threatened officers, police said.”
“De Lesseps locked herself in the bathroom, according to a sworn affidavit, and when officers tried to open the bathroom door, de Lesseps shoved one of them in the chest and slammed the door on another officer, hitting the officer in the face.”
“There, police said de Lesseps and a man were found drunk in a hotel room and refused to leave.”
“The plea agreement was signed by de Lesseps on July 3, according to court documents, about seven months after the Bravo TV star was arrested at The Colony in Palm Beach, an 89-room hotel a block from the beach.”
“The 53-year-old must perform 50 hours of community service, is barred from drinking alcohol, must attend two Alcoholics Anonymous meetings per week, attend a victim impact class with Mothers Against Drunk Drivers and write a letter of apology to a Palm Beach Police officer, according to court documents.”


"The judge still has to sign the plea agreement."
"According to court documents, the terms of dreisep's plea agreement, including a one-year probation, will be transferred to New York, where she lives."
"The plea agreement reduced the charges against her."
Dreiseps was arrested on charges of beating a police officer, resisting arrest without violence, two felony charges of crimes against others and a misdemeanor charge of disorderly drunkenness
"I'm going to kill you," dreiseps said, according to the affidavit
"After she was handcuffed to the police car, she took off her handcuffs and later threatened the police," police said
"According to an affidavit, de Lesseps locked himself in the bathroom. When the police tried to open the bathroom door, de Lesseps pushed open one of the policemen's chest, slammed the door on the other policeman and hit him in the face."
"There, police said dreiseps and a man were found drunk in a hotel room and refused to leave."
Dreiseps signed a plea agreement on July 3 when the Bravo TV star was arrested in the colony of Palm Beach, an 89 room hotel just a block from the beach, according to court documents
"Court documents show that the 53 year old has to perform 50 hours of community service, ban alcohol, attend Anonymous meetings for alcoholics twice a week, attend victim impact courses for drunk drivers with his mother, and write an apology letter to Palm Beach police."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was not clear whether he would represent Lochte in this case.”
“Jeff Ostrow, a lawyer who has represented Lochte in the past, did not immediately respond to an email and a voicemail message seeking comment.”
“Steve Lochte, the swimmer's father, said by telephone that he had no comment and directed questions to his son or his son's lawyers.”
“Lochte does not have to appear in person to defend himself, de Almeida Maia said.”
“Prosecutor Rodrigo de Almeida Maia said Thursday that the next step is for Lochte's lawyers to present their defense.”
“Last year, a court dismissed the case against Lochte, but the Superior Court of Justice reversed that decision Tuesday.”
“Lochte ended up serving a 10-month suspension from the U.S. national swim team for his behavior.”
“The scandal drew international headlines and grew to overshadow the final days of the Games.”
“As Lochte's version of events began to shift, many Brazilians became annoyed that a false story about crime drew so much attention, when the city had hosted the Games without major problems.”
“Martin Bureau/AFP/Getty ImagesThe initial claim appeared to confirm widespread fears before the Olympics that the event would be marred by rising crime rates in Rio de Janeiro, which has long struggled with violence.”


"It's not clear if he will represent Rochette in this case."
"Jeff Ostrow, a lawyer who has represented Lochte in the past, did not immediately respond to emails and voicemails seeking comment."
Steve rochett, the swimmer's father, said on the phone that he had no comment and asked his son or his son's lawyer directly
"Roht doesn't have to appear in court to defend himself," said de Almeida Maia
"Prosecutor rodrigod Almeida said Thursday that the next step is for Lochte's lawyers to present their defense."
"Last year, a court rejected the charges against Rochet, but the high court reversed that decision on Tuesday."
"Lochte was eventually suspended for 10 months by the U.S. National Swimming Team for his actions."
"The scandal has attracted the attention of the international media and gradually cast a shadow over the last few days of the Olympic Games."
"As Lochte's view of the incident began to change, many Brazilians were annoyed that a false report of crime caused so much attention because there were no major problems when Brazilians held the Olympic Games."
"The initial statement of Martin Bureau / AFP / Getty Images seems to confirm the widespread concern before the Olympic Games that the rising crime rate in Rio de Janeiro, which has been fighting violence for a long time, will damage the event."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Disclosing that he has spoken to a professional about his mental health, he describes how he only began to address his grief when he was 28 after feeling “on the verge of punching someone” and facing anxiety during royal engagements.”
“The Prince says in an interview with The Telegraph that he “shut down all his emotions” for almost two decades after losing his mother, Diana, Princess of Wales, despite his brother, Prince William, trying to persuade him to seek help.”
“Prince Harry has disclosed that he sought counselling after enduring two years of “total chaos” while still struggling in his late twenties to come to terms with the death of his mother.”


He revealed that he had talked with a professional about his mental health, describing that when he was 28 years old, he began to solve his grief after feeling "about to kick" and facing anxiety during the royal wedding
In an interview with the daily telegraph, the prince said that in nearly 20 years after the loss of his mother Diana and Princess of Wales, although his brother Prince William tried to persuade him to seek help, he "shut down all emotions."
Prince Harry revealed that after two years of "total chaos", he was still trying to accept his mother's death and seek psychological counseling in his twenties



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Her next films is 2018's Avengers: Infinity War.”
“He is the co-president of the Gersh Agency.”
“But they only made heir first official appearance as a couple on Friday evening.”
“The stars looked in love as they were arm-in-arm at the 2017 Gersh Emmy Party in Los Angeles.”
“Official: Elizabeth Olsen and Robbie Arnett have been dating for months, but only made their first public appearance in LA on FridayElizabeth, 28, is an actress whose sisters are the twins Mary Kate and Ashley from the TV series Full House.”
“They are now fashion designers.”
“Robbie, 25, is the vocalist for the band Milo Greene, a band he started with friends while in college in 2009.”
“Elizabeth and Robbie were first linked back in March of this year when they were seen holding hands.”
“Networking night: They were at a bash thrown by the Gersh Agency, a talent agency firmThe facts: Elizabeth, 28, is an actress whose sisters are the twins Mary Kate and Ashley from the TV series Full House.”


"Her next film is the avenger of 2018: Infinite War."
"He is co chair of the Gersh institution."
"But they only made their first official appearance as a couple on Friday night."
"At the 2017 Gersh Emmy Awards party in Los Angeles, the stars held hands and loved each other."
Official: Elizabeth Olsen and Robbie Arnett have been dating for months, but they didn't make their first public appearance in Los Angeles until Friday. Elizabeth Olson, 28, is an actress. Her sisters are twins Mary Kate and Ashley from the TV series full house
"They are fashion designers now."
"Robbie, 25, is the lead singer of Milo green, who started the band with friends in college in 2009."
"Elizabeth and Robbie first contacted in March, when they were seen holding hands."
"Social night: they went to a party hosted by Gersh's agency, a talent agency confirmed the fact that Elizabeth, 28, is an actress and her sisters are twins Mary Kate and Ashley from the TV series full house."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Before entering the NFL he scored a 34 on the Wonderlic Test, which was one of the highest scores ever for his position.”
“English appears on the reality television series WAGS with his fiancée Nicole Williams.”
“During his career he had 103 tackles, 12 sacks, and two forced fumbles.”
“English played for the Chargers from 2009 to 2013 and for the Tampa Bay Buccaneers from 2014 to 2015.”
“He was drafted #16 by the San Diego Chargers in the 2009 NFL Draft.”
“English played his college football at Northern Illinois and was named two time MAC Most Valuable Player, MAC Defensive Player of the Year, and three time All-MAC.”
“He was a defensive end and outside linebacker who played at Marmion Academy.”
“Larry English was born in Aurora, Illinois in January 1986.”
“Larry English net worth: Larry English is an American former professional football player who has a net worth of $8 million.”


"Before entering the NFL, he scored 34 points on the Wonderlic, one of the highest in the history of his position."
"English appeared in the reality TV series wags with his fianc é e Nicole Williams."
"In his career, he has 103 tackles, 12 sacks and two forced misses
"England played for Charles from 2009 to 2013 and for the Tampa Bay pirates from 2014 to 2015."
"He was picked in the 2009 NFL draft by the 16-year-old San Diego Chargers
Inglish played college football in Northern Illinois and was named McGrady's most valuable player twice, McGrady's defensive player of the year and all McGrady three times
"He is a defensive and outside defender who played at mamion college
Larry ingrish was born in Aurora, Illinois, in January 1986
"Larry English net worth: Larry English is a former professional football player in the United States with a net worth of $8 million."



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pic.twitter.com/eNJSlAX0Fi — Persian Rose (@PersianRose1) July 24, 2017Unbeknownst to all of us, Nic Cage is living in the darkest of dark timelines pic.twitter.com/5JQ3Squvzc — joel tyler (@joeltyler_) July 23, 2017”
“...pic.twitter.com/ceAk0ktgqy — Fabrice Deprez (@fabrice_deprez) July 23, 2017I kinda feel like all of America is Nicholas Cage in this photo.”
“Cage was in the country’s capital city of Astana for the 13th Eurasia International Film Festival, reported the Astana Times.”
“Also Read: Sean Spicer Took a Mini-Fridge From Junior Staffers and Twitter Loves ItIn the photo, Cage is pictured wearing a traditional Kazakh hat and robe, and it has Twitter users wondering what is going on with the Oscar winner.”
“As one observer put it, “Nicholas Cage in Kazakhstan is the picture you didn’t know you wanted but you need.”Others on Twitter used the photo to liken it to Russia news.”
““In the new ‘National Treasure’, Nicholas Cage investigates a urine stain on the back of the Constitution,” joked one user.”
““I kinda feel like all of America is Nicholas Cage in this photo,” said another.”
““How did we get here?”
“What is all this Russia sh– everywhere?”
“Huh?”“Why does it feel like Nicolas Cage is about to become a part of this whole Russia scandal?” yet another user asked.”


“... pic.twitter.com/eNJSlAX0Fi -Persian Rose (@ persianrose1) July 24, 2017 we don't know that Nick cage lives in the darkest time line pic.twitter.com/5JQ3Squvzc -Joel Tyler (@ joeltyler) July 23, 2017 "
“... pic.twitter.com/ceAk0ktgqy -Fabrice deprez (@ Fabrice / u deprez) July 23, 2017, I think in this picture, the whole country is Nicholas Cage. "
Cage participated in the 13th Eurasia International Film Festival in Astana, the capital, according to the Astana times
"Also read: Sean Spicer took a mini refrigerator from a junior clerk, and twitter loves it. In the photo, cage is wearing a traditional Kazakh hat and robe, and Twitter users are thinking about what happened to the Oscar winner. "
"As one observer put it," Nicholas Cage's photos in Kazakhstan are what you don't know you want, but you need. "Other people on twitter use this photo to compare it to Russian news."
One user joked: "in the new national treasure, Nicholas Cage investigated a urine stain on the back of the constitution."
Another netizen said: "I think the United States in this picture is all Nicholas Cage."
"How did we get here?"
"What's everywhere?"
"Well? "Why do people think Nicholas Cage is going to be part of the whole Russian scandal? "Another user asked."



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He’s funny to watch — he makes really funny little expressions.”
““His last nighttime feeding is right around when the sun comes up, so I sit and feed him and watch the sun rise,” she says.”
““I like to have all the information.”
““I don’t really love surprises,” explains Conrad.”
“Conrad and Tell, 37, who tied the knot in a September 2014 sunset ceremony at a boutique winery in Santa Ynez, California, opted to find out the sex of their baby before he was born.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Image zoom Credit: Elizabeth MessinaWant all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“...was born weighing 6 lbs 14 oz...”
“I just remember thinking he was so cute and I was surprised by how tiny he was I was convinced I was having a giant baby to the point where I didn t even buy newborn clothes in my head he was 9 lbs she says of baby Liam who...”
““We considered doing the 4D ultrasound but then decided to wait.”


"He looks interesting - his little expression is really interesting."
"His last feeding was at sunrise, so I sat and fed him and watched the sun rise," she said
"I love all the information."
"I really don't like surprises," Conrad explained
"Conrad and tyle, 37, married at a sunset ceremony at a boutique winery in San ines, California, in September 2014. They chose to find out the gender of their child before it was born."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
Photo scaling credit: Elizabeth Messina wants all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
“… 6 pounds 14 ounces at birth... "
"I just remember I thought he was cute, I was surprised how small he was, I believe I have a huge baby, I didn't even buy clothes for a newborn on my head, he was 9 pounds, she said baby Liam who..."
"We thought about 4D ultrasound, but decided to wait."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I swear I’m not joking with you.””
“I never had this conversation with you?”
“I never had this conversation with you?"”
“Kim Kardashian West asked Scott Disick in a Keeping Up with the Kardashians promoKim Kardashian Forgot to Tell Scott Disick That She Was Having a Third BabyScott Disick is feeling left out of the loop.”
“On Sunday s upcoming episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians the father of three he shares sons Mason 8 and Reign 3 and daughter Penelope 5 with ex Kourtney Kardashian learns that Kim Kardashian West is expecting a third...”
“...child and is apparently one of the last people that are close to the Kimoji creator to know...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I’ll be quite honest.”
“I don’t even know what this room is,” Disick, 34, says in an E!”
“...clip as Kardashian West, 37, guides him around an unfinished room in her home, which she was preparing for daughter Chicago, whom she welcomed Jan. 15.”


"I swear I'm not kidding you."
"I never talked to you about that?"
"I never talked to you about that?"
"Kim Kardashian West asked Scott disc to keep up with Kardashian's promo. Kim Kardashian forgot to tell Scott disc that she was going to have a third child, and Scott disc felt excluded."
"In" follow Kardashian ", which will be broadcast on Sunday, the father of three shared his son Mason 8 and rule 3, daughter Penelope 5 with former Kourtney Kardashian, and learned that Kim Kardashian West was pregnant with his third child..."
“… Child, obviously the last person to approach kimoji's creator knows... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"To be honest."
"I don't even know what this room is," said 34 year old Disick with an e! "
“…… In the clip, Kardashian West, 37, leads him around an unfinished room in her home as she prepares for her daughter Chicago on January 15



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I think I crack him up — unless he’s a really good actor and great at faking laughter.”The actress also opened up about the public reaction to their split, which lamented their breakup.”
““We watched each other grow, and he still cracks me up all the time.”
“...so proud of me still she added at the time...”
“WATCH Anna Faris Says Ex Chris Pratt Still Cracks Me Up All the Time Faris opened up about her separation from Pratt to PEOPLE in October saying We ll always have each other and be incredible friends There is still so much laughter in our lives together and he is...”
“Faris and Barrett were seen on several dinner dates in October, stepping out twice in the span of two days at Modo Mio, an upscale Italian restaurant in the Los Angeles neighborhood of Pacific Palisades.”
““They were hanging out occasionally in September, but started seeing each other more frequently recently.”Image zoom Credit: Splash NewsThe cinematographer is the first man Faris has been publicly seen with since splitting from Chris Pratt in August after eight years of marriage.”
“Image zoom Credit: Splash News“Anna has been hanging out with Michael for weeks,” a source told PEOPLE at the time.”
“They were first spotted together early that month.”
“The two have been spending time together since September after working on the new film Overboard.”
“The cinematographer even sweetly wrapped his arm around the actress during the ride.”


"I think I'll give him a good beating, unless he's really a good actor and he's good at pretending to laugh." The actress also made public the public reaction to their breakup, which they regretted
"We watched each other grow up, and he still made me laugh."
“…… She was proud of me at that time... "
"Watching Anna Faris say that former Chris Pratt still makes me very happy. Until October, Faris disclosed her separation from Pratt, saying that we will always have each other and become incredible friends. There are so many laughter in our life together. He is..."
"Faris and Barrett were seen on several dinner dates in October, and in two days they went out twice to modomio, an upscale Italian restaurant near the Pacific fence in Los Angeles."
"They were together occasionally in September, but they've seen each other more recently." Credit for image zooming: splash news this photographer is the first man to appear in public after Faris broke up with Chris Platt in August after eight years of marriage
"Image scaling credit: splash news," a source told people at the time. "Anna has been with Michael for weeks."
"They were first found together at the beginning of that month."
"They've been together since September after making the new film" falling well and falling stone. "
"During the journey, the photographer even hugged the actress sweetly."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“المتحدة العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Switch to Latino Español Feedback Help en Choose a language United States English en United States español es Music Reviews Music News Video Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“English Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية”
“Deutschland Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines...”
“...msn back to msn home entertainment powered by Microsoft News Skip To Navigation Skip To Content Sign in Change language content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
At present, in each of 1575 chechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechecheche Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut
"English polskapolski portugal portuguese Schweiz Germany Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomi Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rk è e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States English American Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng VI è t Ε λ λ≤ δ α ε λ η ν ν ι κ P ιιιι P Чхישש㪞ביתاااااالبببببةااا
"Germany - Germany - Spain - France - France - India - English - India - India - India - India - New Zealand - Norway - Norway - Bokmal international version of the ú sterreich Deutsch per ú Espa? Ol Philippines..."
“… MSN return to MSN family entertainment from Microsoft support news jump to navigation jump to content login change language content Africa French French French Latin America Spanish Argentina Spanish Australia English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canada English Canada French Cesc Republic Chile Spanish Colombia Spanish Denmark … “



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just throwing those out there...)”
“In addition to the beverage options listed on our menu boards there are more than 170 000 ways baristas can customize beverages at Starbucks including selecting from a variety of milks syrups coffee espresso options and toppings a Starbucks spokesperson...”
“Some locations did in fact run out of the ingredients before the April 23 deadline.”
“Indeed, it ended up being so popular (because, I mean, look at it) that the "as long as supplies last" part proved to be a key factor.”
“The Unicorn Frappuccino originally came with a stipulation on its availability: You could get it from April 19 through April 23, or as long as supplies lasted.”
“The Dragon Frappuccino seems to have been born from this "anything goes" philosophy, and people are loving it.”
“"This high level of personalization allows our customers to tailor their drink to match their personal taste preferences."”
“...tells Bustle...”
“Its existence is possible due to the virtually endless customization you can employ when ordering your favorite Sbux drinks.”
“Loch Ness Monster Frapp?”


"Just throw those out..."
"In addition to the beverage options listed on the menu, there are more than 170000 ways for baristas to customize their drinks at Starbucks, including choosing a Starbucks spokesman from a variety of milk, syrup, coffee, espresso and ingredients..."
"In fact, before the April 23 deadline, some locations did run out of raw materials."
"In fact, it turned out to be very popular (because, I mean, look at it)," as long as the supply continues "part proved to be a key factor."
"Unicorn milkshakes initially had a supply policy: you can buy them from April 19 to April 23, or as long as the supply lasts."
"It seems that longbingle was born from this philosophy of" let things be as they please ", and people like it very much."
"This high degree of personalization enables our customers to customize their drinks according to their taste preferences."
“… Tell Buster... "
"It's possible, because you can order your favorite SBUX drink almost endlessly."
"FRAP, the Loch Ness monster?"



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the trailer, which dropped last week, below.”
“The first announced is the Sylvia Rivera Law Project, which "works to guarantee that all people are free to self-determine gender identity and expression, regardless of income or race, and without facing harassment, discrimination or violence."”
“Ryan Murphy is now making a big commitment to charity — and he is encouraging others to do the same.”
“The cocreator of Pose announced Wednesday on Twitter that he will donate all profits from the FX series to LGBT groups.”
“I am donating 100 percent of my profits from my new FX show POSE towards trans and LGBTQ charitable organizations.”
“These groups do amazing work and need our support.”
“Every day for the next 14 days I will highlight a group I'm supporting, and encourage you to do the same!”
“— Ryan Murphy (@MrRPMurphy) May 9, 2018Murphy added that he will announce each charity on social media over the next two weeks, in order to help promote each's work supporting transgender people and the larger LGBT community.”
“The Sylvia Rivera Law Project.”
“Pose premieres June 3 on FX.”


"Look at the trailer that fell last week."
"First announced is the Sylvia Rivera law project, which" aims to ensure that all people are free to determine their gender identity and expression, regardless of income or race, and are not subject to harassment, discrimination or violence. "
"Ryan Murphy is now committed to charity, and he encourages others to do the same."
"The co-founder of pose announced on twitter on Wednesday that he would donate all the profits from the FX series to LGBT groups."
"I will donate 100% of the profits from my new Forex show to cross-cultural and LGBTQ charities."
"The work of these groups is excellent and needs our support."
"Every day for the next 14 days, I will highlight a group I support and encourage you to do the same!"
"Ryan Murphy (@ mrrpmurphy) added on May 9, 2018 that he will announce every charity event on social media in the next two weeks to help promote every effort to support transgender people and the larger LGBT community."
"Sylvia Rivera law project."
"Premiered on FX on June 3."



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lady Gaga is up for two awards at this weekend’s Grammys: Best Pop Vocal Album for Joanne and Best Pop Solo Performance for “Million Reasons.” She’s also set to perform at the ceremony (for the fourth consecutive year), which airs on Sunday, January 28.”
“Her grandmother assures her it’s beautiful, and she’s absolutely right.”
“...too sad...”
“It ends with her running into the woods singing XOXO Joanne If you watched the singer s Netflix documentary Gaga Five Foot Two you probably remember the scene in which she plays a version of the song for her grandmother telling her that they can stop listening if it s...”
“In the accompanying video, we follow Gaga as she strolls through a garden, shoots pool, and howls the emotional lyrics at the sky.”
“The song — subtitled “Where Do You Think You’re Goin’?” — is more somber than the original, pairing Gaga’s soaring vocals with just a piano.”
“Gaga bares her soul on the stripped-down version of the song, written in memory of her late aunt Joanne Germanotta, who died at age 19 from lupus-related complications.”
“YouTubeLady Gaga’s New Version Of ‘Joanne’ Is Even More Emotional Than The OriginalIn case you need a good cry heading into the weekend, Lady Gaga just released an emotional new version of the already-moving ballad “Joanne,” the title track from her 2016 album.”


Lady Gaga will receive two awards at this weekend's Grammy Awards: the best pop vocal album Award for Joanne and the best pop solo Award for million reasons. She will also perform (for the fourth year in a row) at the awards ceremony on Sunday, January 28
"Her grandmother assured her it was beautiful, and she was absolutely right."
“… It's so sad... "
"Finally, she ran into the woods and sang XOXO Joanne. If you saw the singer's Netflix documentary Gaga five foot two, you may remember her playing a version of the song for her grandmother. She told her that if it was They can stop listening. "
"In the attached video, we follow Gaga, who walks in the garden, takes pictures of the swimming pool and howls emotional lyrics into the sky."
The subtitle of the song is "where do you want to go?"? "- more sombre than the original, combining the high pitched singing with a piano."
"Gaga shows her soul in a simplified version of this song in memory of her late aunt Joanne gemanota, who died of lupus related complications at the age of 19."
"The new version of" Joanne "of YouTube Lady Gaga is more emotional than the original version of" YouTube Lady Gaga needs a good cry ". Entering the weekend, Lady Gaga has just released a new version of" Joanne ", a touching folk song, which is the main song of her 2016 album."



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“POPULAR VIDEO ON VARIETY”
“Pathé is distributing “Judy” in the U.K., France and Switzerland and will handle sales throughout the rest of the world.”
“BAFTA winner David Livingstone (“Pride”) produces for Calamity Films.”
“British stage director and Tony nominee Rupert Goold is directing “Judy” from a script by Tom Edge (“The Crown”).”
“Executive producers include Cameron McCracken for Pathé, Rose Garnett for BBC Films and Andrea Scarso for Ingenious.”
““Judy” is a Pathé, BBC Films and Ingenious Media presentation of a Calamity Films Production.”
“She died in London in June 1969.”
“The movie will recount her performances, with some of her best-known numbers, including “Somewhere Over the Rainbow.”The film also delves into Garland’s behind-the-scenes battles with management, her relationships with musicians and fans, and the unfolding family drama that provided the backdrop to the London performances.”
“Garland’s dates at the Talk of the Town nightclub came toward the end of the icon’s long career and shortly before her death.”
“As well as Zellweger in the lead role, the cast includes Jessie Buckley (“War and Peace”), Finn Wittrock (“American Horror Story”) and Michael Gambon (“Harry Potter”).”


"Variety show popular video"
Via sells Judy in the UK, France and Switzerland and will sell it around the world.
"British Academy of Motion Picture Arts Award winner David Livingstone (pride) made disaster films."
British stage director and Tony nominee Rupert Goold is directing "Judy" based on Tom edge's play (crown)
"Executive producers include Cameron McCracken of Paser, rose Garnett of BBC films and Andrea scarso of ingenious."
Judy is a disaster movie cleverly presented by BBC film and media
"She died in London in June 1969."
The film will tell about Garland's performance, including some of her most famous numbers, including "somewhere over the rainbow.". The film also explores Garland's behind the scenes struggle with management, her relationship with musicians and fans, and the ongoing family drama that provides the background for London performances
"Garland's date at the town talk club came at the end of the idol's long career, shortly before her death."
"In addition to the lead role of Zellweger, the actors include Jesse Barkley (war and peace), Finn witrock (American horror story) and Michael Gambon (Harry Potter)



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Ari Perilstein/Getty Images for A-OK Collective, LLC]”
“I just don’t think that this is gonna like, really fill me up.”But it wasn’t just Jenner who sounded ungrateful.”
““I just need some f*cking spaghetti.”
“The upscale restaurant dinner didn’t impress Kylie, who also revealed that the last food she consumed was chips and guacamole on a private jet.”
“Reality TV Star Complains To Mommy Kris JennerThe 20-year-old reality TV star informed her mother that she was “really hungry” and demanded that the menu change to suit her needs.”
“Instead, glaring at the fancy cheese dip and other extravagant goodies on the table, Kylie let go with a whine that sounded like she might need an infusion of gratitude just as much as food.”
“She’s…a monster.”Jenner didn’t spare her mother Kris from the wrath of her “monster” personality.”
““When Kylie doesn’t eat the whole day, she’s not Kylie.”
“In a camera confessional, Woods admitted that when her 20-year-old best friend is deprived of nourishment, she turns into a scary creature.”
“Morphing Into MonsterThe group had no food the entire day, according to Jordyn.”


[special pictures provided by ARI perlistein / Getty Images for A-OK collective, LLC]
"I just don't think it makes me feel full." But it's not just Jenner who sounds ungrateful
"I just need some damn spaghetti."
"The dinner at the high-end restaurant didn't impress Kelly. Kelly also revealed that the last food she ate was French fries and avocado sauce from the private plane."
The reality star complained to her mother, Chris jennell, that the 20-year-old reality star told her mother she was "really hungry" and asked to change the menu to meet her needs
"Instead, Kelly glared at the delicious cheese dip and other luxury dishes on the table and let out a whimper. It sounds like she might need the same gratitude as food."
"She is A monster. " Jenna didn't protect her mother Chris from the anger of her "monster" character
"When Kelly doesn't eat all day, she's not Kelly."
"In a video confession, woods admitted that when her 20-year-old good friend was deprived of nutrition, she would become a terrible creature."
After becoming monsters, the group didn't eat all day, Jordan said



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click here to upload yours.”
“We pay for videos too.”
“The comedian gushed over his former flame, who he famously dumped by text in 2011 after being married for just 14 months.”
“6 Russell Brand has heaped praise on his 'wonderful' marriage to Katy PerryRussell, 42, appeared on US chat programme, The Wendy Williams Show, and heaped praise on the Teenage Dream singer.”
“Talking of their relationship, he said: "But it was a very, very wonderful time.”
“"She was lovely.”
“She’s such a lovely person I’ve got nothing but love for her.”The British-born stand-up, who looked trendy in a printed blouse, went on to give his take about her latest job as judge on American Idol.”
“6 The comedian, 42, praised his popstar ex after he famously dumped her by text in 20116 The showbiz pair were married for less than two years Credit: AFPHe continued: "I don't know much about American Idol or things like that.”
“"I certainly think that she's probably a very good judge, so I certainly wouldn't comment on how much she's earning in the negative.”
“I wish her all the best in all of her endeavours."”


"Click here to upload your."
"We also pay for video."
The comedian talked endlessly about his ex lover, who abandoned him by text message in 2011 after only 14 months of marriage
"6 Russell Brand raves about his' wonderful 'marriage to 42 year old Katy Perry Russell, who appeared on the US chat show Wendy Williams show and raves about the teenage dream singer."
Speaking of their relationship, he said, "but it was a very, very wonderful time."
"She's lovely."
"She is such a lovely person, I only love her." The British born "stand up" looks fashionable in a printed shirt, and then tells about her latest job as an American Idol Judge
The 42 year old comedian praised his former pop star for texting her in 20116. The acting couple were married for less than two years
"I certainly think she might be a good judge, so I'm sure I won't comment on her earnings from negative news."
"I wish her all the best."



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If you want to have as much fun as the cast of Mamma Mia!, make sure to watch it once it hits Netflix and get ready for the sequel out July 20.”
“(It goes to show how there’s seriously nothing she can’t do.)”
“...did the unthinkable with its incredible cast: it had all of them singing, even those who had absolutely no musical experience.”
“Mamma Mia!”
“Watching the film, you can tell the actors are having a blast, too.”
“By using tracks everyone already knows instead of original ones, the movie (based on the hit Broadway musical) makes everyone want to sing and dance along.”
“Chances are even if you’re not totally familiar with ABBA’s discography, you know plenty of their songs.”
“— besides bringing together a fantastic cast — is the music.”
“The most special thing about Mamma Mia!”
“Raised by a single mother (Meryl Streep), Sophie wants to know who her father is, so she invites three of her mom’s former lovers to her wedding to find out which of them is her father.”


"If you want to be as happy as the actors in Mamma Mia! , be sure to watch it after it lands on Netflix and be ready for the July 20 sequel. "
"(which means she really can't do anything.)
“…… With an incredible cast, we did incredible things: everyone was singing, even those who had no musical experience at all. "
"Mamma Mia!"
"After watching the film, you can see that the actors are having a good time, too."
"The movie (based on a Broadway pop musical) replaces the original track with a track that everyone knows, making everyone want to sing and dance with."
"Even if you're not completely familiar with Abba's records, you probably know a lot of their songs."
"In addition to bringing together a group of excellent actors, there is also music."
"Mamma Mia, the most special thing!"
Sophie is raised by a single mother (Meryl Streep). She wants to know who her father is, so she invites her mother's three ex lovers to her wedding to see which of them is her father



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’ve been spoilt already.””
““But you know what?”
“...says it s for the better...”
“Roberts, 49, told Harper’s Bazaar U.K. she was singularly focused during the early stages of her career.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I was my priority, a selfish little brat running around making films,” she said.”
“The Oscar-winning actress said she experienced a positive shift in her life after meeting her husband, cinematographer Danny Moder, and becoming a mother.”
“Image zoom Credit: Harper’s Bazaar/Alexi Lubomirski“It was meeting Danny…finding my person,” she said.”
““When I think about what makes my life my life, and makes sense and just shine inside of me, it’s him.”
“Everything has come from that for me.”Roberts and Moder have been married for nearly 15 years and have worked together on several films, including The Mexican, The Normal Heart and Secret in Their Eyes.”


"I've been spoiled."
"But you know what?"
“… Say it's for the better... "
Roberts, 49, told Harper's English fair that she was very focused early in her career.
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'm my first priority, a selfish little guy running around making movies," she said
The Oscar winning actress said she experienced positive changes in her life after meeting her husband, photographer Denny Maud and becoming a mother
"Image scaling credit: Harper's Bazaar / Alexis lubomirsky" this is a meeting with Denny Who found me, she said
"When I think about what makes my life my life, meaningful and shining in my heart, that's him."
Roberts and Maud have been married for nearly 15 years and have worked together on several films, including Mexicans, normal heart and secrets in the eyes



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Patridge filed for divorce in September after 10 months of marriage.”
“Their agreement comes a little more than a week after Patridge was spotted stepping out to collect young Kirra from Bohan.”
“...obtained by Page Six revealed...”
“The restraining order prevented him from contacting her or her parents as well as prevented him from putting her under surveillance Patridge realized Bohan had violated the restraining order when she noticed he had installed cameras throughout the house in the kitchen living room entryway and upstairs hallway documents previously...”
“Patridge had obtained a temporary restraining order against Bohan last month after a series of alleged domestic violence incidents.”
“The estranged couple appeared in court Friday and came to an agreement about how they’ll treat each other and their 1-year-old daughter Kirra, TMZ reports.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Audrina Patridge and Corey Bohan are attempting to make nice for the sake of their daughter.”


"Patrick filed for divorce in September this year after 10 months of marriage."
"More than a week before they reached an agreement, Patric was found out to go out and collect young Kira from Bohan."
“… Get it on page 6... "
"The injunction prevented him from contacting her or her parents, and from spying on her. Partridge realized that Bohan had violated the injunction because she had noticed that he had installed cameras in the documents at the entrance of the kitchen living room and in the upstairs hallway..."
"Patric got a temporary injunction against Bohan last month after a series of suspected domestic violence incidents."
The separated couple appeared in court Friday and reached an agreement on how to treat each other and their 1-year-old daughter, Kira, according to TMZ
"Click send this message to a friend (open in a new window) Click share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) Audrina Patridge and Corey Bohan are trying to do good for their daughter."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To donate to relief efforts in Puerto Rico, go to www.unitedforpuertorico.com.”
“Just prior to sharing the video, the mom of two reposted a similar video made by her ex-husband, Marc Anthony, who also called on fans to help.”
“"Together we can help rebuild our island, and the Caribbean," she said.”
“J.Lo then urged fans to donate to relief efforts organized by Beatriz Areizaga, the First Lady of Puerto Rico.”
“"Puerto Rico has been hit by two of the most devastating hurricane we have ever seen — Irma and Maria."”
“"What’s foremost on my mind and many others is trying to figure out the best way to help," she said.”
“The "Shades of Blue" star, who was born in the Bronx, New York, to Puerto Rican parents, reminded fans that the island had already been hit hard by Hurricane Irma before Hurricane Maria ravaged it, demolishing homes and killing at least 2 people.”
“"Me and my cousin still haven’t been able to hear from our families over there," she revealed.”
“The devastation is beyond belief,” said 48-year-old Lopez from her dressing room at her Las Vegas residency.”
“"What’s on my mind is what's going on in Puerto Rico.”


"To contribute to relief work in Puerto Rico, please go to www.unitedforpuertorico.com 。”
"Just before sharing the video, the mother of two reprinted a similar video made by her ex husband Mark Anthony, and he appealed to fans to help."
"Together, we can help rebuild our islands and the Caribbean," she said
Luo then urged fans to donate money for the relief activities organized by Puerto Rican first lady Beatrice arezaga
"Puerto Rico was hit by two of the most devastating hurricanes we've ever seen - IRMA and Maria."
"What I and many others care about most is how to find the best way to help," she said
"The blue shadow star, who was born in the Bronx of New York and whose parents are Puerto ricans, reminded fans that before Hurricane Maria, the island had been badly hit by Hurricane ILMA, with houses destroyed and at least two people dead."
"My cousin and I still haven't heard from the family there," she revealed
"The disaster is incredible," Lopez, 48, said in the dressing room of his Las Vegas residence
"I'm thinking about what happened in Puerto Rico."



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They love each other and their children deeply and are committed to a bright future,"Bush is the cousin of former president George W. Bush.”
“Following their 2017 separation, Bush's publicist released the following statement:"After almost 20 years of marriage, they have separated for the moment to evaluate their life together.”
“News and TMZ.”
“Davis filed legal documents to end their marriage in Los Angeles Superior Court citing irreconcilable differences, according to TMZ.”
“The two have been separated since September, 11 months following the leak of the infamous "Access Hollywood" tapes featuring Bush and Donald Trump.”
“Davis is asking for joint legal and primary physical custody of two of their children —Lillie, 13, and Mary, 17 — according to TMZ.”
“Josie, their oldest daughter, is 19.”
“Bush will get visitation time with the children, according to the documents.”
“Davis is also seeking spousal support.”
“Bush's representative did not respond to an email from USA TODAY.”


Bush, a cousin of former President Bush, said: "they love each other and their children and are committed to a better future."
After their separation in 2017, Bush's publicists issued the following statement: "after nearly 20 years of marriage, they temporarily separated to assess their common life."
"News and TMZ."
Davis filed legal documents to the Los Angeles High Court to terminate their marriage, citing irreconcilable differences, TMZ reported
"Bush and Donald Trump have been separated 11 months after their infamous" into Hollywood "video leaked in September."
According to TMZ, Davis asked for joint legal and primary physical custody of their two children, lily, 13, and Mary, 17
"Their eldest daughter, Josie, is 19 years old."
"According to the document, Bush will have time to visit the children."
"Davis is also seeking support from his spouse."
"Bush's representative did not reply to USA today's email."



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Relive the magic of Tom and Katie's wedding, below.”
“Still, the divorce rumors even made their way to Tom and Katie's moms, who called them to make sure everything was fine between the two lovebirds, according to E!”
“And now the Vanderpump Rules husband and wife are setting the record straight on the speculation.”
“Tom and Katie shut down the rumors during a recent interview with E!”
“News.”
“"We are madly in love," Katie said.”
“"I feel like marriage really suits us.”
“We've been through so much, especially since last summer."”
“Katie added that although the first year of marriage is often considered the most difficult, it has been "89 percent blissful" for the couple.”
“"We like to think that we [exorcised] all the bad stuff.”


"To review the magic of Tom and Katie's wedding, see below."
However, the divorce rumor even spread to Tom and Katie's mother. They called Tom and Katie to make sure everything was OK between them
"And now the Vanderbilt rules and the couple are clearly documenting speculation."
"Tom and Katie at the latest e!"
"News."
"We're madly in love," Katie said
"I think marriage really suits us."
"We've been through too much, especially since last summer."
Katie added that while the first year of marriage is usually considered the most difficult, it is "89 percent happiness" for the couple
"We like to think that we've got rid of all the bad things."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s the reason to my rhyme & he’s attempting to make me an honest woman.””
““That was my only fitting before I got the dress — naturally, I was quite anxious,” Bundy says.”
“Get All the Details on Her Custom Sherri Hill Wedding DressImage zoom Credit: April RietzeIt’s official!”
“Laura Bell Bundy, the actress, singer and Broadway star (she played Elle Woods in the Legally Blonde musical!)”
“...married Thom Hinkle, an executive at TBS.”
“The two tied the knot during a country-themed ceremony in the infield at Santa Anita Park, a horse racetrack in Arcadia, California, on Saturday in front of family and friends.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“And like any true horse racing fan, she abided by a very festive dress code.”
“Bundy chose a custom Sherri Hill gown that featured all-over lace, beading along the bodice, a strapless sweetheart neckline and a long, elegant mermaid-style train.”
“Image zoom Credit: April Rietze“I knew I wanted a dress that was more sexy and slinky than ‘Cinderella goofy’ or big,” Bundy tells PeopleStyle exclusively.”


"He's the reason I rhyme & he wants me to be an honest woman."
"It was the only dress that fit before I got it - of course, I was in a hurry," Bundy said
"Get all the details of her customized Sherry Hill wedding dress image zooming credit: the official of April ritzette!"
Laura bell Bundy, actress, singer and Broadway star (she plays al woods in a legitimate blonde musical!) "
“…… Married Tom schinker, an executive at TBS. "
On Saturday, the two married in front of family and friends at a village themed wedding in the inner field of Santa Anita Park, Arcadia, California
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Like any real racer, she has a very festive dress code."
Bondi chose a Sherry hill custom dress, full of lace, beads on the bra, strapless sweetheart neckline and elegant Mermaid style dress
Image zooming credit: April Rietze Bundy told the exclusive story of peoplestyle: "I know I want a dress that's sexier and tighter than Cinderella or big."



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But I think it’s all about effort!”Happy watching, everyone.”
““Never, ever, ever, have I ever done anything this embarrassing in front of a bunch of people.”
“...s just say Eric sums up the evening rather well...”
“I don t know what kind of hair products he is using today but he needs to patent it FROM PEN The Bachelor s Vanessa Grimaldi Reveals Her First Impression of Fiancé Nick Viall Up next Dean and Eric go head to head or rather chest to chest and let...”
““Brady’s hair is a force that can’t be reckoned with,” she says.”
“Image zoom Credit: ABC/Matt Brown“Brady vs. Bryce — it was a pretty back-and-forth competition,” says Lindsay, later quipping about Brady’s coiffed ‘do, which, shockingly, remains intact throughout the tousle.”
“(Which, by the way, is nothing but a flimsy inflatable pool filled with mud.)”
“The ladies all don clear raincoats to protect themselves as the first two contenders, Brady and Bryce, take the pit.”
“In the clip, Lindsay, 32, is joined by her Bachelor besties Corinne Olympios, Alexis Waters, Raven Gates and Jasmine Goode.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"But I think it's all about hard work! "Have a good time."
"I've never, never, never done anything so embarrassing in front of a group of people."
"Let's say Eric summed up the evening quite well..."
"I don't know what kind of hair care products he is using today, but he needs to get pen's patent. Vanesa Grimaldi, a bachelor, revealed her first impression of her fiance Nick viall. The next Dean and Eric are head to head, or more precisely, chest to chest, to let..."
"Brady's hair is a force that can't be ignored," she said
"The credit for image zooming: ABC / Matt Brown" Brady vs. Bryce - it's a pretty repetitive game, "Lindsay said, later joking about Brady's hairstyle, and it's amazing that it's intact in the whole messy world."
(by the way, it's just an inflatable tank full of mud.)
"The ladies put on transparent raincoats to protect themselves, because Brady and Bryce, the first two competitors, took part in the competition."
In the video, Lindsay, 32, is with her single friends Corinne Olympus, Alexis waters, crow gates and Molly good
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Frazer Harrison/Getty Images]”
“By the end of the show, Todd Chrisley admitted he believed in Tyler Henry, and Julie Chrisley knew her decision to do this was the right one.”
“The two star on the popular USA network show, Chrisley Knows Best.”
“They have put their family out in the public eye, and their struggles have been heavily documented.”
“From the fall out with Todd’s son Kyle Chrisley to the near-fatal accident Savannah had earlier this year, there isn’t anything they haven’t shown.”
“While there are parts of their lives that remain private, there is so much more shown.”
“Last night, Julie Chrisley appeared on Hollywood Medium with Tyler Henry.”
“It was something she wanted to do despite Todd Chrisley’s reservations.”
“He spoke out about how his faith has kept him away from stuff like this, but Julie insisted she wanted to try it.”
“Against his better judgment, he stood by his wife and sat next to her on the couch as Tyler connected to the people in their lives.”


"[Fraser Harrison / Getty pictures]
"At the end of the show, Todd crisley admitted that he believed in Tyler Henry and Julie crisley knew that she had made the right decision."
"The two stars on the popular Internet show in the United States, crisley knows best."
"They have exposed their families to the public, and their struggles are well documented."
"From falling out with Kyle christley, Todd's son, to the near fatal accident in Savannah earlier this year, they didn't show it."
"Although there are some places in their lives that are still private, there are still more things to show."
"Last night, Julie crisley and Tyler Henry appeared in the Hollywood media together."
"That's what she wants to do, despite Todd crisley's reservations."
"He said his faith kept him away from such things, but Julie insisted she wanted to try."
"Contrary to his better judgment, he's standing next to his wife, sitting on the sofa next to her, and Taylor is connected to the people in their lives."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Only her agents and top NBCUniversal executives know for sure.”
“The economics of the business no longer support it.”
“The figures can be eyebrow raising Katie Couric was reportedly making 15 million a year when anchoring CBS Evening News and Matt Lauer depending on which unverified report one chooses to believe as if it were passed along in a personal memo from NBC News Chairman Andy Lack could have...”
“...been pulling down anywhere from 20 million to 25 million during his last year hosting NBC s Today Little wonder then that a report in The New York Post s Page Six all about newsroom salaries has stirred up online opprobrium...”
“In this case, people are shocked by what NBCUniversal may or may not be paying Hoda Kotb, the newly-christened co-anchor of “Today” (and, coincidentally, Lauer’s replacement).”
“It’s not how much the network is paying Kotb that has triggered thousands of impulses to let loose on Twitter, but rather a question as to whether NBC is paying Kotb enough.”
“According to Page Six, NBC is paying Kotb the meager sum of just $7 million a year — a number, the outlet says, that could be equivalent to what her co-anchor Savannah Guthrie might earn, but far less than Lauer’s mammoth paycheck.”
“An NBC spokesperson said the network doesn’t comment on compensation and a spokesperson for CAA, the agency that represents Kotb, said executives there declined to comment.”
““I’m not making Matt Lauer money.”
“Not even close,” Kotb told People according to a story posted Wednesday.”


"Only her agents and senior executives know the exact situation."
"The economy of the business no longer supports it."
"According to reports, Katie Couric made an astonishing $15 million a year hosting CBS weening news and Matt Lauer, depending on which unconfirmed story people choose to believe, as if it were NBC News chairman Andy lake It's the same as in the personal memo of Lake... "
“… When he hosted NBC's "today" program last year, his income ranged from 20 million to 25 million. No wonder a report on newsroom wages on page 6 of the New York Post caused people's condemnation online... "
"In this case, people are shocked that NBC Universal may or may not pay Hoda Kotb, the newly named co anchor of today (and, coincidentally, Raul's successor)
"It's not how much the TV station pays Kotb, but whether NBC pays Kotb enough, that causes thousands of people to indulge on twitter."
"According to the report on page 6, NBC only pays Kotb a meager $7 million a year, which the media say may be equivalent to the income of her co anchor Savannah Guthrie, but far less than Raul's huge income."
"A NBC spokesman said the station would not comment on the compensation, while a spokesman for Kotb's CAA said the station's executives declined to comment."
"I didn't make Matt Raul's money."
"It's not even close," Kotb told people, according to a report released on Wednesday



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Khloe Kardashian net worth, bump picture and age as she confirms she is pregnantMORE : That’s not an engagement ring on Khloe Kardashian’s left handThat is, unless little sister Kylie Jenner makes a certain big announcement in the coming days…”
“She added: ‘I was at the Bel-Air hotel.”
“...we’re lapping up all the details about how our new favourite celebrity parents-to-be, er, came to be.”
“Taking to Instagram overnight to comment on Khloe’s gushing Instagram snap that revealed the worst-kept secret in the world, her babydaddy and boyfriend Tristan Thompson reminisced about how he met the mogul in August last year, giving a sweet shout out to the man behind the madness.”
“Basketballer Brandon Jennings is the one we (and, we guess Khloe and Tristan, too) have to thank for this merry union, after he introduced 33-year-old Khloe’s to 26-year-old Tristan at Bel-Air hotel just over a year ago.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementTristan, who plays for the Cleveland Cavaliers said: ‘My love, Thank you for allowing me to be a part of your journey and entering your life that day at the bel air hotel.”
“One of the best moments in my life.”
“Peak mayhem as Khloe Kardashian and Tristan Thompson announce pregnancy(Photo: BACKGRID)‘I’m soo happy to be on this journey together with you and creating this angel from the man above.”
“Everyday I give thanks to him for bring[ing] us together.”
“‘I love you soo much and I know our little angel feels the love we share together and will know that mommy and daddy loves them unconditional forever and ever amen.”


"More: Khloe Kardashian's net worth, bump image and age, because she confirmed that she was pregnant more: This is not the engagement ring on Khloe Kardashian's left hand, that is, unless her sister Kylie Jenner announces a big news in the next few days..."
"I was at the bellelle Hotel," she added
“…… We're collecting all the details about how our favorite star to be parents, er, grew up. "
"She spent the night on instagram commenting on the photos that Khloe disclosed on instagram. The photos revealed the worst secrets in the world. Her babydaddy and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson recalled how he met the tycoon last August and gave a sweet shout to the people behind the madness."
"Basketball player Brandon Jennings is something we (we guess Khloe and Tristan) have to thank for introducing 33 year old Khloe's to 26 year old Tristan at the Bel Air Hotel more than a year ago."
Tristan, who plays for the Cleveland Cavaliers, said: "dear, thank you for making me a part of your journey. I came into your life that day at the Bel Air Hotel."
"One of the best moments of my life."
"Chaos peaked when Kardashian and Thompson announced their pregnancy." "I'm glad to be on this journey with you and create this angel from the man above."
"I thank him every day for bringing us together."
"I love you very much. I know that our little angels feel the love we share. They will know that mom and Dad love them unconditionally forever. Amen."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She recently celebrated her impending addition with a baby shower, attended by her former cast mates from “Ugly Betty.”“#UglyBettyFamily excited to add a new member to the mix.” she captioned a photo.”
“Ferrera announced her pregnancy back in December.”
“Ferrera said they plan to call the baby boy “Baz” for short.”
“Post has been removed or is no longer public.”
“In the baby’s social media birth announcement, the “Superstore” star said the new trio is “happy, healthy and totally in love.”Instagram post not found.”
“America Ferrera has given birth to her first child with husband Ryan Piers Williams, the star announced on Instagram.”
“(CNN) —Welcome to the world, Sebastian Piers Williams.”


"Recently, she held a baby shower to celebrate the upcoming new members, as well as the former actors of Ugly Betty." "The ugly betty family is excited to join the new members." She wrote under the title of a photo
"Ferreira announced last December that she was pregnant."
Ferreira said they plan to call the baby boy "buzz" for short
"The post has been deleted or is no longer public."
In the baby's social media birth announcement, the "superstar" said the new trio were "happy, healthy and totally in love." Instagram post not found
"Ferreira and her husband, Ryan piers Williams, gave birth to her first child," the star announced on instagram
(CNN) - welcome to the world, Sebastian pierce Williams



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The question is, ‘Why am I growing a beard and still shaving my balls?’”Watch the clip above.”
““The question is not, ‘Why are you growing a beard?’” Carrey quipped.”
“...facial hair but joked that he still manscapes elsewhere...”
“It has its own Twitter Carrey who serves as the executive producer for the upcoming Showtime comedy series I m Dying Up Here which premieres on June 4 didn t reveal if he has any plans to ever shave his...”
““It’s a bigger star than me at this point.”
““The beard, yes, everywhere I go people talk about the beard,” Carrey said.”
“The actor, 55, who has remained relatively out of the spotlight for the past couple of years, admitted that his never-ending facial hair has taken over.”
“...on Monday, May 22.”
“Jim Carrey — and his beard — stopped by Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“Its taken over!”


"The question is," why do I have a beard and a ball? "Look at the clip above."
"The question is not," why do you have a beard? "Kerry joked
“… Hair on the face, but joking that he's still in the other place of the cloak... "
"It has its own twitter Carrey, who is the executive producer of the Showtime comedy series" I'm going to die, "which will premiere on June 4, but did not disclose whether he has plans to shave..."
"This is a bigger star than me."
"Beards, yes, people talk about beards everywhere I go," Carey said
"The 55 year old actor has been relatively unpopular for the past few years, admitting that his endless facial hair has dominated."
“…… Monday, 22 May. "
"Jim Carrey - and his beard - was stopped by Jimmy Kimmel on the spot!"
"It takes over!"



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: ABC”
“ET on ABC.”
“However, both he and partner Lindsay Arnold are dealing with injuries that could keep the pair from taking home the top spot.”
“In a new clip shared by E!”
“News, cameras captured the moment Arnold's finger sliced into her partner's eye during rehearsal, leaving Fisher with a painful-looking scratch on his cornea.”
“Along with his eye injury, Arnold is also dealing with a knee injury that she sustained during rehearsals for last week's show.”
“"Between Lindsay's knee and my eye, we're both not in the place that we would like to be for the finale week, but you know, you do what you can," Fisher says in the clip.”
“To help keep his scratch from becoming irritated, Fisher's eye doctor gave him a contact to wear, but that isn't doing much to help with the pain.”
“After last week's show, during which Arnold wore a knee brace, the pair admitted it was the hardest one yet.”
“"We really had to rely on each other throughout this," Arnold told E!”


"Image source: ABC"
"Et on ABC."
"However, he and his partner Lindsay Arnold are both dealing with injuries, which may prevent them from regaining the championship
"In the new clip shared by E!"
In the news, the camera caught Arnold's finger in his partner's eye during rehearsal, leaving a painful scratch on Fisher's cornea
"In addition to the eye injury, Arnold is still dealing with her knee injury during rehearsal last week."
"Between Lindsay's knee and my eyes, we're not where we want to go in the last week, but you know, you do your best," Fisher said in the clip
"To prevent his scratch from becoming irritated, Fisher's ophthalmologist gave him a contact lens, but it didn't help much to relieve the pain."
"In last week's performance, Arnold wore knee pads and the two admitted it was the most difficult one so far."
"In the whole process, we really have to depend on each other," Arnold told e! "



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Muita luz! dear @guy & Michelle wish you all the love!”
“Queridos @guy e #Michele todo amor pra vcs!”
“Fucking love these guys.”
“Wedding ready @guyoseary ❤️ A post shared by JENNIFER MEYER (@jenmeyerjewelry) on Oct 24, 2017 at 11:11am PDT Oct 24, 2017 at 11:11am PDTThe entire U2 band appeared to fly in for the celebrations.”
“#beautiful #brazil #riodejaneiro #guyoseary #michellealves #madonna #wedding #queenofpop  A post shared by Mary (@sparklegirl98) on Oct 25, 2017 at 1:07pm PDT Oct 25, 2017 at 1:07pm PDTA-list guests included Bono, Helena Christensen, and Dakota Johnson, captured here at the Fasano Hotel by jewellery designer Jennifer Meyer.”
“Guy Oseary and Michelle Alves wedding in Rio De Janeiro on 10/24/2017!”
“It was a Kabbalah wedding, according to E Online.”
“Oseary is Jewish, and the wedding party even managed to erect a chuppah at the high-up venue.”
“...at the top of the iconic Christ the Redeemer statue on Corcovado mountain, 2,329 feet up in the air, amidst the clouds and the mist — which made for a rather dramatic backdrop.”
“A post shared by Damian Kulash (@damiankulash) on Jul 23, 2015 at 9:51pm PDT Jul 23, 2015 at 9:51pm PDTThe ceremony apparently began at 5.p.m.”


"Muita Luz! Dear @ guy & Michelle, I wish you all the love
“ Queridos@guy  Michele todo Amor PRA
"I love these fuckers."
"Wedding ready @ guyosery ❤️  A post shared by Jennifer Meyer (@ jenmeyer jewelry) at 11:11 a.m. on October 24, 2017 (11:11 a.m. Pacific time on October 24, 2017) seems that the whole U2 band flew to the celebration. "
"Beautiful Brazil Rio de Janeiro Michelle ALFS Madonna wedding Queen's Cup Mary (@ sparkegrirl98) shared a post at 1:07 pm on October 25, 2017. The guests on the PDTA list at 1:07 pm on October 25, 2017 include Bono, Helena Christensen and Dakota Johnson. Jewelry designer Jennifer Meyer is at the Fasano hotel I captured these photos. "
"Guy Oseary and Michelle Alves are married in Rio de Janeiro on October 24, 2017!"
"It's a Kabala wedding, according to e online."
"Osari is a Jew. People at the wedding even set up a dwarf in a high place."
“…… At the top of the iconic statue of Christ the Savior on Mount kolkovado, at 2329 feet above sea level, it's foggy and forms a rather dramatic setting
"The post ceremony of Damian kulash (@ damiankulash) at 9:51 p.m. on July 23, 2015 (9:51 p.m. Pacific time on July 23, 2015) obviously started at 5 p.m."



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Making a video!”
“I am making a video.”
“And Winfrey’s all about keeping it real, admitting “it’s a process y’all” on an Instagram shot getting a pedicure.”
“It’s been nine years since Oprah Winfrey last attended the Emmys, so for her big return tonight, the star’s primped to perfection from head-to-toe.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Looking for more style content?”
“Klum showed off her bare skin at the start of the video, then hyperlapsed through her lengthy glam routine with makeup artist Linda Hay and hair stylist Lorenzo Martin (who used Kenra Professional haircare products to style her locks!).”
“So of course, she didn’t hold back for the Emmys.”
“Project Runway host Heidi Klum always loves sharing getting ready Instagram videos with her fans as she preps for shows.”
“WATCH: Fabulous Feathers and Radiant Rainbow Gowns Dominate the 2017 Emmy Awards Red Carpet“Totally normal Sunday, nothing unusual happening here…  @joannavargasnyc #emmys#handmaidstale,” Moss captioned the photo.”


"Make a video!"
"I'm making a video."
"Winfrey just wanted to be real, admitted in a pedicure photo on instagram." it's a process“
"It's nine years since Oprah Winfrey took part in the Emmy last time, so for tonight's big return, the star is all dressed up from head to toe."
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
"Looking for more style content?"
Klum shows her naked skin at the beginning of the video, then works with makeup artist Linda hay and hairstylist Lorenzo Martin (they designed her hair with kenra's professional hair care products!) Together, she completed her lengthy dazzle action
"So, of course, she didn't flinch for the Emmy."
"Project t host Heidi Cramer always likes to share instagram videos with fans when preparing for the show."
"Observation: beautiful feathers and shiny rainbow dresses dominate the red carpet of the 2017 Emmy Awards." on a perfectly normal Sunday, nothing unusual happened here @Joanna vargasnyc? Emmy? Handmade story, "moss said in the photo title



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Season 4 Versailles Ovation Season 2 October 1 The Toy Box ABC Season 2 Shark Tank ABC Season 9 Ten Days in the Valley ABC new drama series Wisdom of the Crowd CBS new drama series NCIS Los Angeles CBS Season 9 Bob s Burgers Fox Season 8 The Simpsons...”
“Amazon Prime new drama series Active Shooter America Under Fire Showtime new documentary series September 30 Saturday Night Live NBC Season 43 48 Hours CBS Season 30 Cake Boss TLC Season 9 Released OWN new docuseries Iyanla Fix My Life OWN Season 8 Dr Jeff Rocky Mountain Vet Animal Planet...”
“TruTV Season 2B In the Vault go90 new drama series September 14 Better Things FX Season 2 Bong Appetit Viceland Season 2B The Pizza Show Viceland Season 2 Riviera Sundance Now new drama series September 15 American Vandal Netflix new comedy series VeggieTales in the City Netflix Season 2 Project...”
“PBS Season 37 Chrisley Knows Best USA Season 5B According to Chrisley USA new aftershow series Big Freedia Bounces Back Fuse Season 6 Indie Lens Storycast YouTube new documentary series September 13 South Park Comedy Central Season 21 moved from August 23 Broad City Comedy Central Season 4 Comedy Knockout...”
“The Robert Irvine Show syndication Season 2 Newton s Law Acorn TV Season 1 2 U S premiere September 12 Hand in Hand A Benefit for Hurricane Harvey Relief ABC CBS CMT Fox NBC live telethon Dr Phil syndication Season 16 The Mindy Project Hulu Season 6 final season Frontline...”
“Countdown ESPN new season I Am Frankie Nickelodeon new comedy series The Talk CBS Season 7 Judge Judy syndication Season 22 Hot Bench syndication Season 4 Who Wants to Be a Millionaire syndication Season 16 Rachael Ray syndication Season 12 Crime Watch Daily syndication Season 3 Harry syndication Season 2”
“...the Lake China Girl SundanceTV Season 2 Sunday NFL Countdown ESPN new season Tim Eric s Bedtime Stories Adult Swim Season 2 September 11 Monday Night Football ESPN Season 48 Home Family Hallmark Channel Season 6 Counting On TLC Season 4 Meet the Putmans TLC new unscripted series Sunday NFL”
“September 9 Copycat Killers Reelz Season 2 Cold Feet BritBox Season 7 U S premiere September 10 The Orville Fox new drama series moves to regular time slot on September 21 Outlander Starz Season 3 Fear the Walking Dead AMC Season 3B The Deuce HBO new drama series Top of...”
“...crime series One Mississippi Amazon Prime Season 2 Con Man Syfy new shortform drama series MTV Unplugged MTV concert series revival Third Rail with OZY PBS new current affairs series Broke and Famous Reelz new docuseries US Weekly s Famous Feuds Reelz new docuseries Wild Castles Smithsonian Earth new docuseries...”
“Things First with Cris Carter and Nick Wright FS1 new sports talk series September 8 EIF Presents XQ Super School Live ABC CBS Fox NBC public service special BoJack Horseman Netflix Season 4 Spirit Riding Free Netflix Season 2 Fire Chasers Netflix new docuseries The Confession Tapes Netflix new true...”


"Season 4 Versailles cheer Season 2 October 1 toy box ABC Season 2 shark tank ABC season 9 ten days in the valley ABC new series audience's wisdom CBS new series NCIS Los Angeles CBS season 9 Bob Hamburg fox Season 8 Simpsons..."
"Amazon Prime new series" active shooter America under fire "Showtime new documentary series September 30 Saturday night live NBC season 43 48 hours CBS season 30 cake boss TLC season 9 release their new docusers iyanla fix my life Season 8 Jeff Rocky Mountain medical, veterinary, animal planet..."
"TruTV season 2b in treasury go90 new drama series September 14 good things FX Season 2 Bong Appetit viceland season 2B pizza show viceland Season 2 Riviera Sundance now new drama series September 15 wangdar Netflix new drama comedy series Veggietales in the city Netflix Season 2 project..."
"PBS season 37 Christy knows America best season 5B according to Christy America's new aftereffect series big freedia bounce fuse Season 6 independent lens story YouTube new documentary series September 13 South Park comedy center season 21 from August 23 big city comedy center season 4 comedy elimination..."
"Robert Owen show syndicate Season 2 Newton's law acorn TV Season 1 Season 2 US premiere September 12 hand in hand hurricane Harvey relief ABC CBS CMT fox NBC live show Phil syndicate season 16 Mindy project Hulu Season 6 last season front line..."
"Countdown ESPN new season I am Frankie Nickelodeon new comedy series talk CBS Season 7 Judy syndication season 22 hot bench syndication season 4 who wants to be a millionaire syndication season 16 Rachael Ray syndication season 12 crime watch daily syndication Season 3 Harry syndication Season 2"
“… China Lake girl Sundays NFL countdown ESPN new season Tim Eric's bedtime story adult swimming season 2 September 11 Monday night football ESPN season 48 home family logo channel Season 6 count TLC season 4 meet with Putman TLC new screenless series Sunday NFL
"On September 9, imitating reelz's icy pace in season 2, britbox premiered in season 7 in the United States on September 10, Orville Fox's new series turned into regular time on September 21, outlander Starz's season 3 fear of walking dead AMC's season 3B draw HBO's new series top..."
“… Crime series one Mississippi Amazon golden season two season liar Sophie new abbreviation drama series MTV no plug in MTV concert series Renaissance track three with oz PBS new current affairs series break and famous reelz new docusers American weekly famous grudge reelz new docusers wild Castle Smithsonian earth new docusers... "
"Things first with Chris Carter and Nick Wright FS1 new sports talk series September 8 EIF introduces XQ super school live ABC CBS fox NBC public service special bojack Knight Netflix season 4 spirit riding free Netflix Season 2 fire chaser Netflix new docusers confession tape Netflix new reality..."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Find out when RHOA returns for Season 10.”
“So how will this crew of Southern Belles get along with NeNe back in the building?”
“Though, many fans have continued using her dramatic GIFS, memes, and one-liners in her absence.”
“She provided the utmost entertainment through her many witty quotes, comebacks, and side-eye before letting fans know that she sadly wouldn't return for season 8.”
“From the beginning of the series she was a favorite, as she never hesitated to say exactly what was on her mind.”
“With her blonde hair and dramatic personality she turned heads whenever she entered a room.”
“Fans first met the outspoken NeNe in the very first season of RHOA.”
“...she said.”
“Let the shade begin, hunni!"”
“I'm back and ready for Season 10.”


"See when RhoA will be back in season 10."
"So, how will these Southern beauties get along with Nain in the building?"
"Nevertheless, many fans continue to use her dramatic gifts, memes and a sentence from her absence."
"Before letting fans know that she's sorry she won't be back in the eighth season, she provided maximum entertainment with a lot of witty quotes, comebacks and sidelights."
"From the beginning, she was very popular, because she never hesitated to say what she thought."
"She has blonde hair, blue eyes and a bright personality. She turns her head as soon as she enters the room."
"The first time the fans saw the outspoken Nene was in Roya's first season
“…… She said
"Let the shadows begin, hooney!"
"I'm back for season 10."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The royal family’s naming practice may seem complicated, but the reason behind it is relatively simple: The royals are typically so well known that they don’t need a last name to be recognized.”
“Why doesn’t the royal family use a last name?”
“However, last names are typically only used by members of the royal family without titles, meaning Mountbatten-Windsor is pretty much never tacked onto Harry’s name.”
“Harry was born into the House of Windsor and his last name is technically Mountbatten-Windsor—as is the case for all royals who are descended from Queen Elizabeth II through the male line.”
“Henry Charles Albert David, familiarly known as Prince Harry, was born to Charles, Prince of Wales, and Diana, Princess of Wales, on Sept. 15, 1984.”
“Before we talk about Meghan, let’s first get to the bottom of what exactly Prince Harry’s last name is.”
“Jonathan Brady—PA WireWhat is Prince Harry’s last name?”
“Prince Harry looks at Meghan Markle, as she arrives accompanied by the Prince of Wales in St George's Chapel at Windsor Castle, May 19, 2018.”
“Here’s what we know about how and why the royals end up with certain names and titles.”
“But after the royal wedding, there are still other ways to refer to Meghan Markle.”


"The naming of the royal family seems complicated, but the reason behind it is relatively simple: members of the royal family are usually very famous and can be recognized without surnames."
"Why don't the royal family use surnames?"
"However, surnames are usually used only by royal family members, without titles, which means that Mountbatten Windsor is almost never pinned to Harry's name."
"Harry was born in the Windsor family. His surname is strictly montbarton Windsor. All members of the royal family are male descendants of Queen Elizabeth II."
Henry Charles Albert David, commonly known as Prince Harry, was born on September 15, 1984 in Prince Charles and Princess Diana of Wales
"Before we talk about Megan, let's find out Prince Harry's last name."
"Jonathan Brady, what's Prince Harry's last name?"
"On May 19, 2018, at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, Prince Harry watched Megan marcel, who arrived accompanied by the prince of Wales."
"Here's what we know about how and why members of the royal family have certain names and titles."
"But after the royal wedding, there are other ways to refer to Megan Marcel."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Through the great outdoors, the charity helps build resilience in vulnerable teenagers, introduces rural employment to urban youth, and brings science to life.”
“We are currently focused on tackling plastic pollution and this support will help us move towards our vision of Plastic Free Coastlines.”The Wilderness Foundation UK promotes the benefits and enjoyment of wild nature.”
“...s urban slums by providing them with a trusted network where they are supported professionally and personally to help them grow as individuals and businesswomen...”
“Donations will help us to support more people to leave homelessness behind through our housing employment education and advice services across the country and to campaign for the changes needed to solve the homelessness crisis once and for all Myna Mahila Foundation is a charity which empowers women in Mumbai...”
“Homelessness is one of the most urgent issues of our time, but at Crisis we know what it takes to end it.”
“Jon Sparkes, Chief Executive of Crisis, said: “We are hugely grateful that Prince Harry and Ms. Markle are asking the public to support Crisis as they celebrate their wedding.”
“The charity helps people directly out of homelessness, working side by side with thousands of people each year to help them rebuild their lives and leave homelessness behind for good.”
“Crisis is the national charity for homeless people.”
“All donations will make a significant difference to our programmes of work and lead to direct improvements in the lives of these young people."”
“We are a very small charity and through our work we support over 1,000 young people living with HIV.”


"Through outdoor activities, charities help vulnerable youth build resilience, introduce rural employment opportunities to urban youth, and bring science into life."
"We are currently working on plastic pollution, and this support will help us move towards the vision of a plastic free coastline." The British wilderness foundation promotes the benefits and enjoyment of wild nature
“… By providing them with a trustworthy network, they get professional and personal support there to help them grow into individuals and businesswomen... "
"Through our nationwide housing and employment education and counseling services, donations will help us to support more people to leave the homeless and to carry out the necessary change campaigns to completely solve the homelessness crisis. The myna mahila foundation is a charity that empowers women in Mumbai... "
"Homelessness is one of the most pressing issues of our time, but in times of crisis, we know how to end it."
"We are very grateful to Prince Harry and Ms. markel for asking for public support for the crisis as they celebrate their wedding," said Jon sparks, chief executive of crisis
"Charities directly help people out of the plight of homelessness and work with thousands of people every year to help them rebuild their lives and get rid of homelessness forever."
"Crisis is a national charity for the homeless."
"All donations will have a significant impact on our work programme and directly improve the lives of these young people."
"We are a very small charity, and through our work, we support more than 1000 young people living with HIV."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just last week stock for GameStop soared after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s...”
“The 24-year-old social star revealed on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about $50,000 in GameStop stocks.”
““Yellowfin were chewing today #200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort,” Connor wrote along with the photo.”
“The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica.”
“...life...”
“Someone who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal...”
“Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets.”
“...no a holes policy that he violated...”
“A few hours earlier Hailey headed Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a...”
“Hailey also stayed safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant.”


"Just last week, a group of people found out on reddit that Gamestop's share price had soared, leading to the ban of a multi billion dollar hedge fund. Read more, peloton's Cody Rigsby explains that his recent absence shows him
"The 24-year-old social star revealed in the latest podcast that he has invested about $50000 in Gamestop stock."
"Today, yellowfin tuna chews 200 hooks at the losunoso resort," Connor wrote in the photo
"Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman's 26 year old son recently shared a rare picture on instagram of him holding a big fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica."
“… Life... "
"A very famous actor and director in this industry gave me very bad advice, which helped me a lot, because I just read more about Tom Cruise's son, Connor, who posted his own rare photos on instagram. Connor Kidman cruise rarely saw him..."
"Now, the 36 year old actress and director is explaining the policy and revealing to the outside world what prompted her to adopt it in her film set."
“… There was no policy he violated... "
"A few hours ago, Haley Hyde read more and Olivia Wilde explained her ban policy on the set. As you may remember, Olivia Wilde fired Shiite rabov from the movie "don't worry, honey" last year, when there were several reports that she had a... "
"When Haley arrived at the restaurant, she was wearing a black mask and was safe."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think the audience will now be guessing what happened, and there’s more to it all than that.”
“Or was he a great guy who comforted her after he was out of the picture?”One hundred percent.”
“End of episode.”
“But it turns out that this Grandpa was actually Miguel.”
“'” Oh, Grandma was there all right, wearing her moon necklace as promised.”
“I m never going to take it off And so things returned to happy right up until the end of the episode when the doorbell at Randall s house rang and one of his children announced Grandma and Grandpa are here...”
“After Jack ambled home and Rebecca dropped a rather devastating speech about his increasingly distant role as a parent I m done letting you lower our score Jack sobered up in all senses of the word vowed to quit drinking and gave her a moon necklace to which she promised...”
“...and he noted that he was jealous of their relationship...”
“When Jack was struggling with his parental responsibilities and nursing a few too many bourbons at the local bar his best friend Miguel Castle alum Jon Huertas was right there to tell Jack to take stock of his many blessings at home especially his attractive wife whose derriere he complimented...”
“Oh, right: Our patriarch and matriarch — the loving foundation of this family — are no longer together.”


"I think the audience will now guess what happened, and it's more than that."
"Or was he a great man who comforted her when he was out? "One hundred percent."
"The end of the show."
"But it turns out that this grandfather is actually Miguel."
"Oh, Grandma had a good time there, wearing her Moon Necklace as promised."
"I'll never take it off again, so everything is back to happiness. Until the end of this episode, Randall's doorbell rings and one of his children announces that his grandparents are coming..."
"Jack came home slowly. Rebecca gave a very destructive speech about his role as a more and more distant parent. I don't want you to lower our scores any more. Jack woke up from all kinds of senses, vowed to quit drinking, and gave her a moon necklace she promised..."
“… He noticed that he was jealous of their relationship... "
"When Jack struggled for his parents' responsibility and drank too much Bourbon in the local bar, his best friend Miguel Castle Arum Jon Huertas was there to tell Jack to cherish his many happiness at home, especially his charming wife, who praised her for having a pair of delights..."
"Oh, by the way, our patriarch and matrilineal - the foundation of the family's love - are no longer together."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jay-Z also discussed his tumultuous relationship with West, saying, “he’s like a brother to me, do you get along with your family all of the time?” and his reaction to his mother, Gloria Carter, coming out as gay.”
“This music that I’m making now is a result of things that have happened earlier.”
“Letterman (who had his own cheating scandal with members of his “Late Show” staff) talked about his journey to be being a better husband, to which Jay-Z responded, “For a lot of us – especially where I grew up, and [for] men in general – we don’t have emotional cues.”
“Our cues are be a man, stand up, don’t cry … I want to be open, I want to have the emotional tools it takes to keep my family together.”
““I have a beautiful wife who’s understanding and knew that I’m not the worst of what I’ve done,” he continued.”
““And we did the hard work of going to therapy.”
“We love each other.”
“We put in the work.”
“Like you, I like to believe that we’re in a better place today, but still working, still communicating and growing.”
“We have to have tough conversations – talk about the N-word, talk about why white men are so privileged in this country.” He added that he predicts there will be a record-breaking number of voters in the next election.”


Jay also talked about his chaotic relationship with West, saying: "he's like a brother to me. Do you always get along with your family? "And his reaction to his mother, Gloria Carter, coming out as a homosexual."
"The music I'm making is the result of what happened before."
"Letterman (who had a deception scandal with his" evening show "staff) talked about how he became a better husband, and Jay-Z replied," for many of us, especially where I grew up, we don't have emotional cues for the average man. "
"Our clue is to be a man, stand up and don't cry I want to open up, I want to have the emotional tools to keep my family together. "
"I have a beautiful wife who understands me and knows I'm not the worst person I've ever been," he continued
"We've done a lot of hard work."
"We love each other."
"We put in the work."
"Like you, I like to believe that we are better off today, but still working, still communicating and growing."
"We have to have a difficult dialogue - talk about the N word, talk about why white people are so privileged in this country." He added that he predicted a record number of voters in the next election. "



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch here.”
“I told him that his legacy is going to be protected, and the gift that he gave to the music world will continue to live on forever.”Gregg Allman, Southern rock pioneer, fused country blues with San Francisco-style improvisation, creating a template for countless jam bands to come.”
“Former president Jimmy Carter, Peter Frampton, ex-wife Cher and many of Allman’s bandmates like Jaimoe, Dickey Betts and Derek Trucks were among those that attended the private ceremony at Snow’s Memorial Chapel in Macon.”
“Allman’s children Devon, Layla and Delilah Island, his niece (and Duane’s daughter) Galadrielle, his lifelong friend Chank Middleton and his manager Michael Lehmen delivered eulogies at the service.”
“As requested by Allman’s estate, mourners wore jeans to the funeral instead of suits.”
“Following the private service, hundreds of fans, many wearing Allman Brothers shirts and listening to the band’s music, lined the route along the funeral procession to nearby Rose Hill Cemetery, where Allman was buried close to Duane, who died in a 1971 motorcycle accident.”
“While the burial was also private, hundreds of fans gathered on a hill overlooking Allman’s grave while the rocker was taken to his final resting place.”
“Ironically, Allman was scheduled to perform Saturday night at Macon’s Grand Opera House before he canceled his 2017 tour plans as he battled health issues.”
“In a statement Friday, the 92-year-old Carter said he would attend Allman’s funeral to “pay his respects” to the singer.”
““Rosalynn and I were deeply saddened when we learned that Gregg Allman had passed.”


"Pay attention here."
"I told him that his legacy would be protected and that his gift to the music world would last forever." Greg Allman, a pioneer of Southern rock, combines country blues with San Francisco style improvisation to create a template for countless upcoming jam bands
Former President Jimmy Carter, Peter Frampton, his ex-wife Cher, and many of Allman's band partners, such as jemo, Dickie Bates, and Derek truck, all attended the private ceremony at the Memorial Church in meckensnow
"Olman's children, Devon, Lyra and Delilah, his niece (and Duane's daughter), Galadriel, his lifelong friend, chank Middleton, and his agent, Michael Lehman, delivered a eulogy at the ceremony."
According to olman manor, mourners wear jeans instead of suits to attend the funeral
"After the private service, hundreds of fans, many of them wearing the brothers' shirts and listening to the music of the band, lined up along the funeral procession and went to the nearby Ross Hill Cemetery. Olman was buried near Duane, who died in a motorcycle accident in 1971."
"Although the funeral was private, hundreds of fans gathered on a hill overlooking olman's grave, while the rock singer was taken to his final resting place."
"Ironically, olman was scheduled to perform at Macon's grand opera house on Saturday night, but later cancelled his 2017 tour due to health problems."
In a statement Friday, Carter, 92, said he would attend the funeral of olman to "salute" the singer
"When we learned of Greg Allman's death, Rosalyn and I were deeply saddened."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET Thursday night to see how season three kicks off.”
“Read below to see our predictions, and don't forget to tune in to ABC at 10 p.m.”
“With the way the series left off last March, there are a few key things we hope will happen throughout this season.”
“We're betting a lot.”
“But after getting to know them and their backstories a little more in depth last season, we can't wait to learn more about them and see how things will play out in season three, because how much more trouble can they get in?”
“This group of students and young lawyers have brought on just as much trouble themselves, and sometimes they are just downright stupid.”
“We also have grown to love-hate her team over the past two seasons.”
“As loyal viewers of the show, we have developed a love-hate relationship with Annalise.”
“She can be cold, calculating, manipulative, selfish, and downright heartless (and the list could go on), but it sure does make for awesome television.”
“She’s not your typical heroine in that you don’t always want to root for her.”


"We'll go up on Thursday night and see how season three starts."
"Take a look at our forecast below, and don't forget to listen to ABC at 10pm."
"According to the way the series ended in March last year, we hope that some key things will happen this season."
"We bet a lot."
"But with a deeper understanding of them and their background story last season, we can't wait to get to know them and see what happens in the third season, because how much more trouble can they get into?"
"This group of students and young lawyers themselves have caused as much trouble, and sometimes they are just plain stupid."
"In the past two seasons, we have become more and more fond of her team
"As a loyal audience of the show, we have developed a love hate relationship with annaliz."
"She may be cold, budget minded, manipulative, selfish, and downright ruthless (the list can go on), but it does make for an awe inspiring TV show."
"She's not your typical heroine, because you don't always want to support her."



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fingers crossed SJP does more of these in the future!”
“Going shoe shopping with a celebrity while giving back to the arts is something Stylish can totally get behind.”
“The good news that all proceeds from the experience go to help fund the New York City Ballet.”
“The bad news is there were only four spots available and they’re already booked.”
“It’ll be a night you won’t soon forget.”Considering a pair of her shoes retail for between $295-$545 alone, this is actually a great deal!”
“You’ll have some of the best seats in the house, plus some VIP surprises.”
“After that, I’ll send you off in your new SJP shoes to a special evening at the exquisite and incomparable New York City Ballet.”
“Next we’ll head to Forty Carrots for what some may say is the best frozen yogurt in NYC and we’ll chat about my city and why I’ve called it home for so many years.”
“As we peruse the shoe department, I’ll tell you about the line and how the city that never sleeps helped inspire it.”
““I’ll help you find the perfect pair of shoes from the SJP Collection to complete your look.”


"May SJP do more of this in the future!"
"To buy shoes with celebrities and give back art is something that fashion can leave behind."
"The good news is that all the proceeds from this experience will be used to fund the New York City Ballet."
"The bad news is that there are only four places, and they are already reserved."
"It's going to be a night you won't forget soon." Considering that a pair of her shoes retails between $295 and $545, it's actually a big deal! "
"You will have some of the best seats, plus some VIP surprises."
"After that, I'll send you to put on your new SJP shoes for a special night in the exquisite New York ballet."
"Next, we're going to 40 carrots, and some people might say that this is the best frozen yogurt in New York City, and we're going to talk about my city, why I've been calling it home for so many years."
"As we go through the footwear department, I'll tell you about this line, and how this never sleepy city has inspired it."
"I will help you find a perfect pair of shoes from SJP series to complete your look."



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WATCH: The $9 Nail Polish Queen Elizabeth Always Wears...”
“The pale pink perfectly set off the bride's three-stone engagement ring and Welsh gold wedding band, both of which are yet another special link between the bride, Princess Diana, and the Queen.”
“Royal revelers have long acknowledged Essie Ballet Slippers as the Queen's favorite hue—it's a favorite of many Southern ladies too—and now it seems the tradition is being passed on to the newest royal.”
“It seems Meghan, leaving no stone unturned, chose the Queen's favorite nail polish for her wedding day manicure.”
“There was one not-so-obvious nod to the Queen that we didn't quite catch until well after the festivities were over.”
“...to the stunning floral archway of white garden roses (Diana's favorite) that heralded Meghan's walk down the aisle, there were countless ways these two women were foremost in the celebrations.”
“From Harry receiving the Queen's royal A-OK to keep his beard for the big day (shocker!)”
“One aspect that quickly became a theme of last weekend's royal wedding was the subtle nods to two of the matriarchs in the life of the now Duke of Sussex.”
“No matter what the cause, everyone who tuned in no doubt received enough royal moments worth ogling over for years to come.”
“Of course, plenty were in it solely for a glimpse at the next adorable moments from Prince George and little sister Princess Charlotte (yep, we were part of that camp).”


"Watch: $9 nail polish queen Elizabeth always wears..."
"Light pink perfectly sets off the bride's three stone engagement ring and Welsh gold wedding ring, both of which are another special bond between Princess Diana and the queen."
"Royal revelers have long acknowledged that essey's ballet slippers are the Queen's favorite color, which is also the favorite of many southern women. Now it seems that this tradition is being passed on to the latest members of the royal family."
"It seems that Megan has chosen the Queen's favorite nail polish to make her wedding day manicure. Love is the best choice."
"There was a less obvious nod to the queen that we didn't fully understand until after the celebration."
“…… Megan walked down the aisle in the presence of the beautiful white garden rose arch (Diana's favorite), and the two women had countless ways to be the most important in the celebration
"The big day when Harry received the Queen's Royal A-OK beard (shock!)"
"One aspect that quickly became a theme at last weekend's royal wedding was the subtle nod to the two patriarchs in the life of the Duke of Sussex."
"No matter what the reason, everyone watching undoubtedly has enough Royal moments to watch in the next few years."
"Of course, there are a lot of them, just to give Prince George and his little sister, Princess Charlotte, a glimpse at the next lovely moment (yes, we are part of this camp)."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Patrick will race one more time in her professional career, at the Indy 500 in May, before retiring.”
“The party also had a unicorn theme and featured silly unicorn hats (for the women only) and a unicorn cake.”
“She’s very excited about birthdays!!!!”
“ Don’t forget to dream big for the things you want in your life!”If your’e counting, that’s a total of 14 exclamation points in one Insta post.”
“People, work, opportunities, dreams…..full heart space!”
““Super grateful for all the love around me in my life!”
“!” Patrick wrote in her Instagram caption.”
““I love getting older!!!!!!!!!!”
“Danica Patrick turned 36 on Sunday, March 25th and celebrated her birthday as all birthday’s should be celebrated, with champagne, thigh-high suede boots and Aaron Rodgers.”


"Patrick will play another game in his career, play in the Indy 500 in May and retire."
"The party also features a unicorn theme with a stupid Unicorn hat (for women only) and a unicorn cake."
"She's excited about her birthday!!"
"Don't forget to dream big about what you want in your life! "If you count, there are 14 exclamation marks in an insta post."
"People, jobs, opportunities, dreams Full of spiritual space
"Thank you so much for all the love in my life!"
"!" Patrick wrote in the title of her instagram. "
"I like getting old!!!!"
On Sunday, March 25, Danica Patrick turned 36 and celebrated her birthday with champagne, boots and Alan Rogers



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News reports.”
“Depp sued the Los Angeles-based firm run by brothers Joel Mandel and Rob Mandel for $25 million in January for fraud, negligence, for failing to file his taxes on time and for taking out high-interest loans on his behalf.”
“File Photo by Rune Hellestad/ UPI | License PhotoJohnny Depp attends the premiere of "Alice Through the Looking Glass" on May 23.”
“Depp has responded to a lawsuit filed by his ex-managers who say its his fault for losing millions.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoApril 27 (UPI) -- Johnny Depp fired back at his former managers who say in a new lawsuit that the actor is at fault for being $40 million in debt due to his extravagant spending.”
“"Why didn't they drop me as a client if I was so out of control?"”
“...the Pirates of the Caribbean star said of The Management Group when speaking with the Wall Street Journal about the lawsuit.”
“Advertisement"I've worked very, very hard for a lot of years and trusted a lot of people, some who've clearly let me down," he said.”
“In their countersuit, TMG stated through their attorney Michael Kump that Depp "lived an ultra-extravagant lifestyle that often knowingly cost Depp in excess of $2 million per month to maintain, which he simply could not afford."”
“The company is seeking $560,000 in unpaid fees and a ruling that states Depp is responsible for his current debt, E!”


"News coverage."
Depp sued the Los Angeles company of Joel Mandel and rob Mandel brothers in January for $25 million in damages for fraud, negligence, failure to file tax returns on time and handling high interest loans on his behalf
On May 23, Johnny Depp attended the premiere of Alice through the mirror
"Depp has responded to a lawsuit filed by his former manager, saying that the loss of millions is his fault."
"On April 27, Johnny Depp hit back at his former manager, who said in a new lawsuit that it was his fault that the actor was in debt of $40 million for his profligacy."
"If I'm so out of control, why don't they give up my client?"
“…… "Pirates of the Caribbean talked about the management group when they talked about the lawsuit with the Wall Street Journal
"Advertising," he said, "I worked very, very hard for many years, trusted a lot of people, and some people obviously let me down."
In their counterclaim, TMG, through their lawyer Michael Kump, said Depp "lives an extremely luxurious lifestyle, often knowingly making Depp spend more than $2 million a month to support himself, which he can't afford."
"The company is seeking $560, 000 in unpaid fees and a ruling to hold Depp responsible for his current debt, e!"



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Wood was previously tied to his Containment costar Hanna Mangan Lawrence, whom he reportedly split from in January.”
“Image zoom Credit: The Image DirectThe former couple met while playing love interests on Ryan Murphy‘s musical TV series Glee in 2012.”
“The duo reached a property settlement agreement, which they did not file with the court, TMZ first reported.”
“Instead, they told the judge that they had resolved all issues.”
“A rep for Benoist did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The 29-year-old Supergirl actress filed for divorce nearly a year ago citing irreconcilable differences and did not seek either party to give spousal support, according to documents obtained by PEOPLE.”
“The actress also requested to change her legal name back to Melissa Benoist.”
“Benoist and Jenner, who don’t have any children together, wed in spring 2015 after getting engaged in July 2013.”
““I thought she was the bomb the second I saw her, so it was just super cool to be working together,” Jenner told PEOPLE in 2014 about working with Benoist.”


"Wood had a close relationship with his partner Hanna Mangan Lawrence and it was reported that he broke up with Hanna Mangan Lawrence in January this year."
"Photo zooming credit: the first two met when they played the role of love in Ryan Murphy's 2012 music TV series glee."
TMZ first reported that "the two reached a property settlement agreement, but they did not file it with the court."
"Instead, they told the judge that they had solved all the problems."
"A representative of Benoit did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to documents obtained by people familiar with the matter, the 29 year old super actress filed for divorce nearly a year ago on the grounds of irreconcilable differences and did not seek any support from her spouse."
"The actress also asked to change her legal name back to Melissa Benoist."
"Benova and Jenna have no children together, and they got engaged in July 2013 and married in the spring of 2015."
"I thought she was a bomb as soon as I saw her, so it was really cool to work together," Jenner told people in 2014 about her partnership with benovat



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“LA back in April 2017 and revealed that they ll be having an official wedding around Christmas this year...”
“Grant continued And we technically did you know a shaman did a ceremony in front of a group of people so technically we are like pretty married we just haven t signed a document yet Grant popped the question to...”
“Now they’re clarifying those reports.”
“...quickly denied those claims...”
“So we wore the traditional outfits we had like a shaman and a medicine man do all of the blessings we re spiritually married Back in January it was rumored that Grant and LA had tied the knot but they...”
““My mom’s a Kadazan, so it’s almost like Native American of America, but she’s from the island of Borneo.”
““A tribal ceremony,” LA added.”
““Her family, a lot of them are in Malaysia, so we actually went and did a ceremony over there last December,” Grant said.”
“During an interview on Anna Faris‘ podcast, the 28-year-old The Flash star and his 30-year-old fiancee revealed that they’re basically married already.”
“Grant Gustin and LA Thoma are dishing on their upcoming wedding!”


"Los Angeles went back to April 2017 and revealed that they would have a formal wedding around Christmas this year..."
"Grant went on, technically speaking, you know a shaman made a ceremony in front of a group of people, so technically speaking, it's like we're married. We just haven't signed a document yet, and grant suddenly raised a question..."
"Now they are clarifying those reports."
“… Quickly denied those claims... "
"So we wear traditional clothes, like a wizard and a pharmacist, and do all the blessings. We get married spiritually. Back in January, there were rumors that grant and Los Angeles got married, but they..."
"My mother is a Kadazan, so she's almost Native American, but she's from Borneo."
"A tribal ritual," Los Angeles added
"A lot of her family are in Malaysia, so we went there to hold a ceremony last December," Grant said
"In an interview on Anna Faris' podcast, the 28 year old star and his 30-year-old fiancee revealed that they are basically married."
Grant Gustin and latomar are giving presents for their coming wedding



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more from the RHOC, watch the clip below!”
““That will all change in a few weeks.”
“The Real Housewives of Orange County star, 49, already opened up to Andy Cohen during Monday’s Watch What Happens Live about her recent facelift.”
“MORE: 'RHOC' Star Tamra Judge Enjoys Pool Time With Her Granddaughter Ava -- See the Cute Pic!”
“And on Wednesday, she took to Instagram to share some post-surgery photos with her fans and to explain some of the work she got done.”
““These pics were taking all within the first week,” she wrote of the images, which show her bandaged face.”
““Yes I was scared s**tless!”
“But I've seen Dr. Ambe's work on my Mom and knew I was in good hands.”
“I wanted a very natural look and it's exactly what he's known for.”Though she admitted to having staples in her face, Judge noted “there was little pain and bruising,” but that she had to stay still for two weeks after.”
“That doesn’t mean the process was without complications.”


"For more information about RhoC, please watch the following clip!"
"Everything will change in a few weeks."
"The real housewife of the Orange County Star, 49, has revealed her latest plastic surgery to Andy Cohen on Monday's" watch what happens. "
"More: 'rock' star judge Tamra enjoys swimming pool time with her granddaughter EVA - look at lovely photos!"
"On Wednesday, on instagram, she shared with her fans some photos after the surgery and explained some of the work she had done."
"These pictures were taken in the first week," she wrote, showing her bandaged face
"Yes, I was scared!"
"But I've seen Dr. Amber's operation on my mother and I know I've been helped."
"I want a very natural look, and that's what he knows." Although she admitted that she had staples on her face, the judge pointed out that "there was little pain and bruises," but she had to stay still for two weeks after the operation
"It doesn't mean there are no complications in the whole process."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementAn Emmy nom?!”
“The show has also earned her two Golden Globe nominations.”
“...https://t.co/41QM62Q8eh — Cameron Britton (@CameronBrittonH) July 12, 2018Darren CrissThis former star of Broadway and Glee received a nomination for his role as Andrew Cunanan in The Assassination of Gianni Versace: American Crime Story.”
“I feel like dancing and hugging my wife.”
“AdvertisementWow.”
“The series is based on the murders Kemper committed between the 1960’s and 70’s, including the killing of his own mother and grandparents.”
“That’s my celebration.”Cameron BrittonBritton was nominated for Outstanding Guest Actor in a Drama Series for his role as serial killer Edmund Kemper in the Netflix crime series Mindhunter.”
“I’m like, Netflix and chilling.”
“And then I’m going to bed early!”
“The actress told People she’d be celebrating her first nomination by spending some quality time with her three-year-old son: “We are going to cheers his orange juice in his sippy cup and my champagne in my champagne glass.”


"Emmy ads?"
"The show also won her two Golden Globe nominations."
“... https://t.co/41QM62Q8eh- Cameron Britton (@ Cameron Britton h) July 12, 2018 Darren Crist, star of Broadway and glee, was nominated for his role as Andrew kunanan in the assassination of Jenny Versace: the American crime story
"I want to dance and hug my wife."
"Advertising."
"The series is based on the murders that Kemper committed between the 1960s and 1970s, including the killing of his mother and grandparents."
"That's my celebration." Cameron Britton has been named best guest actor for his role as serial killer Edmund Kemper in the Netflix crime series mind hunter
"I'm like a net and a chill."
"Then I'll go to bed early!"
The actress told people that she would celebrate her first nomination by spending a good time with her three-year-old son: "we'll cheer for his orange juice in the glass he sips and my champagne in my champagne glass."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Their former nanny, Lorraine Gilles, claims that Stephen impregnated her as well, to add to the personal turmoil.”
“Stephen and Mel B found themselves at the center of a media fiasco when the abuse allegations against Belafonte came to light.”
“AdvertisementAdditionally, he asked the judge to waive his obligations to child support.”
“...for divorce in March of this year due to irreconcilable differences According to court documents as obtained by several publications Stephen responded to her claims by requesting for joint legal and physical custody of Madison...”
“First night out with my amazing daughter in eight months and I felt like God gave us a beautiful sunset to share The producer captioned the photo with Maddy loved the red to yellow to sunset color Stephen and Mel B were married for almost ten years after she filed...”
“In the video, Stephen can be heard commenting on the sunset.”
“In an Instagram post which you can see above, Stephen shared a video of he and his daughter looking at a colorful sunset together in Los Angeles.”
“Since then, Belafonte hung out with his daughter without supervision for the first time in almost a year, specifically, eight months.”
“News confirmed recently that the estranged couple reached an agreement last Thursday, which caused Mel B to withdraw her suit against her ex-husband.”
“#blessed A post shared by Stephen Belafonte (@stephenthinks11) on Nov 14, 2017 at 8:34am PSTE!”


"Their former Pauline Giles claimed that Stephen also made her pregnant, which exacerbated the personal confusion."
"When the abuse charges against Belafonte came to light, Stephen and Mel B found themselves at the center of the media fiasco."
In addition, he asked the judge to exempt him from the obligation to raise the child
“…… According to court documents obtained from several publications, Stephen divorced in March this year because of irreconcilable differences. She responded to her request for joint legal and practical custody of Madison... "
"For the first time in eight months, I went out with my daughter. I felt that God had given us a beautiful sunset. Let's share the title of the producer's photo with Maddy. We like the color from red to yellow and then to sunset. Nearly ten years after Stephen and Mel B got married, she proposed that..."
"In the video, Stephen can be heard commenting on the sunset."
In the instagram post above, Stephen shares a video of him and his daughter watching a colorful sunset in Los Angeles
"Since then, for the first time in almost a year, especially in eight months, bellafonte has been with her daughter without supervision."
"It has recently been confirmed that the separated couple reached an agreement last Thursday, which led Mel B to withdraw the prosecution against his ex husband."
"Best wishes for Stephen Belafonte (@ stephinks11) post at 8:34 am on November 14, 2017!"



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To kick things off, he decides to publicly rap about Jax’s former infidelity, in front of Brittany and the entire restaurant.”
“This season, he appears to be leaning further into his shithead persona.”
“But Monday’s premiere finds him in their apartment, making her a mayonnaise-soaked turkey sandwich.”
“Suffice it to say that the season did not end on a hopeful note for the two.”
“There was even a story line surrounding a recording of Jax admitting he would never marry Brittany.”
“Season 6 started with the revelation that Jax cheated on his girlfriend Brittany (a “----ing sweetheart, you dumb-ass motherf---er!”), and continued with his repeatedly terrible treatment of her.”
“The opening scene of Season 7 reveals the atonement of Jax Taylor.”
“Jax proves he’s still a blowhard.”
“3.”
“And now, Week 1!”


"To get off to a good start, he decided to rap publicly about Jax's previous infidelity in front of Brittany and the whole restaurant."
"This season, he seems to be more inclined to his asshole image."
"But Monday's premiere found him in their apartment, making her a turkey sandwich soaked in mayonnaise."
"It can be said that this season has not ended in a way full of hope for the two
"There's even a storyline around the recording of Jax admitting he'll never marry Brittany."
"At the beginning of season 6, Jax betrayed his girlfriend Brittany, sweetheart, you ass mother!" He continued to inflict terrible cruelty on her
"The first act of season 7 reveals the atonement of Jax Taylor."
"Jakes proved that he was still a braggart."
“3.”
"Now, the first week!"



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...for his personal consumption...”
“Among the ill considered extravagances alleged in the cross complaint Spending 75 million on 14 residences throughout the world dropping more than 18 million to buy and renovate a 150 foot yacht and spending 30 000 a month on expensive wine that Depp had flown to him around the world...”
“...per month to maintain which he simply could not afford the cross complaint read...”
“His Vices The management company subsequently filed a cross complaint accusing Depp of living an ultra extravagant lifestyle that he simply could not afford T hroughout the entire 17 year period that TMG represented Depp Depp lived an ultra extravagant lifestyle that knowingly cost Depp in excess of 2 million...”
“...whether Mr Depp actually received any income himself or not a commission that was exorbitant excessive and far outstripped the actual value of services TMG would be performing for Mr Depp Also Read Johnny Depp Sued by Ex Bodyguards Who Say They Were Forced to Protect Actor From Himself and...”
“...in theaters in November this year Depp initially sued The Management Group in January 2017 accusing his former managers of self dealing and gross misconduct Among the misdeeds that Depp who sought 25 million alleged Taking a 5 percent commission of the actor s income in some cases regardless of...”
“Following the settlement Johnny is pleased to be able to revert his full attention to his ongoing artistic endeavors notably the second leg of the sold out Hollywood Vampires global tour and the exciting launch of J K Rowling s Fantastic Beasts The Crimes of Grindelwald which will be released...”
“...reached Depp will be able to fully focus on his various projects...”
“...subsequent settlement is a further demonstration that Johnny is determined to take firm action to protect his personal and artistic reputation in the interests of his family and his career Also Read Johnny Depp Accused of Punching Film Crew Member in New Lawsuit The spokesperson added that with a settlement...”
“In a statement issued Monday a spokesperson for the actor said Johnny Depp is pleased to have achieved a settlement agreement with The Management Group following the legal action he took against the company in January 2017 The spokesperson added The lawsuit taken out against The Management Group and the...”


“… For his personal consumption... "
"Of the thoughtless extravagance alleged in the cross complaint, 75 million were spent on 14 homes around the world, 18 million on the purchase and renovation of a 150 foot yacht, and $30000 a month on expensive wine from Depp flying around the world..."
“…… Maintain a monthly cross complaint that he can't afford... "
"His vice management company subsequently filed a cross complaint, accusing Depp of living an extremely luxurious lifestyle. During the 17 years when TMG represented Depp, he could not afford it. Depp lived an extremely luxurious lifestyle and knowingly made Depp lose more than 2 million...."
“…… Regardless of whether Mr. Depp actually received any income, an excessive Commission far exceeded the actual value of TMG's services to Mr. Depp. The former bodyguard accused Johnny Depp of saying that they were forced to protect the actors from themselves, and that... "
“…… At the cinema in November this year, Depp initially sued the management group in January 2017, accusing its former manager of self dealing and serious misconduct, in which Depp sought $25 million and claimed to charge 5% commission on the actor's income in some cases, regardless of... "
"After the reconciliation, Johnny is happy to be able to refocus all his attention on his ongoing artistic activities, especially the second stop of the Hollywood vampire world tour and the exciting press conference of J.K. Rowling's the crime of the monster Greenwald, which will be released..."
“… Depp will be able to fully focus on his various projects... "
“…… The subsequent reconciliation further demonstrated Johnny's determination to take firm action to protect his personal and artistic reputation in order to safeguard the interests of his family and career. Johnny Depp has been charged with beating members of the film crew in a new lawsuit. The spokesman added that through the settlement... "
"In a statement released on Monday, a spokesman for the actor said Johnny Depp was pleased to reach a settlement with management after taking legal action against the company in January 2017. The spokesman added that to management and



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more exclusive content, sign up for our In Touch newsletter!”
“We can only hope to learn more about what happened during the upcoming three-part reunion.”
““He has shown recently that he has zero interest in maturing and treating his friends with respect, so like most people around him currently I have washed my hands of his toxic behavior and want nothing to do with him,” Logan shared.”
“Today, they keep things civil when they run into each other, though it doesn’t sound like we’ll be seeing these two getting drinks together anytime soon.”
““Once I did the phone call, I decided to leave the show for a while because I wanted to have everything die down a little.”The former friends were able to patch things up around production time, though their relationship grew tense again once Season 6 started airing on television.”
““My drunken talk with Brittany’s sister happened off camera and I never intended to make things more dramatic on camera,” Logan continued.”
“...time to step back...”
“But after Logan sparked hookup speculation James called the art director on speakerphone with the cameras rolling to shut down the rumors immediately Since James was displeased with his pal and his cast members had varying opinions on whether or not the hookup even took place Logan decided it was...”
“...spend more time together...”
“We basically spent every day together for the next four years and have been best friends ever since Things started to change when Logan was asked to film for the Bravo reality series James was a part of thinking it would be a fun experience and allow the two to...”


"For more exclusive content, please sign up for our in touch newsletter!"
"We can only hope to learn more about what happened during the upcoming reunion of the three."
"He recently showed no interest in being mature and respectful to his friends, so like most of the people around him, I now wash my hands of his toxic behavior and don't want to have anything to do with him," Logan shared
"Today, they are polite when they meet, although it sounds like we won't see the two drinking together soon."
"Once I called and I decided to leave for a while because I wanted to calm everything down." Former friends were able to patch things up during production time, even though their relationship became tense again after season 6 began on TV
"My drunken conversation with Brittany's sister took place off camera, and I never intended to make things more dramatic off camera," Logan continued
“… It's time to step back... "
"But after Logan caused the speculation of collusion, James called the art director with a megaphone and a video camera and immediately closed the rumor, because James was very dissatisfied with his friends and his actors had different opinions on whether the collusion happened. Logan decided to..."
“… Spend more time together... "
"For the next four years, we were together almost every day. Since logan was invited to shoot for the Bravo reality series, we became best friends. James thought it would be an interesting experience for the two of us to..."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(See CNSP stock analysis on TipRanks) aTyr Pharma (LIFE) The next stock we’re looking at, aTyr Pharma, has a focus on inflammatory disease.”
“Given the $8.33 average price target, shares could climb ~275% in the year ahead.”
“Both tickers boast a Strong Buy consensus rating and could climb over 200% higher in the year ahead.”
“Bearing this in mind, we used TipRanks’ database to find two compelling penny stocks, according to Wall Street analysts.”
“These experts bring in-depth knowledge of the industries they cover and substantial experience to the table.”
“By taking a cue from the analyst community.”
“So, how should investors approach a potential penny stock investment?”
“The risk involved with these plays scares off the faint hearted as very real problems like weak fundamentals or overwhelming headwinds could be masked by the low share prices.”
“And if you are prone to look at high-risk, small- to mid-cap stocks, you’ll find yourself drawn to penny stocks.”
““We stick to our view that 2021 will be a stockpicker’s paradise with big money-making opportunities if you are willing to go against the grain… Many macro indicators did fall in January but SMid-Caps and equities in general continued to edge higher,” Lecubarr noted.”


"(see CNSP's stock analysis of tipranks) atyr Pharma (life) our next stock focus atyr Pharma focuses on inflammatory diseases."
"Given the average target price of $8.33, the share price is likely to rise by about 275% over the next year."
"Both companies have strong buy consensus ratings and are likely to rise more than 200% in the next year."
"With that in mind, according to Wall Street analysts, we used the tipranks database to find two compelling low-priced stocks."
"These experts bring in-depth knowledge and experience in the industries they cover."
"Get clues from the analytical world."
"So, how should investors deal with potential low price stocks?"
"The risks involved in these games scare the cowards away, because low share prices can mask very real problems such as weak fundamentals or overwhelming disadvantages."
"If you tend to look at high-risk small and medium cap stocks, you will find yourself attracted by low price stocks."
"We insist on our view that 2021 will be a paradise for stock selection. If you are willing to go up against the trend, there will be a lot of opportunities to make money Many macro indicators did fall in January, but the SMID cap and stocks as a whole continued to rise slightly, "lecubarr said



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“But actually I immediately checked myself.”
“Curry spent 15 years with NBC’s morning show, and from 2011 to 2012 she served as co-anchor alongside Matt Lauer.”
“Her tearful on-air announcement that she was leaving is remembered as a landmark moment in morning show television.”
“NBC has long said the decision was based on ratings, and the network declined to comment on Wednesday.”
“But fans and journalists like then-New York Times media critic Brian Stelter, who detailed the tension between Lauer and Curry in his 2013 book “Top of the Morning,” believe Lauer had something to do with her departure.”
“In an interview on CBS This Morning on Wednesday co anchor Gayle King said to Curry It was viewed that a very powerful man meaning Matt Lauer derailed your career Curry after joking Don t worry I m not going to start crying responded You should ask someone else I”
“...m not the one to ask about that I don t know what was all behind it...”
“I do know that it hurt like hell.”Asked if she thought Lauer – who was fired in November over claims of sexual misconduct – abused his power, Curry said, “I’m trying to do no harm in these conversations.”
“I can tell you that I am not surprised by the allegations.”When King asked Curry whether she “heard things” or “knew things” while she was at NBC, Curry responded: “I’m trying not to hurt people and I know what it’s like to be publicly humiliated.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"But in fact I checked myself right away."
"Curry was on NBC's morning show for 15 years, from 2011 to 2012, as co anchor with Matt Raul."
"She announced tearfully on the radio that she was leaving, which was a milestone in the morning TV show."
"NBC has long said the decision was based on ratings, and the station declined to comment on Wednesday."
"But fans and journalists, such as the then New York Times media critic Brian Stelter, who detailed the tension between Raul and curry in his 2013 Book top of the morning, believe Raul is related to her departure."
"On Wednesday morning, in an interview with CBS, CO anchor Gail king told curry that some people think that a very powerful person means that Matt Raul has ruined your career. Curry replied after joking," don't worry. I won't cry. You should ask someone else. I will cry. "
“… I'm not the one to ask. I don't know what's behind this... "
Asked if he thought Raul abused his power, curry said: "I'm trying not to hurt in these conversations."
"I can tell you that I am not surprised by the charges." When King asked curry whether he "heard" or "knew" when he was at NBC, curry replied, "I try not to hurt others. I know what it's like to be humiliated in public."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Slimmed-Down Jonah Hill Looks Fit and Trim for a Casual Stroll in New York City This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“See his incredible transformation in the video below.”
“The 33-year-old actor has been working hard at his fitness, and is frequently spotted stepping out of the gym.”
“RELATED: Jonah Hill Looks More Fit Than Ever Walking in NYC: PicAnother celeb who recently stepped out looking more fit than before is Jonah Hill.”
“"That feeling when you lose so much weight you drop a shirt size so all your friends send you new t-shirts," he captioned one pic.”
“The Food Network star has been documenting his weight loss on social media, updating his followers on his progress and workouts.”
“It's been three months and I feel like these are photos of two different people," Goldman, 42, wrote alongside a side-by-side comparison of his former self and what he looks like now.”
“RELATED: Janet Jackson Shows Off 50-Pound Weight Loss as She Reunites With Ex Wissam Al Mana in Court"Wow.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Slim Jonah hill looks like it's suitable for a casual walk in New York City. This video is not available because we can't load information from sponsors."
"You can see his incredible transformation in the video below."
"The 33 year old actor has been working hard and is often found out of the gym."
"Related reports: Jonah hill looks healthier than ever walking in New York: another celebrity who recently went out and looks healthier than ever is Jonah hill."
"When you lose so much weight, you lose the size of a shirt, so all your friends will give you a new T-shirt," he wrote in the title of one picture
"The food network star has been recording his weight loss process on social media, updating his weight loss progress and exercise plan to fans."
"It's been three months, and I think it's a picture of two different people," Goldman, 42, wrote as he compared himself to what he was
Related story: Janet Jackson showed in court that she lost 50 pounds when reunited with former vissam al mana



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He doesn’t really listen to it that often.”The Voice coaches, who began dating in November 2015, often gush about one another and recently revealed that they’ve both thought about marriage.”
“I thought you were like a rock/ska girl.’ He didn’t even know what ska is!”She added: “I did make him a ska-like reggae playlist for Valentine’s a couple years ago.”
““When I was like, ‘Yeah, Bread is one of my favorite groups ever,’ he’d be, like, ‘What?!”
“That’s so gross!”The “Rich Girl” songstress also said that she shares a love for yacht rock ‘70s love songs with her country singer beau, and that he was impressed when she revealed one of her favorite groups.”
“Find out what she looks like and plaster her face all over your room.”She laughed and said: “Oh, my God.”
“I hope Blake isn’t watching so you can surprise him.”
““You know what you oughta do?”
“Then he gave the singer an idea for a prank.”
““So that’s kind of weird, right?”“That’s really weird,” Kimmel, 50, said.”
““He did tell me that he dated a girl for, like, three months that had my face plastered over her whole bedroom,” she dished.”


"He doesn't listen that often." The voice coach who started dating in November 2015 often talked about each other and recently revealed that they all wanted to get married
"I thought you were like a rock'n'roll / skarn girl." He didn't even know what ska was! She added: "a few years ago, I did make a Valentine's Day reggae music play list similar to ska for him."
"When I say, 'yes, bread is one of my favorite combinations,' he says, 'what?!"
"How disgusting! The "rich girl" singer also said that she shared her love for yacht rock '70s love songs with her country singer Bo, who was impressed when she revealed one of her favorite bands
"See what she looks like and fill your room with her face." "Oh, my God," she said with a smile
"I hope Blake is not watching, so you can surprise him."
"Do you know what you should do?"
"Then he gave the singer a prank idea."
"So it's kind of strange, isn't it?"? "It's really strange," said Kimmel, 50
"He did tell me that he was dating a girl, and about, three months later, my face was all over her bedroom," she said



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read More: Christina Aguilera Net Worth...”
“Christina El Moussa and her ex-husband Tarek El Moussa decided to file for divorce and they legally got separated in January 2018.”
“$12 MillionHow did Christina El Moussa earn her money and wealth?”
“Christina Meursinge El Moussa was born on July 9th, 1983 and brought up in California.”
“She attended school in the southern part of California.”
“Soon after she was done with her college, she joined the real estate scene where she met her co-host, ex-husband and husband, who is none other than Tarek El Moussa.”
“As of 2018, Christina El Moussa’s net worth is $4 million.”
“Soon, the couple opened their own real estate agency: Tarek and Christina: The El Moussa Group.”
“After their split, the agency is now Tarek and Associates with only Tarek El Moussa involved in it.”
“Their real estate business began to suffer losses when the real estate market crashed in October 2008.”


"Read more: Christina Aguilera's net worth..."
"Christina Moussa and her ex husband Tariq Moussa decided to divorce, and they legally separated in January 2018."
"How did Christina al Moussa make money and fortune for 12 million dollars?"
Christina mosinger Moussa was born on July 9, 1983 and grew up in California
"She goes to school in Southern California."
"Shortly after graduating from college, she joined the real estate industry, where she met her co host, her ex husband and her husband, Tariq Moussa."
"As of 2018, Christina Moussa's net assets were $4 million."
"Soon, the couple started their own real estate agency: Tariq and Christina: elmosa group."
"After they broke up, the agency is now Tariq, and only Tariq Moussa is involved."
"When the real estate market collapsed in October 2008, their real estate business began to lose money."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can see the shock and awe that results from these encounters in the footage above.”
“But these viewers are in for another twist, as This Is Us stars Milo Ventimiglia, Mandy Moore, Sterling K. Brown, and Metz surprise them mid-testimonial.”
“(For example, one named her daughter after Chrissy Metz’s Kate.)”
“On Monday, NBC has released its first teaser in anticipation of season 2 — there’s no new footage, as production on the new episodes hasn’t begun — and in the emotionally charged spot, real-life fans gush about the impact that the Pearson clan has had on them.”
“The facts — and oodles of social media comments — also have shown that this high-octane family dramedy has deeply affected fans, to the point of tears.”
“It is indisputable that This Is Us left its mark the TV landscape this past season, emerging as broadcast TV’s big new breakout.”


"You can see the shock and awe of these encounters from the above lens."
"But there's another turning point for these audiences, because it's a surprise from American stars Milo wendimilia, Mandy Moore, Stirling K. brown and Metz at the awards ceremony."
(for example, someone named her daughter after Chris Metz's Kate.)
"On Monday, NBC released its first trailer, the second season Trailer - there's no new footage because the production of the new series hasn't started yet - and in the emotional scene, real-life fans talk endlessly about the influence of the Pearson family on them."
"Facts and a large number of social media comments also show that the high octane family, delamedy, has deeply influenced the fans and shed tears."
"It's indisputable that this is the mark we left in the TV pattern of the past quarter, which has become a new breakthrough for radio and television."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“On Thursday, the Oscar winner shared a series of photos on Instagram that seemed to show that the Grazia magazine had retouched her image and removed her ponytail.”
“Upon seeing the cover photo, Nyong'o spoke out against the publication in a lengthy caption.”
“As I have made clear so often in the past with every fiber of my being I embrace my natural heritage and despite having grown up thinking light skin and straight silky hair were the standards of beauty I now know that my dark skin and kinky coily hair are...”
“...beautiful too she began...”
“"Being featured on the cover of a magazine fulfills me as it is an opportunity to show other dark, kinky-haired people, and particularly our children, that they are beautiful just the way they are."”
“WATCH: Lupita Nyong'o Breaks Down in Tears During Intense Promo for JAY-Z's '4:44' AlbumThe 34-year-old actress goes on to slam Grazia for photoshopping the image without asking her permission.”
“"I am disappointed that @graziauk invited me to be on their cover and then edited out and smoothed my hair to fit their notion of what beautiful hair looks like," she continued.”
“"Had I been consulted, I would have explained that I cannot support or condone the omission of what is my native heritage."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"On Thursday, the Oscar winner shared a series of photos on instagram, which seemed to show that Grazia magazine had embellished her image and removed her ponytail."
"After seeing the cover photo, nyong'o spoke out against publication with a lengthy title."
"As I used to show with every fiber I have, I embrace my natural heritage. Although I grew up believing that light skin and silky straight hair were the standards of beauty, I now know that my dark skin and twisted curly hair are..."
“… It's beautiful, too, and she's starting to
"It's satisfying to be on the cover because it's an opportunity to show other people with dark hair, especially our children, their beauty."
"Watch: Lupita ningo is in tears during the intense promotion of Jay-Z'4:44 'album. The 34 year old actress is furious that she took pictures without Grazia's permission."
"I'm disappointed, @ graziauk invited me to be on their cover, and then cut and smoothed my hair to match their view of beautiful hair," she continued
"If I was asked, I would explain that I cannot support or tolerate the omission of my native heritage."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““And now we get to have a voice and say listen, ‘this is the world that we live in, we’re telling this story for the lost, the last, the least, the left behind, the looked over.’ That’s who we’re telling this story for,” Brooks said.”
“Poussey’s death is seen as an allegory for the Black Lives Matter movement, as well as the challenges black Americans face on a daily basis.”
“Brooks also took her grief to Twitter in a touching post featuring herself and Wiley.”
“But this is not something I can do over and over again,'” Brooks said.”
“Yes, I’m trained as an actor, I went to school for this and all of that.”
““I remember talking to [Weiner] and saying, ‘I have to be honest, I can’t do this over and over again.”
“Danielle Brooks (Taystee on OITNB and Wiley’s on- and off-screen best friend) discussed the difficulties of filming Poussey’s tragic death.”
““We lose this person who is really an innocent, at the hands of an innocent, there’s a double tragedy there,” Weiner said.”
“Matthew Weiner, who directed the episode, expressed Poussey’s impact in an interview last week.”
““Because people are so invested in this show, and some of these things will happen to characters that they have, over the past four years, gotten to know and love, it makes it so personal,” she said.”


"Now we have a voice to say," this is the world we live in. We are telling this story for the lost, the last, the least important, the left, the visited, "Brooks said That's who we're telling the story for. "
"Pucci's death is regarded as a fable of black life and material movement, and a daily challenge for black Americans."
"Brooks also tweeted a touching post about himself and Willie."
"But it's not something I can do over and over again," Brooks said
"Yes, I was trained as an actor, and I went to school for that."
"I remember talking to [Weiner] and saying I had to be honest and I couldn't do it over and over again."
"Danielle Brooks (taystee on oitnb and Willie's on-screen and on-screen friends) discussed the difficulty of filming pussy's tragic death."
"We lost a truly innocent person in the hands of an innocent person, which is a double tragedy," Weiner said
"Matthew Weiner, who directed the episode, expressed pussy's influence in an interview last week."
"It's very personal because people put so much into the show, and some of these things happen to the characters they've known and loved in the past four years," she said



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
““I am devastated by any reason I may have given to anyone to say or think of me in the ways that are currently being described.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“...mogul of groping her in an elevator an accusation which Simmons has denied...”
““He grabbed my ass in an elevator, he was just a pig.”
“I haven’t told anybody about that before.”
“I was grossed out.”
“I was like, ‘How dare you,’ ” the Real Housewives of New York City star, 52, told The Daily Beast, according to an interview published on Friday.”
“(A rep for de Lesseps did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.)”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““He invaded me, he took advantage of me, being who he is, thinking he is all ‘it,’ all everything.”


"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"I'm exhausted by any reason I give anyone to talk about or think about me in the way they're being described." Want to keep up with the latest news from people? "
“…… Touching her tycoon in the elevator -- the accusation Simmons denied... "
"He grabbed my ass in the elevator. He's just a pig."
"I haven't told anyone before."
"I'm sick to the core."
"I thought 'How dare you'," the 52 year old star housewife of New York City told the Daily Beast, according to an interview published on Friday
"A representative of de Lesseps did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"He invades me, uses me, becomes himself, thinks that he is' it ', everything."



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You are the light of my life.” She added the hashtags, “#Supernatural #HappyBirthday #RocnRoe.””
“!’ I love you both more each day.”
“Somebody stop the time from flying by.”Carey added alongside her own throwback: “I can’t believe it’s been six years since you two came into this world to the live version of Fantasy.. ‘the applause!!”
“Cannon shared a throwback snap of Monroe and Moroccan as newborns with the caption: “Seems like I just took this picture the other day!!”
“The proud parents marked the happy occasion by posting a couple of Instagram photos in honor of their twins.”
“The twins also celebrated with their own decadent-looking Mickey and Minnie Mouse-themed cakes.”
“The exes, who split in 2014, went on a bevy of rides with their mini-mes, including the Matterhorn Bobsleds.”
“Mariah Carey and Nick Cannon reunited on Sunday, April 30, to celebrate their twins Monroe and Moroccan’s 6th birthday at Disneyland in Anaheim, California.”
“#DemBabies are growing up so quickly!”


"You are the light of my life." She added a label, "supernatural, happy birthday, Rocko."
"!" I love you more every day. "
"Someone stopped time from flying." Kelly added next to her memoir: "I can't believe you two have been in this world for six years now to see a real-life fantasy.".. "Applause!"
Cannon shared a retrospective snapshot of Monroe and Moroccan newborns with the title: "it's like I just took this picture the other day!"
"The proud parents commemorated this happy moment by posting pictures on instagram to commemorate their twins."
"The twins also celebrated with their decadent Mickey and Minnie Mouse themed cake."
"Ex girlfriends who broke up in 2014 took their mini bikes for a ride, including Matterhorn sleigh."
Maria Carey and Nick Cannon gather at Disneyland in Anaheim, California, Sunday, April 30, to celebrate the sixth birthday of their twin Monroe and Moroccan
"Dembebies is growing too fast!"



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pic.twitter.com/UH8c6SPpMx — emma freud   (@emmafreud) March 4, 2017This content is imported from Twitter.”
“Can't show you who is filming #rednosedayactually today but here is the unexpectedly coordinated crew.”
“#rednosedayactually pic.twitter.com/TT0pZB5p2P — emma freud   (@emmafreud) March 5, 2017In other tweets, Freud also gave fans a little look at Bill Nighy's return as Billy Mack.”
“The PM, his wife and the writer who never worked out a good camera face.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“#rednosedayactually pic.twitter.com/MGtUVDGiBE — emma freud   (@emmafreud) March 5, 2017This content is imported from Twitter.”
“And she's still lovely.”
“Our pm is still married.”
“#rednosedayactually pic.twitter.com/yydy1Nc1l0 — emma freud   (@emmafreud) March 5, 2017This content is imported from Twitter.”


“... pic.twitter.com/UH8c6SPpMx -Emma Freud (@ emmafreud) March 4, 2017 this content was imported from twitter. "
"I can't tell you who's shooting red nose day today, but here's the unexpected coordination team."
"Red nose" pic.twitter.com/TT0pZB5p2P -Emma Freud (@ emmafreud) on other tweets on March 5, 2017, Freud also showed fans the return of bill night to Billy Mack. "
"The prime minister, his wife, and a writer who has never designed a good camera face."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Red nose" pic.twitter.com/MGtUVDGiBE -Emma Freud (@ emmafreud) March 5, 2017 this content was imported from twitter. "
"She's still lovely."
"Our prime minister is still married."
"Red nose" pic.twitter.com/yydy1Nc1l0 -Emma Freud (@ emmafreud) March 5, 2017 this content was imported from twitter. "



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Jennifer’s actions are solely taken in the best interest of their son,” her rep said in a statement regarding Hudson’s request for a protective order, which gives Hudson possession of their residence and orders him to stay away from her and their son.”
“PEOPLE confirmed exclusively Thursday night Otunga and Hudson have ended their relationship after 10 years together.”
“Hudson’s former brother-in-law William Balfour was convicted of the murders in 2012.”
“Her 7-year-old nephew Julian King was found dead in the backseat of a car.”
“Image zoom Credit: Kevin Mazur/WireImageAbout a month after becoming engaged in Sept. 2008, Hudson’s mother, Darnell Donerson, and her brother Jason Hudson were found fatally shot in a Chicago home.”
““I believe that he left it out to taunt, intimidate and frighten me, which he absolutely accomplished,” she reportedly claims in the papers.”
“The Voice coach also says the retired wrestler occasionally left a gun and holster — which he said was a movie prop — on their kitchen counter to intimidate her.”
“The Oscar winner claims David Jr., a makeup artist and an assistant were all present during the incident.”
“After she arrived home that day, Hudson says Otunga was “visibly” angry and grabbed their son by the hand and pushed Hudson out of their master bedroom.”
“Image zoom Credit: Jason LaVeris/FilmMagicHudson also reportedly claims in the legal docs Otunga believes she is dating one of her producers, but she denies she is involved with anyone new.”


"Jennifer's actions are entirely in the best interests of their son," her representative said in a statement, referring to Hudson's claim for a protection order, which gives Hudson possession of their home and orders him to stay away from her and their son
"People exclusively confirmed on Thursday night that ortunga and Hudson ended their relationship after 10 years together."
"William Balfour, Hudson's former brother-in-law, was convicted of murder in 2012."
"Her seven year old nephew Julian king was found dead in the back of the car."
"Credit for image zooming: one month after Kevin mazul's engagement in September 2008, Hudson's mother, Danielle donison, and her brother, Jason Hudson, were found shot dead in their Chicago home."
According to reports, she claimed in the newspaper: "I believe he was trying to mock, intimidate and frighten me, which he absolutely did."
"The voice coach also said that the retired wrestler occasionally put a gun and a leather case on the kitchen counter to intimidate her, saying it was a movie prop."
Oscar winner claimed that during the incident, makeup artist David and an assistant were present
"When she got home that day, Hudson said ortuga was" obviously "angry and grabbed their son's hand and pushed Hudson out of their master bedroom."
"Credit for image zooming: Jason laveris / film magic Hudson also claimed in legal documents that ortuga thought she was dating a producer, but she denied that she had anything to do with any new person."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Yet.”
“Heard and Musk were first reported as dating in 2016, but didn't make things Instagram official until April 2017.”
“People reports that the actress and aspirant space cowboy have split, just after they were spotted together in Chile over winter break.”
“"Elon decided it was time to end it and Amber agreed," a source told the outlet.”
“"They both still care deeply for each other but the timing wasn't right."”
“Sound familiar?”
“It should.”
“When Heard and Musk broke up in August, sources said that their schedules just weren't clicking.”
“"The timing wasn't good for them," a source told US Weekly at the time.”
“"He's super busy and works all the time.”


"Not yet."
"Hart and musk were first reported dating in 2016, but instagram wasn't officially released until April 2017."
"It's reported that the actress and the ambitious space cowboy broke up just after they were found together during the Chilean winter vacation."
"Elon decided it was time to end, amber agreed," a source told the media
"They all care about each other, but the timing is not right."
"Does that sound familiar?"
"It should be."
"When Hurd and musk broke up in August, the source said their schedule wasn't going well."
"It's not a good time for them," a source told us at the time
"He's super busy, working all the time."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#SuperBowl2018.””
“On Saturday she posted an Instagram photo of herself “Trying to practice the flu away.”Pink wrote she’d “been waiting to sing [the national anthem at the Super Bowl] since 1991 when I saw my idol, Whitney Houston, own this song” but unfortunately got sick.”
“The singer is known for being outspoken and was no less so after a Twitter user criticized her performance.”
“A user known as @King_Sullivan tweeted, “If I’ve said it once, I’ve said it 1000 times.”
“Pink sucks and if you like her singing you’re dumb #SuperBowl.” Pink clapped back.”
“If I’ve said it once, I’ve said it 1000 times.”
“Pink sucks and if you like her singing you’re dumb #SuperBowl — Simp Bizkit (@King_Sullivan) February 4, 2018“Yeah but altleast I suck while singing our countries national anthem, and you just suck by yourself on a dirty couch,” Pink tweeted.”
“Yeah but altleast I suck while singing our countries national anthem, and you just suck by yourself on a dirty couch.”
“#winning https://t.co/SfLQr9hVTq — P!nk (@Pink) February 5, 2018Pink is a native of Philadelphia and was majorly stoked to be performing at Super Bowl LII between the Philadelphia Eagles and the New England Patriots (not to mention that the Eagles went on to win).”
“But unfortunately she was felled by the flu just prior to her performance.”


"Super bowling 2018."
On Saturday, she posted a picture of herself "trying to practice flu" on instagram. Pinker wrote that since I saw my idol Whitney Houston own the song in 1991, she "has been waiting to sing (the National Anthem of the Super Bowl)" But unfortunately, she was ill
"The singer is known for her outspokenness, as she was after a twitter user criticized her performance."
One is @ king_ Sullivan users tweeted, "if I said it once, I said it 1000 times."
"Pink is bad. If you like her singing, you're stupid. Super Bowl." Pink clapped back
"If I said it once, I said it 1000 times."
"Pink sucks, if you like her singing, you're stupid # Super Bowl - simp Bizkit (@ king ψ u Sullivan) February 4, 2018" yes, but at least I sucks when I sing our national anthem, and you just suck on the dirty sofa, "pink tweeted
"Yes, but at least I suck when I'm singing the national anthem, and you suck on the dirty sofa alone."
"Win https://t.co/SfLQr9hVTq-P ！ Pink (@ pink) February 5, 2018 pink is a Philadelphia native who performed well in the Super Bowl LII between the Philadelphia Eagles and the New England Patriots (let alone the eagles won the game)
"But unfortunately, she was knocked down by the flu before the show."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m just a nice Jewish kid ... who loves movies and pretty girls.”Jaime Ray Newman in 2014.”
“Sometimes, in enumerating his lack of vices, Ratner also points out his love of beautiful women, saying, for example, in a 2008 Jewish Journal story: “I’m not into dark stuff.”
““Furthermore, no woman has ever requested or received any financial settlement from my client.”It feels as if I keep going up against the same bully at school who just won’t quit.”
““I have represented Mr. Ratner for two decades, and no woman has ever made a claim against him for sexual misconduct or sexual harassment,” Singer said in a 10-page letter to The Times.”
“On Ratner’s behalf, Singer “categorically” disputed their accounts.”
“As is often the case, none of the women reported the allegations to the police.”
“In interviews with the Los Angeles Times, Henstridge and five other women accused Ratner of a range of sexual harassment and misconduct that allegedly took place in private homes, on movie sets or at industry events.”
“...sexual misconduct at the hands of producer Harvey Weinstein director James Toback and numerous other powerful men Henstridge decided she would no longer remain silent...”
“...powerful players directing producing or financing dozens of today s biggest box office hits including Rush Hour X Men The Last Stand The Revenant and Horrible Bosses ALSO Warner Bros cuts ties with Brett Ratner s company As hundreds of women have come forward in recent weeks with allegations of...”
“Since that incident in the early 1990s Henstridge has found success as an actress starring in the films Species and The Whole Nine Yards But she said she has carried the memory of the run in with her and watched from afar as Ratner became one of Hollywood s most...”


"I'm just a good Jewish child... People who like movies and beautiful girls
Sometimes, when citing his lack of bad habits, Ratner also points out his love for beautiful women. For example, in a 2008 Jewish Journal article, he said, "I don't like dark things."
"Moreover, no woman has ever asked or received any financial compensation from my client." It felt like I was constantly meeting the same bully at school, and she just refused to quit
In a 10 page letter to the times, Singh said: "it has been 20 years since I represented Mr. Ratner, and no woman has ever filed a claim against him for sexual misconduct or harassment."
Singh on behalf of Ratner "categorically" refuted their claims
"As usual, none of the women reported the charges to the police."
In an interview with the Los Angeles Times, henstridge and five other women accused Ratner of a series of sexual harassment and misconduct in private homes, film sets or industry activities
“…… The sexual misconduct of producer Harvey Weinstein, director James Toback and many other powerful men, henstridge decided that she would not keep silent any more... "
“…… Powerful actors and directors have produced or funded dozens of today's most popular movies, including the last stop of "rush hour X-Men," the avenger, and "the terrible boss." Warner Bros. has also cut off contact with Brett Ratner because hundreds of women have come forward to accuse in recent weeks. "
"Since the incident in the early 1990s, henstridge has played a successful actress in species and size nine, but she said that she has been watching Ratner become one of the most influential actors in Hollywood from a distance with the memory of running in..."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“FLASHBACK: Hugh Hefner Was Never Afraid of Getting Old or Dying This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Take a look back at Hefner's life in the video below.”
“Other celebrities who were laid to rest in the cemetery include Farrah Fawcett, Zsa Zsa Gabor, Florence Henderson, Dean Martin, Bettie Page and Playmate Dorothy Stratten.”
“In 1992, Hefner purchased the crypt next to Marilyn Monroe for $75,000.”
“...month...”
“Playboy RELATED Jared Leto to Play Hugh Hefner in Upcoming Biopic The magazine mogul died peacefully at his home at the age of 91 and was laid to rest in a private ceremony attended by his wife Crystal and children at Los Angeles Westwood Village Memorial Park Cemetery earlier this...”
“Hefner will also be honored in a forthcoming 100-plus page special tribute.”
“The rest of the magazine includes interviews with Chelsea Handler, James Corden and a piece by Hefner's son, Cooper.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Flashback: Hugh Hefner is never afraid of getting old or dying. This video is not available because we can't load sponsor information."
"Take a look at Hefner's life in the video below."
Other celebrities buried in the cemetery include Farah Fossett, zazagabo, Florence Henderson, Dean Martin, Betty Page and playmate Dorothy stratten
In 1992, Hefner bought the cellar next to Marilyn Monroe for $75000
“… Month... "
"Playboy related Jared Leto will play Hugh Hefner in the upcoming biographical film magazine tycoon. At the age of 91, he was buried at a private ceremony at the Westwood village Memorial Park Cemetery in Los Angeles, where his wife Christo and children attended the ceremony..."
"Hefner will also be honored in the upcoming 100 plus pages of special mourning."
"The rest of the magazine includes interviews with chercy handler and James cordon, as well as an article by Hefner's son Cooper."



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Keep the conversation going in the comments section below.”
“Check out the Season 3 trailer below While the show s 30th anniversary stole the show the Season 3 trailer did offer up a few additional details about what s to come this season including a new do for Jimmy new boy problems for Ramona a Hamilton reference more outrageously...”
“Beware Full House fans, the Season 3 Fuller House trailer is about to hit you right in the feels!”
“This fall, Full house will celebrate its 30th anniversary and Netflix’s continuation series Fuller House is set to pull out all the stops in celebration of the major milestone set to take place on the date Season 3 officially drops on Friday, September 22!”
“As the Season 3 trailer opens, D.J., Stephanie and Kimmy have a reflective moment in the Tanner family living room as D.J.”
“...realizes that it’s been 30 years since Jesse and Joey first arrived and they became a family under one roof.”
“Suddenly there s a ring at the door though we re not sure why anyone rings or knocks after 30 years of being reminded the door s always open which cues up the returns of Jesse Joey and Danny who recreate their entrances from the original 1987 Full House pilot...”
“...right down to the outfits they were wearing when they entered the Tanner home...”
“...fun Gibbler looks and a Fourth of July episode...”
“What are looking forward to seeing in the first half of the show’s third season and what moment from the trailer left you wanting more?”


"Continue the conversation in the comments section below."
"Take a look at the following season 3 Trailer. Although the 30th anniversary of the show stole the show's limelight, the season 3 Trailer does provide some additional details about what's going to happen this season, including Jimmy's new approach, Ramona's new boy problem, and Hamilton's reference is more outrageous..."
"Watch out for the fans, the season 3 fuller house trailer is coming soon!"
"This fall, Fullhouse will celebrate its 30th anniversary, and Netflix's sequel, fuller house, will go all out to celebrate a major milestone on the official launch of season 3 on Friday, September 22!"
"With the start of the season 3 trailer, D.J., Stephanie and Kimmie have a moment of reflection as D.J. in Tanner's living room."
“…… Realizing that it's been 30 years since Jesse and Joey arrived, they've become a family
"All of a sudden, there was a sound on the door, although we don't know why someone would ring or knock on the door 30 years later to remind people that the door was always open, which implied the return of Jesse joy and Denny, who recreated their entrance from the full seat pilots in 1987..."
“… All the way to Tanner's clothes when they came in... "
“… Interesting looks and July 4 Episode... "
"What do you expect to see in the first half of season 3, and what moments in the trailer make you want more?"



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Laverne Cox serves as co-executive producer.”
“Pam Healey, John Hesling, Dan Peirson and Colleen Sands executive produce for Shed Media, while David Hillman and Kim Chessler executive produce for Lifetime.”
“Kim Kardashian West and Diana Madison executive produce.”
““Glam Masters” is produced by Shed Media, a division of Warner Bros. Unscripted and Alternative Television, for Lifetime.”
“In the end, only one of these beauty-obsessed bloggers will get to claim the title of Glam Master.”
“The winner each week will qualify to advance to the semi-finals where the best will battle it out in the Tournament of Masters finale.”
“Each closed-ended episode will feature four beauty bloggers who will go head-to-head to prove they have the talent, charisma and vision it takes to be the next big name in the beauty world.”
“Executive produced by style icon Kim Kardashian West, “Glam Masters” is created by Diana Madison, co-founder of digital media company Obsev Studios and creator and host of The Lowdown with Diana Madison and Style Lab.”
“The eight-episode series puts beauty influencers through themed challenges allowing them to put their best face forward to impress Cox, celebrity makeup artist Mario Dedivanovic, YouTube makeup expert Kandee Johnson and co-founder of Milk Makeup and Marie Claire Senior Fashion Editor Zanna Roberts Rassi.”
“Get your brushes and contour kits in hand for Lifetime’s new beauty competition series, “Glam Masters,” hosted by Emmy® Award nominee Laverne Cox (“Orange is the New Black,” “TRANSform Me”), premiering Wednesday, February 28 at 10pm ET/PT.”


"Laverne Cox as co executive producer."
"PAM Healy, John hesling, Dan Pearson and Colin sands are executive producers for shed media, while David Hillman and Kim Chesler are executive producers."
"Executive production by Kim Kardashian West and Diana Madison."
"Glam masters" is a lifelong production by shed media, Warner Bros.'s screenless and alternative Television Division
"In the end, only one of these beauty obsessed bloggers can get the title of Glam master."
"The weekly champions will qualify for the semi-finals, where the best players will compete in the masters finals."
"Every episode will be attended by four beauty bloggers, who will catch up and prove that they have the talent, charm and foresight to become the next big name in the beauty world."
Directed by fashion icon Kim Kardashian West, Glam masters was created by Diana Madison, co-founder of digital media company obsev studios and creator and owner of lowdown
"This eight episode series, through theme challenge, lets beauties show their best, and impresses Cox, famous makeup artist Mario dedivanovic, YouTube makeup expert candy Johnson, and Mary Claire senior fashion editor Zana Roberts Lassi, co-founder of milk make."
On Wednesday, February 28, at 10:00 p.m. EDT / Pacific time, Emmy nominees Laverne Cox ("orange is the new black" and "change me") presided over the "glamour masters" life long new beauty contest series, holding brushes and silhouettes



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From her cravings to her dance moves, it is clear that Cardi B's pregnancy isn't getting in the way of her doing anything — including performing at Coachella.”
“After performing at Coachella last weekend, Cardi B put on an impressive show, which fans got to see in person and on the Coachella YouTube livestream.”
“That's how it happened."”
“Like that!”
“"Like that!”
“"I was just trying to show the world how I got pregnant," Cardi B said.”
“News, the rapper joked with DeGeneres that they were the reason behind her soon to be new addition with her fiancé, rapper Offset.”
“While Cardi B's "suggestive" dance moves during her set were hardly shocking, according to E!”
“But people are always curious about the lives of their favorite celebrities — and although the answer to the question might be obvious, inquisitive minds might want to know how Cardi B got pregnant, like DeGeneres herself.”
“Sure, her dance moves might have contributed to her pregnancy but watching her Coachella performance isn't a look behind Cardi B's closed doors with Offset.”


"From her desire to her dance steps, it's clear that Katie B's pregnancy didn't prevent her from doing anything, including performing in cochella."
"After last weekend's performance in cochella, Katie B put on an impressive performance, which fans saw in person on cochella's YouTube live stream."
"That's how it happened."
"Like this!"
"Like this!"
"I just wanted to show the world how I got pregnant," caddy said
"News, rappers joke that the reason behind them is that she soon became the new addition to her fiance, rapper offset."
And Katie B's "suggestive" dance moves in her settings are hardly shocking, according to e! "
"But people are always curious about the lives of their favorite celebrities - although the answer may be obvious, curious people may want to know how Katie B got pregnant, just like DeGeneres himself."
"Of course, her dance steps may be the cause of her pregnancy, but watching her kochera's performance is not a look behind Katie B's closed door."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.2676767676767677
Correct number is  53
Total number is  198
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
